<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89113-0034 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-13-89.f2.A1033</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 9 / Friday, January 13, 1989 /Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Farmers Home Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">7 CFR Part 1980</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Revision of Guaranteed Farmer Program Loan Regulations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Farmers Home Administration, USDA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Farmers Home Administration (FmHA) amends its guaranteedloan regulations to implement certain provisions of the Agricultural CreditAct of 1987 (Pub. L. 100-233) and to provide clarification for the processingand servicing of guaranteed Operating (OL), Soil and Water (SW) and FarmOwnership (FO) loans. This action is necessary to carry out the provisionsof Pub. L. 100-233 and to encourage greater participation in the guaranteedloan program for farmers. The intended effect is to facilitate the handlingof guaranteed loans; to insure prompt payment of losses to lenders forbankruptcy cases; and to reduce the Government's cost for the program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>January 13, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>The Interim Regulatory Impact Analysis (IRIA) willbe made available for public inspection during regular working hours atthe following address: Office of the Chief, Directives Management Branch,USDA, Room 6348, South Agriculture Building, 14th and Independence AvenueSW., Washington, DC 20250. Telephone (202) 475-4019.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Ann Dill, Guaranteed Loan MakingBranch, Farmers Home Administration, USDA, Room 5440, Washington, DC 20250.Telephone (202) 382-1186.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Classification</ITAG>This action has been reviewed under USDA procedures established in DepartmentalRegulation 1512-1, which implements Executive Order 12291, and has beendetermined to be major because it will result in an annual effect on theeconomy of $100 million or more.<ITAG tagnum="84">Memorandum of Law</ITAG>I have reviewed the regulations which the Farmers Home Administration (FmHA)is publishing as a final rule to implement, among other items, Titles 5and 6 of the Agricultural Credit Act of 1987, Pub. L. 100-233, 101 Stat.1662 et seq. I find that these regulations comply with that statute andthat FmHA has the authority to propose such regulations pursuant to section339 of the Consolidated Farm and Rural Development Act (7 U.S.C. 1989).<ITAG tagnum="6">Christopher Hicks,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">General Counsel.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Summary of IRIA</ITAG>The USDA has developed an Interim Regulatory Impact Analysis (IRIA) dueto the effect the Agricultural Credit Act of 1987 (the Act) will have onthe economy. There are a number of requirements in the Act; however, oneof the most significant requirements is the loan restructuring with debtwrite down provision.The Agricultural Credit Act of 1987 provides for substantial revisionsin loan servicing procedures of FmHA. The objective of this impact analysisis to summarize the revised loan restructuring procedures, estimated costsand budget impacts from restructuring with debt write down.The restructuring provisions of the Act provide for a write down of debtto the recovery value of collateral where the return to the Governmentunder the restructured debt is at least as great as the return from involuntaryliquidation.A summary of the PRIA was published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on September 14, 1988, [53 FR 35638]. A summaryof the IRIA was published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on September 14, 1988 [FR 35638] as a part ofanother regulation package.The revision of guaranteed Farmer Program regulations is only one of theseveral documents published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> to implement the requirements of the Act andshould have a lesser impact on the economy than the loan restructuringwith debt write down.<ITAG tagnum="84">Programs Affected</ITAG>These changes affect the following FmHA programs as listed in the catalogof Federal Domestic Assistance:<ITAG tagnum="15">10.404_Emergency Loans</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">10.406_Farm Operating Loans</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">10.407_Farm Ownership Loans</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">10.416_Soil and Water Loans</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">10.422_Business and Industrial Loans</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Intergovernmental Consultation</ITAG>1. For the reasons set forth in the final rule related to Notice 7 CFRPart 3015, Subpart V (48 FR 29115, June 24, 1983) and FmHA Instruction1940-J, ``Intergovernmental Review of Farmers Home Administration Programsand Activities'' (December 23, 1983), Emergency loans, Farm Operating loans,and Farm Ownership loans, with the exception of nonfarm enterprise activity,are excluded from the scope of Executive Order 12372 which requires intergovernmentalconsultation with State and local officials.2. The Soil and Water Loan Program is subject to the provisions of ExecutiveOrder 12372 and FmHA Instruction 1940-J.<ITAG tagnum="84">Environmental Impact Statement</ITAG>This document has been reviewed in accordance with 7 CFR Part 1940, SubpartG, ``Environmental Program.'' It is the determination of FmHA that thisaction does not constitute a major Federal action significantly affectingthe quality of the human environment, and in accordance with the NationalEnvironmental Policy Act of 1969, Pub. L. 91-190, an Environmental ImpactStatement is not required.<ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>FmHA published a proposed rule in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on May 9, 1988 [53 FR 16416], for comments onits proposed revisions to the guaranteed loan regulations dealing withpayment of estimated loss claims while a borrower is engaged in a reorganizationbankruptcy at the time the plan is confirmed by the bankruptcy court, andat the completion of the bankruptcy plan. FmHA also published a proposedrule in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on June 17, 1988, [53 FR 22764] for commentson its proposed revisions implementing various sections of the AgriculturalCredit Act of 1987 and clarifying the processing and servicing of guaranteedloans. A interim rule was published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on January 3, 1989, [54 FR 11] implementing certainprovisions of the May 9, 1988 and June 17, 1988 proposed rules. Any itemscovered in the interim rule will remain subject to public comment. In orderto expedite the implementation of the remaining provisions, the <T4>Federal Registers</T4> of May 9 and June 17, 1988 are combined in theissuance of this document.<ITAG tagnum="84">Discussion of Comments</ITAG>This rule combines proposed rules published May 9, 1988, [52 FR 16416]and June 17, 1988, [53 FR 22764].A total of 8 comments were received on the proposed rule published in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> on May 9, 1988 [53 FR 16416]. Comments were receivedfrom bank officials, FmHA employees, and other Federal agencies and anFmHA employee association.Overall, most of the comments were favorable. Several respondents suggestedclarification of several items. All comments have been carefully consideredand appropriate changes and clarifications made. One respondent suggestedthat attorneys' fees be considered as part of the loss. The Agency doesnot agree. The guarantee covers loss of principle and interest on a loan.One respondent commented that we should require a lender to submit an estimatedloss report rather than have it optional. We disagree, as it is our opinionthis should be the lender's choice. One respondent objected to FmHA monitoringthe lender's files. We disagree. It is our opinion that monitoring of lenderfiles is necessary to insure proper program administration and is helpfulto both FmHA and the lender. One respondent indicated that sometimes thereare lengthy delays in the approval of bankruptcy reorganization plans andthat partial loss estimates be made in such cases if FmHA and the lendercan agree on the estimate. We agree. Some of the comments were generalin nature and require no response. Some of the comments are more specificallyaddressed later in this preamble. The proposed amendments for these revisionsare modified and adopted in this final rule.A total of 24 comments were received on the proposed rule published inthe <T4>Federal Register</T4> on June 17, 1988, [53 FR 22764]. Comments werereceived from commercial lenders, FmHA employees, other Federal Agencies,interest groups, individuals and state government agencies. Following isa brief summary of the comments received and the action the Agency is takingin response to the comments. The proposed amendments for these revisionsare modified and adopted in this final rule. Additional minor changes tocorrect internal inconsistencies and to clarify certain minor items arenot discussed below but are also adopted in this final rule.Subpart A<T3>Section 1980.6 Definitions and abbreviations.</T3> A reference wasadded to the definition of a borrower to refer to andSection; 1980.106(b)(4)of Subpart B of this part. No negative comments were received. The Agencyadopts the proposed rule.<T3>Section 1980.12 Case and identification (ID) numbers.</T3> One respondentsubmitted a comment under this section dealing with what happens when aholder does not agree to a servicing option. This is evidently a misprintas andSection; 1980.12 deals only with the assignment of case numbers. Itis believed that the respondent was referring to andSection; 1980.124 whichdeals with consolidations, rescheduling, reamortizing, and deferral. Therespondent's question was, if the FmHA purchased the holder's portion ofthe loan, does the borrower have an insured loan and would the guaranteedborrower then be eligible for the added servicing options that go alongwith an insured loan. In addition, the respondent felt that holders wouldnot be very willing to purchase the guaranteed portion of a loan if theyknew there was a possibility that if a deferral was ever approved, theywould not receive any payment on the guarantee during the deferral period.Section 1980.124(a)(6) of Subpart B of this part states, ``Any holder(s)agrees in writing to the rescheduling, reamortization, and deferral. Theholder(s) must understand that they will not receive any payments fromthe lender or from FmHA during the deferral period.'' This is a generalrequirement. A holder may not wish to agree to one of the enumerated servicingoptions, but the holder should understand that it may very well be to itsfinancial advantage to agree than to have its interest prematurely repurchasedby the lender or FmHA. Even if the holder wishes to retain the guaranteedportion of a loan when the lender wants to reschedule, reamortize or defer,the holder should be aware that, due to servicing requirements, the lenderor FmHA may need to purchase the guaranteed portion of the loan from theholder. For additional guidance regarding the servicing of guaranteed loans,paragraph X of Form FmHA 449-35, ``Lender's Agreement,'' spells out thelender's rights to repurchase the guaranteed portion from the holder. IfFmHA purchases the guaranteed portion of a loan from a holder, FmHA merelysteps in the shoes of the holder. The borrower is still a borrower of thelender unless the lender assigns its portion of the loan to FmHA, and onlythen would the borrower be entitled to FmHA's insured servicing options;otherwise the guaranteed borrower will continue to be serviced by the lender.The Agency believes the repurchase of the holder's interest is clarifiedin the appropriate sections of the regulations. The Agency adopts the proposedrule as is.<T3>Section 1980.13 Eligible lenders.</T3> This section sets out the criteriathat lenders must meet if they wish to participate in the guaranteed program.Several comments were received expressing concern that all AgriculturalCredit Corporations were not included in the proposed rule, which allowsan Agricultural Credit Corporation to become an eligible lender only ifit is a subsidiary of a Federal or State chartered bank. Lenders must besubjected to credit examinations. While stand-alone Agricultural CreditCorporations are subject to regular examinations and regulated by the FarmCredit System, they do not receive the oversight of an Agricultural CreditCorporation that is a subsidiary of a bank. It must be noted that an AgriculturalCredit Corporation that is not a subsidiary may still become an eligiblelender if the State Directors request that an exception be granted as statedin andSection; 1980.85 of this subpart. The Agency adopts the proposed rule.Another respondent felt that FmHA should expand the definition of beingin good standing with its licensing authorities to include such items asstrong asset ratios, low problem loan percentages, and a minimum lengthof time incorporated. The majority of the lenders involved are small agriculturalbanks whose financial condition is known by the local population. The Agencybelieves the addition of these requirements would have an adverse effecton lenders who wish to become eligible lenders as it would just be an additionalpaper burden. The Agency adopts the proposed rule.One respondent commented that the Agricultural Credit Act of 1987 requiredthe Federal Land Bank and the Federal Intermediate Credit Bank in eachdistrict to merge into a single entity (i.e., a Farm Credit Bank) by July6, 1988. The Act also required that the stockholders of each ProductionCredit Association (PCA) and Federal Land Bank Association (FLBA) thathave substantially the same chartered territory, vote no later than January6, 1989, on merging their organizations into a single entity. The respondentrequested that eligible Farm Credit System lenders be defined as any FarmCredit Bank, Bank for Cooperatives, and any other Farm Credit System institutionwith direct lending authority. The Agency agrees and has adopted this changeto the proposed rule.<T3>Section 1980.20 Loan guarantee limits.</T3> This section sets out thecriteria for the establishment of the percent of guarantee. The lenderand the applicant will propose this percent of guarantee. FmHA can eitheraccept or reject the proposed percent requested. The Agency proposed toallow all Farmer Program guaranteed loans be issued with a 90 percent guarantee.Several respondents felt that the Agency should continue to be able todetermine if the requested percent of guarantee was proper, and felt thatthis percent be based on risk exposure. The higher the risk, the lowerthe percent of guarantee that the Agency would be willing to grant. Therespondents believe that limiting the percentage to guarantee to 90 percentwould limit the flexibility of the program and reduce the availabilityto loan guarantees to farmers. The Agency has reconsidered its positionand agrees. Negotiation of the guaranteed percentage provides an opportunityfor the lender and FmHA to reach a compromise on sharing of risks, whichwould allow more guarantees to be issued. However, the maximum percentageof guarantee for Farmer Program loans will be 90 percent.The Agricultural Credit Act of 1987, Section 625, ``Sense of Congress RegardingGuaranteed Loan Programs,'' states that the Agency should issue guaranteesfor loans to the maximum extent possible to assist eligible borrowers whoseloans are restructured by institutions of the Farm Credit System, commercialbanks, insurance companies, and other lending institutions. Since the Agency has a charge to use its guarantee authority to the maximumextent possible, the proposed rule is amended to continue to allow guaranteepercentages to be negotiated, and the proposed rule is adopted as changed.<T3>Section 1980.22 Charges and fees by lender.</T3> This section providesguidance as to the fees and charges a lender may establish for loans. TheAgency amended this section to clarify that if these charges and fees arethe same as those charges other applicants pay for similar types of transactions,the lender may charge them to a guaranteed customer. No negative commentswere received. The Agency adopts the proposed rule.<T3>Section 1980.40 Environmental requirements.</T3> The section sets forththe environmental requirements regarding an environmental impact statement(EIS) which must be met. Previously the need for an EIS was determinedby the State Director. The Agency amended this section to provide thatthis determination be made by the approval official. No negative commentswere received. The Agency adopts the proposed rule.<T3>Section 1980.41(a) Equal Credit Opportunity Act.</T3> This subsectionhas been amended to provide a reference to physical/mental handicap (providingthe applicant can execute a legal contract) as an additional prohibitedgrounds for discrimination. No negative comments were received and theAgency adopts the proposed rule.<T3>Section 1980.67 Bankruptcy.</T3> This section has been added to provideguidance of payments of estimated losses as the result of bankruptcy. Thesection which was previously 1980.67 has been redesignated as 1980.68.No negative comments were received and the Agency adopts the proposed rule.<T3>Section 1980.85 Exception authority.</T3> This section provides guidancefor the making of an exception to any requirement or provision of thissubpart which is not inconsistent with any applicable law or opinion ofthe Comptroller General, provided the Administrator determines that applicationof the requirement or provision would adversely affect the Government'sinterest. To provide further clarification, the Agency has amended thisto include a specific reference to the authorizing statute.Subpart B<T3>Section 1980.101 Introduction.</T3> This section sets forth the policiesfor issuing guaranteed Operating (OL) (both loans and lines of credit),Farm Ownership (FO), Soil and Water (SW), Recreation (RL), and Emergency(EM) loans to lenders who are in need of a guarantee to continue with afarm borrower. Two of the loan programs (RL and EM) were deleted in theproposed rule due to suspension of the programs for a number of years.There were no negative comments received concerning the deletion of theRL program; thus, the Agency adopts the proposed rule.One respondent commented that due to the Administration's push for increasingthe guaranteed loan program and the serious national drought situationthat exists, the deletion of the guaranteed EM loan program would be avery bad policy. As stated in the proposed rule, this program has beensuspended for a number of years. Lenders have shown very little interestin the program due to the complicated process of calculating losses andthe additional paper work involved in applying for the subsidized interestrate. This fact, plus recent legislation which places additional emphasison allowing guaranteed operating loans to be made to help family-size farmersovercome losses incurred during the 1988 drought, leads the Agency to believethat these factors, along with the additional servicing option of debtwrite down, will allow the lender to continue with those farmers who havebeen affected by the drought. It will also assure that lenders will nothave to learn a new way of submitting guaranteed applications which wouldbe very complicated as to the documentation of losses resulting from thedrought. The Agency adopts the proposed rule.The Agency also proposed to remove the ``Debt Adjustment Program-FarmersHome Administration (FmHA) Guarantees of Loans with Accompanying Debt Adjustmentby Lender,'' which was Exhibit B of this subpart. No negative commentswere received; thus, the Agency adopts this portion of the proposed rule.The Agency also proposed to remove andSection; 1980.101(f), which dealt withrestricting the issuance of OL and FO guarantees if the loan will be usedto increase the production of crops in surplus. No negative comments werereceived; thus, the Agency adopts the proposed rule.<T3>Section 1980.106 Abbreviations and definitions. </T3>This section setsforth the definitions for key phrases throughout this regulation.One respondent commented that the definition for an applicant should beclarified to insure that the party applying for the guaranteed loan orline of credit is the party that will become the borrower if the loan ismade. The present definition in this section for an applicant states, ``Theparty applying for a guaranteed loan or line of credit.'' The Agency doesnot believe further clarification is necessary. The Agency adopts the proposedrule as is.One respondent commented that the definition of a joint operation addedadditional confusion as it requires that a husband and wife, who typicallyapply for credit together as co-applicants, be considered a joint operation.This will increase confusion which will result in an increasing numberof instances where improper assistance is inadvertently granted and willfalsely show that the Agency is making a shift away from individuals toentity borrowers. While the Agency agrees that this requirement might causesome confusion initially, it must be pointed out that a husband or a wifemay each file as an individual. Also, the Consolidated Farm and Rural DevelopmentAct does not contemplate making or guaranteeing one loan to two individualsand the Equal Opportunity Credit Act prohibits discrimination based onmarital status. The Agency is treating a husband and wife just like anyother individuals who farm together. Thus, the Agency cannot change thislanguage of the proposed rule.Another respondent was concerned that the removal of the definition ofaquaculture would result in certain aquaculture practices which would nolonger be permissible, such as the growing and harvesting of aquatic plants.The Agency agrees and has revised this section to include a definitionfor aquaculture. The Agency adopts the proposed rule as changed.One respondent commented that in the definition of family farm, the word``immediate'' should be inserted before the word ``family'' in paragraph(b)(6)(iv)(A) of this section. This change would insure that lenders havea clear understanding of what constitutes the members of a family farm.The Agency agrees and has amended the proposed rule accordingly.The same respondent also suggested that the words ``full time'' be deletedfrom the family farm definition in paragraph (b)(6)(v), which providesguidance for the amount of outside labor an applicant may use in carryingon the farming operation. Sometimes a lender will submit a request fora guarantee which includes an extraordinary amount of full time hired laborand the argument is that this section will allow excessive full time hiredlabor. The Agency disagrees because it must still be demonstrated thatthe full-time hired labor be a ``reasonable'' amount. The Agency adoptsthe proposed rule as is.Several respondents commented that the requirement for a 10 percent reservein the definition for a positive cash flow was too restrictive. The argumentwas that in most cases, guaranteed loans are used for borrowers with tightcash flow and limited repayment ability. The respondents did indicate thata reserve was necessary but a 5 percent reserve was more in line with theclientele for which lenders would be requesting guarantees. In many cases,the reason that the lender is requesting a guarantee is not so much becauseof a tight cash flow, but because the security margins have deterioratedto where the lender is faced with a loan being classified as marginal.Many of these borrowers will have an acceptable cash flow, as the guaranteewill provide the lender the relief from the bank examiners to continuewith the loan. The Agency adopts the proposed rule as is.One respondent commented that the cash flow required an average standardof living but there is no description of how to determine what an averagestandard of living will be. The Agency agrees and has revised the definitionof average standard of living to read ``provide living expenses which arein accordance with the essential family needs.'' The Agency adopts theproposed rule as amended.One respondent commented that andSection; 1980.106(b)(23), which deals withthe definition of veterans, should be amended to read, ``For a period ofat least 180 days, any part of which occurred after January 31, 1955, buton or before May 7, 1975.'' They stated if this was not amended, it wouldappear that only those who had entered the reserves during the Vietnamera would be entitled to veteran's preference, but not those who actuallyserved in Vietnam for six or more months. Presently the regulations reads``for a period of not more than 180 days, any part of which occurred afterJanuary 31, 1955, but on or before May 7, 1975.'' Removing the word ``not''clarifies that persons who served during this timeframe will be definedas veterans. The Agency adopts the proposed rule as amended.<T3>Section 1980.108 General provisions. </T3>This section provides theguidance regarding security for the loans, personal guarantees, personsentitled to veteran's preference, credit elsewhere, etc.One respondent commented that the requirement that the borrower's and personalguarantor's financial statement not be more than 60 days old at time ofcertification and loan closing is very restrictive. The respondent suggesteda more reasonable time of 90 days. The Agency agrees and adopts the proposedrule as amended.One respondent commented that the requirement for the lender to certifyto FmHA that the lien position required under the terms of the loan hasbeen obtained is too stringent as it is not always possible for the lenderto be aware of a claim or lien. They suggested that the language be changedto allow the lender to ascertain that there are no <T3>known claims. </T3>This change should insure that the lender exercisedreasonable diligence while taking into account that there might be situationswhere the lender was not aware of the claim or lien. The majority of lenderstoday are using in-house attorneys to close loans. The attorney shouldbe responsible for providing the lender with the necessary informationas to claims and liens upon the property in question. It is the lender'sresponsibility to insure that the proper lien position is obtained at loanclosing and if there are any questions, they should obtain the assistanceof an attorney.Acceptance of this change would make it difficult to deny a loss claimif at a later date it was determined the lender did not have the properlien position. The Agency adopts the proposed rule as is.One respondent commented that in paragraph (c) of this section, which requireseach lender to certify that the loan cannot be made without a guarantee,the lender should not be further required to certify that credit is notavailable elsewhere. They suggested that since the lender cannot reasonablycertify that no other lender would or could make the loan that the word``elsewhere'' be deleted from the heading. The Agency agrees with thissuggestion as the intent of the paragraph was not to have the lender certifythat the applicant cannot obtain any credit anywhere but rather that theapplicant cannot obtain credit from that particular lender without a guarantee.The Agency adopts the proposed rule as changed.Several respondents commented that the change which considers differentlien positions on the same real estate security as separate and identifiablecollateral was a welcome relief. They went on to comment that similar authorityfor use with chattel secured loans such as Operating loans would be helpful.The Agency believes that allowing different lien positions on real estateto be considered as separate and identifiable collateral provides a meanswhereby the farmer may take advantage of the equity in the real estateproperty. The Agency does not believe that allowing different lien positionson chattels would be beneficial to the farmer. Real estate, during normaltimes is fairly stable in value; chattels tend to lose value over time.By allowing a separate lien position on chattels to be used as collateralwhen it is not separate and identifiable will cause confusion if a lossclaim was filed and other parties have an interest in the chattel property.The Agency adopts the proposed rule as is.One respondent commented that crop insurance should be required. Whilethe Agency agrees, it cannot require that it be a blanket policy. The Agencyhas amended this section to encourage the taking of crop insurance if itis available.One respondent commented that it was not a good idea to adopt the proposedchange deleting the requirement that personal guarantees from principalmembers of cooperatives and corporations be taken. The Agency has reconsideredits proposal and has amended the proposed rule to retain the present requirementsregarding the liability of the principal members or stockholders of thecorporation or cooperative (in the case of operating loans) or membersor stockholders holding a majority interest (in the case of Farm Ownershipor Soil and Water loans). The Agency adopts the proposed rule as changed.In addition to the above changes to the proposed rule the Agency has expandedon the relationship between FmHA insured loans and guaranteed loans. Thiswas added to clarify the relationship between the two.<T3>Section 1980.109 Promissory notes, line of credit agreements, securityinstruments, and financing statements. </T3>Several respondents commentedthat they felt all members or stockholders of a cooperative or a corporationshould be required to sign the note as co-signer(s) and they should bepersonally liable for the debt. The argument was that there could be timeswhen certain members or stockholders have extensive assets and, under theproposed rule, would not be required to either sign the note or pledgethese assets. Requiring members or stockholders to sign the note and tobe personally liable for the debt will insure that they will all have anactive interest in the debt and will also better protect the interest ofthe Government in preventing or minimizing future losses. The Agency hasreconsidered its proposal and has amended the proposed rule to retain thepresent requirements regarding the liability of the principal members orstockholders of the corporation or cooperative (in the case of operatingloans) or members or stockholders holding a majority interest (in the caseof Farm Ownership or Soil and Water loans).There were also several respondents who suggested that the proposed rulerequirement that demand notes not be allowed would discourage participationin the program by lenders. They indicated that the ``payment on demand''clause was a common and accepted practice in the agricultural lending industry.They felt that if a recipient of a guaranteed loan is performing as projectedin the approved operating budget and is otherwise fulfilling the loan obligations,the loan recipient would have a valid defense to the lender who would exercisethe demand clause. The Agency cannot guarantee a note which is immediatelydue and payable, and that is what a demand note is. The Agency adopts theproposed rule as is.<T3>Section 1980.113 Receiving and processing applications. </T3>This sectionprovides guidelines to the field staff on the difference between a preliminaryand a complete application and how each application will be handled whenreceived.One respondent commented that in paragraph (a)(1) that lenders are notalways providing the information requested on the form. It was suggestedthat this paragraph be clarified to insure a lender would provide any otherinformation requested on the form. The regulations already require a lenderto provide the necessary information. If the lender does not, the lendershould not be receiving a guarantee. Also, the Agency believes that theregulation as proposed, makes it clear what sources of information shouldbe looked at and has adopted the proposed rule as is.One respondent commented that in paragraph (c) of this section, an appealshould never be allowed on a preliminary application. A complete applicationshould be required, which would allow for a complete determination to bemade before an appeal is even considered. To do otherwise will result ina completed application being submitted, thus having two appeals on thesame request. The opportunity for an appeal should be afforded wheneveran adverse action is taken. If a lender insists on presenting FmHA witha preliminary application and the information clearly indicates the applicationwould be rejected, then the Agency would have to notify the lender andthe loan applicant stating the reason(s) and providing appeal rights. TheAgency adopts the proposed rule as is.One respondent commented that the line of credit agreements between theborrower and the lender should establish the period of time (1, 2, or 3years) and the ceiling (amount) for lines of credit. The Agency agreesand has adopted the proposed rule as amended.Several respondents commented on the requirement that an application includea 5-year financial and production history and documentation as to whatthe sources of prices and yield information were used, and that considerationbe given to allowing the use of the County average yields when an applicant'sproduction history has been affected by a disaster(s) declared by the Presidentor designated by the Secretary of Agriculture. The Agency believes thatin order to obtain an historical record of a farmer's ability to managethe operation, five years is the minimum historical requirement. Reducingthe five-year requirement to three years could adversely affect the historicalfinancial and production picture and present an unrealistic projectionof the farmer's actual accomplishments. As to the need for additional lenderdocumentation as to prices and yields, if the lender provides the informationalready required, the Agency will be able to make a sound decision on thefarmer's financial and production abilities. The Agency does not adopteither suggestion for reducing the number of years required for historicaldata or the need for additional lender documentation as to prices and yields.The suggestion that a farmer be allowed to use county averages for thoseyears when a disaster was responsible for a reduction in yields has beenincorporated into the final rule. The Agency adopts this proposed ruleas changed.One respondent suggested that if a lender had established ``normal prices''for use in operational forecasts for long-term loans, this would be acceptableto the Agency. It was felt that these prices, based on historical cashprices and adjusted to reflect commodity prices, would minimize the impacton projections of volatility in the commodity markets. If the Agency wouldallow lenders to utilize these prices, it would result in many differenttypes of price projections being submitted to the Agency for considerationwhich would result in additional confusion. The Agency adopts this sectionof the proposed rule as is.Several respondents commented that paragraph (b)(7) should be clarifiedas to the types of restrictions and requirements the Agency is requiringso lenders can draft restrictions that will meet the Government's concerns.The items listed in paragraph (b)(7) of this section are the minimum itemsa loan or line of credit agreement should include. If the Agency triesto pinpoint every item that could be included in a loan or line of creditagreement, it would be denying the lender the ability to structure an agreementto address specific concerns of the borrower's operation. The Agency adoptsthis section of the proposed rule as is.Several respondents had comments regarding the selection of appraisersby the lender for appraisal work. The proposed rule requires that the Agencyconcur in the selection of the appraiser and that the appraiser must meetcertain qualifications. It was suggested that requiring the Agency to concurin the selection of an appraiser would lead to an appearance of favoritism.As explained in the proposed rule, there have been instances where a conflicthas occurred when a question arises concerning the value of the security(i.e., the lender's loss claim based on appraised value.) This proposedrule will assure that FmHA and the lender will have agreed prior to loanapproval that the appraiser is qualified. It must be remembered that thelender is the one that selects the appraiser and that this requirementonly pertains to FmHA concurring in this selection. Just because the CountySupervisor concurs in the selection of an appraiser in no way relievesthe County Supervisor's responsibility as to questioning an appraisal thatis out of line. The Agency does not adopt this recommendation.Several respondents commented that the section regarding the qualificationsof an appraiser should be clarified. One respondent suggested, ``the appraisermust meet one of the qualifications in the following order of preference.''This change will insure that the lender in selecting an appraiser willnot immediately go to item (e) for the selection criteria but will be requiredto select appraisers who have a sound and knowledgeable appraisal background.The Agency adopts this section of the proposed rule as amended.One suggestion was that the person conducting the appraisal use the normallyaccepted appraisal procedure required by FmHA appraisal regulations. Theappraiser is selected by the lender with the concurrence of the CountySupervisor. Adoption of this suggestion would result in a reduction inthe number of appraisers who would be willing to perform this functionfor a lender. As professionals, they will normally insist on presentingan appraisal report under their professional guidelines. To insure thatthe lenders be allowed to use all qualified appraisers, the Agency adoptsthe proposed rule as is. One of the respondents suggested that the appraiserbe required to submit a recent sample of an appraisal if FmHA is not familiarwith the appraiser's work. The Agency agrees and has amended this sectionaccordingly. The Agency adopts the proposed rule as amended.One respondent commented that requiring the lender to provide managementassistance to the borrower could lead to a lawsuit if the lender providedthis management assistance and later the operation failed. They went onto indicate that ``once a lender provides any type of `management assistance'to a borrower, the court may determine that the lender has become an insiderto the operation. The lender then becomes liable for the obligations ofthe borrower and the ultimate success or failure of the operation.'' Therespondent suggested that this section of the proposed rule be changedto where the words ``and providing management assistance to the borrower''be deleted. The Agency does not agree. That phrase has been in the regulationsfor some time. It does not require that a lender provide management assistanceto a borrower but rather that the lender inform FmHA of any plan to doso. The Agency has clarified this language and has adopted the proposedrule as amended.Several respondents commented on the requirement in the administrativesection that provides for the County Supervisor to send Attachment 1 toExhibit D of this subpart to the borrower and the lender describing theInterest Rate Buydown Program. One respondent stated that it was theirunderstanding that the application is between the lender and FmHA and theysaw no reason for FmHA to have direct correspondence with the borrowerregarding any part of the Interest Rate Buydown Program. It was the respondent'sconcern that almost every borrower would request the lender to write downthe loan, even when the interest rate buydown is not necessary. This canalso have an adverse affect on the lender's other customers who do nothave guaranteed loans because they would also be demanding a break on interestrates. The respondents felt that this section should be deleted, sinceparticipation in the interest rate buydown is determined by the lender.While the Agency agrees that the determination rests with the lender onwhether or not to participate in the program, the farmer has a right toknow of the provisions of the whole guaranteed program. The Agency adoptsthe proposed rule as is. <T3>Section 1980.114 FmHA evaluation of applications. </T3>This sectionprovides guidance for the County Supervisor on evaluating applicationsand how to proceed after the evaluation is completed. One respondent commentedthat the proposed rule indicates that the County Supervisor will notifythe lender and the loan applicant in writing within 10 calendar days ofa decision to deny the loan. The concern was that FmHA should not be notifyingthe loan applicant as the lender is the one requesting the guarantee. Therespondent felt that it would only serve to deteriorate relationships betweenthe loan applicant and the lender by receiving correspondence from theCounty Supervisor. The respondent also felt that FmHA should be able tonotify the lender within 5 working days of the decision to deny the guaranteedrequest. The Agency agrees as to the timeframe, but as mentioned before,believes that the loan applicant should know the action taken and has adoptedthe proposed rule as amended. <T3>Section 1980.115 County Committee review. </T3>This section providesguidance to the field staff on the timeframe for the County Committee toreview loan applications and the action that will be taken after eithera favorable or unfavorable decision is made. One respondent commented that the proposed rule required that all guaranteedapplications be acted upon within 60 calendar days after receipt of completedapplications. It was suggested that all guaranteed loan applications, oncecompleted, could be acted upon within 30 calendar days. This change wouldfurther assist in streamlining the application process and reduce the excessivetime involved in guaranteed loan applications. It must be pointed out thatin the administrative section of this section, complete applications fromapproved lenders must be acted upon by the County Committee within 14 calendardays and once the County Committee has made a determination regarding eligibility,the approval official has 14 working days to render approval. The Agencyagrees that once all information is received for a complete application,60 days is too long to reach a decision. The Agency will amend the requirementthat for ALP lenders the timeframe will be 14 days for County Committeeaction, if possible, and after County Committee action, 14 days, if possible,for approval action. This change was the result of one respondent commentingthat it was not always possible to get County Committee persons out ofthe field during spring planting to insure a committee meeting could beheld within 14 days. For non-ALP lenders, the Agency is reducing the totaltime from 60 days to 45 days after a complete application is received,as there is additional information required from lenders who are not ALPlenders which will normally take additional time to review. The Agencyadopts the proposed rule as amended. Several respondents commented on the requirement that a lender has to agreethat if liquidation of an account becomes imminent, the lender will considerthe borrower for an Interest Rate Buydown under Exhibit D of this subpart,and request a determination of the borrower's eligibility by FmHA. Thelender must also agree not to initiate foreclosure action on the guaranteedloan until 60 calendar days after a determination has been made regardingeligibility of the borrower to participate in the Interest Rate BuydownProgram. One respondent indicated that one lender who has fully supportedthe guaranteed program in the past may cease using the program due to thisrequirement, as the lender does not believe in having different interestrates for different borrowers. This requirement is mandated by Section613 of the Agricultural Credit Act of 1987. Thus, the Agency cannot changethis language. In order to clarify this requirement, the Agency has setforth guidelines in Exhibit D to Subpart B of Part 1980 establishing timeframesfor the determination of eligibility so that lenders who will continueliquidation will be able to proceed in a timely manner. The Agency adoptsthis proposed rule as amended.<T3>Section 1980.116 Review of requirements. </T3>This section sets forththe guidance regarding the review of approval conditions by the lenderand the applicant and the execution of the acceptance or rejection of conditionsby the lender to the County Supervisor. One respondent commented that somelenders have a problem with the execution of a new note simultaneouslywith the restructure of a loan. The respondent suggested that an argumentcould be made that the original note has been paid and, by operation oflaw, the mortgage satisfied. In other words, a new note would require anew mortgage. It was suggested that consideration be given to allow theuse of existing legal documents, provided a title opinion is obtained verifyingthe validity of the lien position, and if necessary, a new loan agreementsetting forth conditions, dollar amounts, etc. Adoption of this suggestionwould require extensive revision of the Agency's regulations as they donot contemplate the restructuring of a loan as a loan purpose. Refinancinga debt is a presently recognized loan purpose, when the debt is refinanced,the new debt is substituted for the old debt and new loan instruments shouldbe taken. The Agency agrees and has amended this section by allowing eligiblelenders to use a restructure agreement in lieu of a new promissory note,providing the terms and conditions of the restructure agreements meet theFmHA guaranteed loan making regulation requirements. The Agency adoptsthe proposed rule as is.One respondent commented that this section sets forth the guidelines fornotification of the lender and the loan applicant of an unfavorable action.The respondent suggested that it was important that Subpart B of Part 1900of this chapter clarify that the applicant can appeal the denial withoutthe assistance of the lender. The respondent further stated in many instancesthe lender will not be willing to spend the time necessary to be involvedin an appeal of a denial of a loan guarantee. It must be pointed out thatthe applicant for a guarantee is the lender. The lender is the party thatbenefits from the granting of the guarantee by FmHA. The loan applicantdoes not make the decision to request the guarantee; it is the decisionof the lender to request the guarantee if the guarantee is the only meansthe lender has of continuing with, or assisting, an applicant. SubpartB of Part 1900 of this chapter sets forth the guidelines regarding appealsof requests for guarantees. The majority of appeals concerning guaranteedapplications involve rejections due to larger than family size farms andlack of repayment. The lender must understand that FmHA's guaranteed farmloans are subject to family size unit limitations, which are determinedby the County Committee. Applications that do not cash flow indicate aweak credit risk for the lender for which obtaining a guarantee would reducethe lender's losses. The Agency has a mission to provide credit assistanceto farmers who are unable to obtain credit from other sources, but it alsohas a mission to protect the interest of the Government. Only by involvingboth the lender and the loan applicant in the appeal process will the Agencybe assured that both parties are honestly working together to achieve asuccessful operation. The Agency adopts the proposed rule as is.<T3>Section 1980.118 Issuance of Lender's Agreement, Loan Note Guarantee,Contract of Guarantee, and Assignment Guarantee Agreement. </T3>Severalrespondents commented regarding paragraph (d) of this section which statedthat, ``Paragraph IX (C)(10) of Form FmHA 449-35 will be changed by strikingthe word `semiannually,' inserting the word `annual' in its place, andeliminating the words `and June 30.' '' The majority of the comments werethat this paragraph should be deleted and the change be made in the form.One respondent felt that FmHA should continue to request semi-annual reports.This agreement is used for both Business and Industry (Bandamp;I) guaranteedloans and Farmer Program (FP) guaranteed loans. The Agency agrees thatthe form should be revised to indicate the difference between Bandamp;I andFP loan status reporting and has adopted the proposed rule as amended.FmHA has not been requiring the submission of semi-annual reports for FarmerPrograms loans for a number of years. This additional reporting requirementwould only place an additional burden on the Finance Office. The lenderis already required to provide the County Supervisor with information anytime a borrower is 30 days delinquent. This information allows the CountySupervisor to know the status of each guaranteed loan if it becomes delinquent,thus providing more up-to-date information than a semi-annual status reportfrom the Finance Office. The Agency has amended Form FmHA 449-35 to providefor Farmer Programs loan status to be reported annually.<T3>Section 1980.123 Transfer and assumption of Farmer Program loans. </T3>Thissection provides guidance as to the actions necessary when a guaranteedloan is being transferred and assumed.One respondent commented that paragraph (f)(1) of this section should beamended to read, ``FmHA must determine that the transferor has no reasonableability to make his scheduled debt payments considering assets and incomeat the time of the transfer.'' The respondent believes that this amendmentwill insure that if the borrower could pay only a few dollars but not theentire scheduled payment, then the ability to pay just a few dollars wouldnot make the person ineligible for transfer and assumption. This paragraphdeals with the release of liability by the lender with FmHA's written concurrencewhen the value of the collateral is less than the amount of the loan orline of credit being transferred. The ability of the transferor to payonly a few dollars will not make the transferor ineligible to transferits loan. The Agency adopts the proposed rule.<T3>Section 1980.124 Consolidation, rescheduling, reamortizing and deferral.</T3>This section provides guidance to allow borrowers who cannot pay asscheduled to have their loan(s) rescheduled, reamortized or deferred whenit will result in the orderly collection of a loan.  Several respondents commented that many guaranteed loans were allowed tobe amortized over a 22-year period with a balloon at seven years for OLloans when real estate represented a substantial portion of the security.They suggested that if it became necessary to reamortize or rescheduleloans of this type that the loan should be reamortized or rescheduled withinthe remaining original amortization period of the loan. The Agency agreesand has incorporated this change in the final rule.  Several respondents also pointed out that there were inconsistencies inthe language of this section in that a new note may be used for reschedulingand then later on it stated no new note or line of credit agreement willbe allowed. They suggested that an ``allonge'' described within this sectionis sufficient for accommodating these rescheduling or reamortizations asit is more legally effective to use an ``allonge'' which would allow theoriginal note to continue recitation of the original security agreements,mortgages, and other loan documents. The Agency intended that an allongebe used when a note is rescheduled. However, the Agency recognizes thatwhen a consolidation occurs, the existing notes being consolidated arealso rescheduled. In that case a new note will be taken to evidence theconsolidated indebtedness. The Agency has amended this section accordinglyto make this clear. The Agency adopts the proposed rule as amended.  One respondent commented that this section does not indicate whether theborrower is required to offer for sale any assets determined to be non-essentialto the farming operating as required for insured Farmer Program loans.The respondent suggested that any non-essential assets should be sold priorto processing a request for consolidation, rescheduling, reamortization,or deferral. The Agency believes that if a lender has to request FmHA'sconcurrence with the lender's decision to pursue a servicing option tocontinue with a guaranteed borrower, the lender will have explored allthe possibilities of how best to service the loan. The Agency is not adoptingthis suggestion.  One respondent felt that the County Supervisor should approve all servicingactions in advance. The Agency agrees and has amended the proposed ruleaccordingly.  One respondent suggested that the term ``unplanned'' as it relates to farmexpenses and family living expenses should be clearly defined to preventliberal interpretations by lenders who may be encouraged to process marginalrequests for debt write down for the purpose of receiving a loss payment.The Agency agrees and has deleted the word ``unplanned'' and inserted ``unforeseen''.For example, this past season has resulted in circumstances caused by thedrought which were not foreseen by either the lender or the farmer andwhich resulted in essential expenses being incurred to protect the collateral.The agency adopts the proposed rule as amended.  One respondent suggested that the Agency clarify the concept of ``untimelymarketing practices'' as an indication of poor financial management. Therespondent felt that if a farmer made a decision to sell a crop on contractand later the price increased that this might be used as an excuse to notgrant servicing actions. The Agency agrees and amended this section toindicate that if a farmer forward contracted, price differential wouldnot be an indication of untimely marketing practices.  One respondent commented that a delinquency caused by a natural disasterbe specified as circumstances beyond the farmer's control. The Agency agreesand has amended the proposed rule accordingly.  One respondent commented that andSection;andSection;1980.124 and 1980.125 ofthe proposed rule allow lenders to reamortize, reschedule, defer or writedown the principal indebtedness of a borrower's account; with an accompanyingloss payment by FmHA but that an important and attractive farm loan restructuringtool also authorized by the Agricultural Credit Act of 1987 and the FoodSecurity Act of 1985 was absent from this proposed rule. The respondentwas referring to Conservation Easements, which were enacted by section1318(a) of the Food Security Act of 1985 and are found in section 349 ofthe Consolidated Farm and Rural Development Act (7 U.S.C. 1997). This authoritywas further amended by section 612 of the Agricultural Credit Act of 1987.Section 349 allows the Secretary to acquire and retain an easement in realproperty for a term of not less than 50 years for conservation, recreation,and/or wildlife purposes. It also provides that any such easement acquiredby the Secretary shall be purchased from the borrower by cancelling a partof the amount of such outstanding loans the borrower held under laws administeredby the Farmers Home Administration. This requirement was designed to applyonly to FmHA's insured loan borrowers. In the guaranteed program, the loansare made and serviced by the lender. FmHA is only guaranteeing the lenderagainst a loss if the lender's borrower should default on the loan. Thus,the Agency cannot change the language of the proposed rule.  Another respondent also commented that the Agency has neglected to providefor Conservation Easements as established in the Food Security Act of 1985.For the reasons set forth above, the Agency is adopting the proposed rule. <T3>Section 1980.125 Debt write down. </T3>This section allows lendersto write down the principal indebtedness of a borrower's account, withan accompanying loss payment by FmHA. Thus, for purposes of the guarantee,the lender shall be treated as having sustained a loss and any amount paidto a lender will be treated as payment toward satisfaction of the loanguarantee. This section also requires the borrower to enter into a sharedappreciation arrangement with the lender to recapture any appreciationof any real estate security which might occur.  One respondent commented that ``Typically, no lender would be able to funda term loan of one year or longer at rates anywhere close to 90-day Treasurybill rates.'' This comment was in regard to the requirement that the lenderwill use the rate for 90-day Treasury bills in effect on the date of thewrite down to calculate present value. The Agency has reconsidered thisissue and has deleted the requirement regarding the use of 90-day Treasurybill rate to calculate present value. The rate to be used will be the loanrate. The Agency adopts the proposed rule as amended.  One respondent commented that this section should specify that only theminimum number of loans will be written down to permit the developmentof a feasible plan of operation. The respondent also felt that the proposedrule was not clear as to whether the lender would be required to liquidatethe borrower's accounts or initiate foreclosure action if a positive cashflow cannot be demonstrated through debt write down. The Agency agreesregarding the number of loans which may be written down and has amendedthe proposed rule accordingly. Regarding the comment concerning the liquidationof the account, the account would be delinquent if a positive cash flowcannot be developed and the lender would have to abide by andSection;andSection;1980.145and 1980.146 of this subpart, which would result in an orderly liquidationof the account by the lender. The Agency adopts the proposed rule.  One respondent commented that the net recovery from a Chapter 7 bankruptcymay be similar to the net recovery from an involuntary liquidation or foreclosureunder andSection;1980.125(b)(1)(ii). It is unclear how the lender shall determinethe net recovery from a Chapter 11 or 12 bankruptcy. Section 1980.114 ofthis subpart explains how Chapter 11 and 12 bankruptcies will be handledas to payment of estimated losses. The Agency adopts this proposed ruleas is.      One respondent commented that this section should specify the nature andextent of the documentation required to be provided by the lenders as supportfor the write down determination and also that a note or line of creditagreement which has been written down cannot be rescheduled or reamortizedduring the shared appreciation period. The Agency has amended the proposedrule to specify the necessary information which the lender will submitin requesting a write down, but the Agency believes that the proposed ruleadequately addresses what a lender must consider when contemplating a writedown. Paragraph (a)(1) states that the borrower must demonstrate that apositive cash flow cannot be developed after consideration is given tothe authorities as set out in andSection; 1980.124 of this subpart. If apositive cash flow can be developed showing that a debt write down willallow the borrower to remain in business, then a write down may be approved.This section requires a cash flow to be developed which will provide thedocumentation necessary for the write down. However, the Agency has amendedthe proposed rule to specify that, when a lender has both a line of creditand a loan, the line of credit will be considered for write down beforethe loan will and that principal will be written down before accrued interest.The Agency also believes that the suggestion not to allow the notes tobe rescheduled or reamortized during the shared appreciation period isnot in accordance with the purpose of the Agricultural Credit Act of 1987.The purpose of the Act is to allow farmers to remain on the farm, if possible,and it would be unfair to force a farmer, who has had the debt writtendown, suffered a financial loss beyond the farmer's control 6 years downthe road, and is still able to show that the plan will work, into liquidation.The Agency adopts the proposed rule as amended. One respondent commented that andSection; 1980.125(a)(7) was unclear as itstated no further advances may be made under a line of credit but furtherstates the principal amount remaining after the write down becomes thenew line of credit ceiling, implying that further advances up to the newceiling are allowed. The Agency agrees and has amended this section tomake it clear that the written down line of credit becomes a fixed amountloan and no new advances can be made under it. The Agency adopts the proposedrule as changed. Several respondents commented that the lender must consider the InterestRate Buydown program, before the lender could go to write down. The InterestRate Buydown program, is less costly to the Government than paying lossesafter a write down. Therefore, FmHA requires that the lender explore allthe other available servicing options, including Interest Rate Buydown,before writing down a debt. The Agency adopts this proposed rule as is.Several respondents commented that in paragraph (b), an allowance shouldbe provided for income received by the lender from leasing of the propertywhile the lender has the property in inventory. The Agency agrees and hasamended the proposed rule accordingly. Several respondents commented regarding the requirement that the borrowerwho received a write down would have to enter into a shared appreciationagreement. One respondent felt that requiring the borrower to enter intoa shared appreciation agreement would have a crippling effect on the farmerand would require further monitoring by the Agency. Another respondentin favor of the agreement suggested the appreciation value be based onthe difference between the net recovery value at the time the loan is writtendown and the appraised value at the time of recapture. To avoid excessivelosses to the Government, the Agency has adopted the shared appreciationconcept. This concept will only come into play if the value of the realproperty increases during the agreement period. To clarify the value whichwill be used to calculate the appreciation, the Agency has decided to usethe market value of the property. This will reduce claims at the expirationof the agreement that the original value placed on the property was incorrect,as the lender is required to utilize an independent appraiser to establishthe appraised value. The Agency adopts the proposed rule as is. One respondent commented that FmHA should require prior approval of alltransfers of real property by surviving spouses to prevent circumventionof the shared appreciation agreement. This agreement provides that oneof the occurrences which would affect the recapture of appreciation isthe transfer of the property. Transfer of title to the property to theborrower's spouse on the borrower's death will not be treated as a conveyancefor the purpose of recapture. However, if surviving spouse then transferstitle to the property to someone else, then recapture would be triggeredat this time of that latter transfer. The Agency adopts the proposed rule.<T3>Section 1980.126 Mediation. </T3>This section provides guidance onthe responsibilities of a lender regarding the mediation process. Severalrespondents commented that this section should be amended to require FmHAto review and respond during the required time period for decisions underthe State mediation law; clarify the ability of the lender to discuss otherservicing options during the mediation process; issue a State supplementregarding mediation; require FmHA to send to the lender and the borrowercopies of Exhibit D, ``Interest Rate Buydown Program,'' and Attachment1 to Exhibit D; require FmHA to draft a form which indicates the differentservicing actions a lender may provide to a borrower; require FmHA to participatein a meeting to discuss the servicing of the delinquent guaranteed loan;require the lender to participate in States which have ``voluntary'' mediationprograms; and require State Director approval of any agreements reachedduring the mediation process. The guaranteed program depends upon commerciallenders requesting guarantees to cover their higher risk loans. If a numberof the suggestions were implemented, lenders would pull out of the guaranteeprogram, thus reducing the amount of credit available for farmers whosefinancial conditions are better than what FmHA deals with, but still weakenough that the lender is requesting a guarantee to continue with the borrower.Many small rural communities depend upon the farmer for their economicwell being and if the commercial lender does not have a guaranteed programto fall back on, the economic conditions in these rural areas will continueto decline. A number of the suggestions are already covered in the presentregulations. Requesting that FmHA participate in a meeting with the lenderand the borrower when the borrower is delinquent is covered under andSection;1980.145 of this subpart. Before this meeting, FmHA will send the lenderand the borrower Attachement 1 to Exhibit D and meet with the lender andthe borrower to discuss the problems and any proposed solutions. The Agencybelieves this meeting provides the lender and the borrower with the necessaryinformation needed if mediation is the next step. Besides, the lender,not FmHA, is responsible for servicing the guaranteed loan. FmHA must concurin any decisions reached by the lender but FmHA does not initiate thesedecisions. Therefore, the lender's participation in the mediation processis necessary, while FmHA's is not. If a State has a mediation program andthe borrower requests that the lender go to mediation, the lender willbe required to do so, since the Agricultural Credit Act of 1987 statesthat the lender shall participate in States with mediation programs. TheAgency agrees with the suggestion that the section specify who in FmHAis responsible for approving any agreements reached by the lender and borroweras a result of mediation. The Agency has amended this section to specifythat the State Director be responsible for approving these agreements.<T3>Section 1980.130 Loan servicing. </T3>This section sets forth the lender'sresponsibilities in servicing guaranteed loans. Several respondents feltthat the requirement in the Administrative portion of this section thatall guaranteed loans be reviewed within 45 days after loan closing wasplacing too much of a burden on FmHA personnel. They suggested this timebe increased to 90 days, and only be required for those guaranteed loanswhich were not previously reviewed. The Agency agrees and amends the proposedrule accordingly. One respondent commented that this section should require that all requestsfor debt write down be approved by the State Director. The also suggestedthat this section set forth the levels of approval required for subsequentrequests for consolidation, rescheduling, reamortization, and deferral.The Agency agrees with this respondent as to requiring State Director approvalof all write downs. The Agency has amended this section to specify thatState Director approval is required for all write downs. The Agency believesthe authority to approve or concur with any deferral, rescheduling, orreamortization should remain with the County Supervisor to allow for timelydecisions to be made so the borrower can continue with the business. TheAgency adopts the proposed rule as changed. One respondent suggested that since this section contains administrativeprocedures and recommendations for the County Supervisor, it should beamended to require the County Supervisor to immediately send Exhibit Dand Attachment 1 of this subpart to the lender and the borrower when thelender notifies the County Supervisor that the borrower is delinquent.The Agency believes this is adequately covered in andSection; 1980.145 ofthis subpart and adopts the proposed rule. In addition to the above changes to the proposed rule the Agency has addedan additional responsibility to the County Supervisor. The County Supervisorwill be required to review the Shared Appreciation Agreement with the lenderat least annually. The addition was made to assure proper compliance withthis agreement.  <T3>Section 1980.136 Protective advances. </T3>This section sets forthguidance regarding the use of protective advances. One respondent commentedthat this section should be modified to more explicitly define costs thatare typically thought of as protective advances. The Agency agrees andhas amended the proposed rule accordingly. Also, it requires the CountySupervisor to approve the requested protective advance in writing. <T3>Section 1980.144 Bankruptcy. </T3>This section provides guidance inthe payment of loss claims when a lender's borrower files for bankruptcyand the lender requests an estimated loss payment. Several respondentscommented that this action was long overdue and would result in additionalutilization of the guaranteed program. One respondent commented that thissection should be clarified to allow existing guaranteed loans to be servicedunder this rule. The Agency has made this optional with the lender in itsamendment to andSection; 1980.67 of Subpart A of this part. Further clarificationis unnecessary. One respondent commented that attorney fees should be anallowable recoverable cost, as the typical lender will remain reluctantto continue with agricultural loans and would continue to push their customersto FmHA insured loans. The Agency does not agree and does not considerattorneys' fees are a valid recoverable costs covered by the guarantee.The guarantee covers loan of principal and interest on a loan. The Agencyadopts the proposed rule as is. Another respondent commented that by only listing specific things a lendermust do to protect their interests in bankruptcy cases, the implicationis given that this is all they will need to do. The list is only a guidelineand the Agency believes that each lender should be able to determine thoseitems which directly affect the borrower's account. The Agency adopts theproposed rule.These same comments are incorporated in Subpart C, ``Emergency LivestockLoans;'' Subpart E, ``Business and Industrial Loan Program;'' and SubpartF, ``Economic Emergency Loans,'' of this part.One respondent was upset because his reorganization plan had been submitted15 months ago and had not been approved by the court. The Agency sympathizeswith the concern of the respondent but has no control over the court orthe timeframe in which the court works.<T3>Section 1980.145 Default by borrower. </T3>This section provides guidanceregarding the actions that will be taken when a borrower defaults on aloan. Several respondents commended that the timeframe of 3 days beforethe scheduled meeting was too short to send Attachment 1 to Exhibit D ofthis subpart to the lender and borrower. It was also suggested that a letterbe prepared confirming the discussion and decisions made, along with allcalculations and documentation used in determining the appropriate actionto take. This letter should be sent to the borrower. It was also suggestedthat a copy of Exhibit D be sent along with notices of the servicing options.The Agency agrees with the timeframe for providing the borrower with areport concerning the determination and decisions made at the meeting andthe sending of Exhibit D. The Agency disagrees as to preparing a noticeto send to the lender and the borrower listing the servicing options available.It is the lender's decision as to what servicing options the lender willemploy to continue with the borrower. The Agency adopts the proposed ruleas changed.<T3>Section 1980.146 Liquidation. </T3>This section provides guidance forthe liquidation of guaranteed Farmer Programs loan/line of credit. Onerespondent commented that FmHA should specify when estimated reports ofloss should be submitted by the lender. It was suggested that if the liquidationis expected to exceed 90 days, an estimated loss claim should be filedand the lender should discontinue interest accrual on the defaulted loanat the time the claim is filed. The Agency agrees except that it believesthat it would be fairer to the lender to discontinue the interest accrualat the time the estimated loss claim is approved, not when it is filed.The Agency adopts the proposed rule as changed.One respondent commented that this section should clarify the approvalauthority of the County Supervisor for loss payments and that the approvalauthority for FmHA to liquidate the account should be at the State level.The Agency agrees and has adopted these changes.One respondent commented that this section requires the lender to obtainFmHA approval of the liquidation plan. The respondent suggested that thissection be amended to provide the borrower an opportunity to appeal FmHA'sdecision to approve the liquidation plan. The Agency disagrees becausethe borrower's loan is with the lender and it is the lender's responsibilityto service it. FmHA merely concurs in the lender's decision. The borroweris not entitled to appeal as the adverse decision was made by the lender,not FmHA.One respondent commented that when choosing to liquidate a guaranteed loan,FmHA must meet all of the requirements for liquidating the guaranteed loanas it would for an insured loan. It was suggested that a reference to SubpartS of Part 1951 of this chapter be included to insure that Attachment 1to Exhibit A of Subpart S of Part 1951 of this chapter, ``Notice of theAvailability of Loan Servicing Programs,'' be sent to these borrowers.Unless the lender assigns its portion of the loan to FmHA, the loan isstill the lender's loan. Only in those cases where the lender would assignits portion of the loan to FmHA and FmHA undertakes servicing of the loanwould the Agency consider the borrower for the servicing actions underthe insured loan regulations. The regulations already listed which FmHAmust follow if it were to liquidate such a loan refer to compliance withSubpart S of Part 1951, so it is unnecessary to list that reference here.The Agency adopts the proposed rule as is.<T3>Section 1980.148 Appeal procedure. </T3>This section provides guidanceas to the method of appealing adverse decisions. One respondent commentedthat this section should be amended to require that both the lender andthe applicant sign letters requesting an appeal before the situation wouldfall under Subpart B of Part 1900 of this chapter. The Agency believesthat Subpart B of Part 1900 of this chapter sufficiently spells out therequirements for appeals. The Agency adopts the proposed rule.<T3>Section 1980.175 Operating loans. </T3>This section sets forth guidancefor the granting of a guarantee to a lender to allow the lender to providecredit to a farm customer for operating purposes.One respondent commented that the applicant should be required to atteston the application form that they will not use the guaranteed loan proceedsto plant, cultivate, grow, produce, harvest, or store a controlled substance.The Agency has incorporated the insured and guaranteed application intoone application, Form FmHA 410-1, ``Request for FmHA Services,'' whichalready contains this statement regarding controlled substances.One respondent commented that in order to receive a guaranteed operatingloan, the borrower must have had training or farming experience in managingand operating a farm or ranch (within one of the last 5 years). They suggestedthat this requirement is an unnecessary restriction as there may be formerfarmers or ranchers who wish to re-enter the agricultural section who havenot had training or actual experience in the farming or ranching operationin the last 5 years. They also suggested that if FmHA had concerns aboutthe applicant having kept up with the more recent farming practices andtheories, it could require the applicant to take courses or study thesetheories as a condition of the loan. The Agency has modified the proposedrule to allow educational or on the job training during one of the pastfive years to be acceptable. The Agency adopts the proposed rule as amended.One respondent commented that paragraph (b)(1)(iv) should be clarifiedregarding character as to past repayment history. The Agency agrees andhas amended this section to provide if a applicant has made an honest attemptto meet the obligations, this will be viewed in the applicant's favor indetermining eligibility. The Agency adopts the proposed rule as amended.One respondent commented that paragraph (b)(2), which contains the eligibilitycriteria for a cooperative, corporation, partnership, and joint operationis confusing. The comment stated that in one instance, where the majorityinterests are related by blood or marriage, that at least one of the membersmust operate the family farm and at the same time the entity must operatethe farm. This is a statutory requirement and the Agency cannot adopt theproposed rule as is.There were several respondents who commented in regards to lines of creditin paragraph (c)(2). One comment suggested the ability to purchase replacementfoundation livestock should be reinstated as it was important that a farmerbe allowed to purchase replacement animals as necessary. The Agency disagrees.To insure the farmer will retain the numbers, one should keep replacements,obtain a Loan Note Guarantee or replace with normal income. Another respondentfelt that one should be allowed, under a line of credit, to pay a creditoras established in paragraph (c)(1)(ix) of this section and also to payprincipal payments on real estate. The Agency does not agree, as the lineof credit is established to pay current operating expenses. Interest chargedmay be considered as a current expense. Section 313 of the ConsolidatedFarm and Rural Development Act prohibits operating loan funds from beingused for land purchase. The Agency adopts the proposed rule.To obtain consistency with the insured regulation, the Agency has amendedparagraph (c)(1)(viii) of this section to increase the amount of operatingfunds for real estate improvements from $7,500 to $15,000 per year, whichis more in line with present costs. The Agency adopts the proposed ruleas changed.One respondent commented that FmHA should use the authority in this sectionto guarantee operating lines of credit for the purpose of refinancing existingoperating debt. Under a line of credit, the lender may refinance operatingdebt that has been incurred for the present crop year only. The regulationscurrently provide for this as long as the security is adequate and a positivecash flow can be developed. The Agency believes that this is in line withthe limited time period for an operating line of credit and does not adoptthe suggestion.Several respondents commented that the deletion of the provision allowingthe lender to charge a one percent higher interest rate than what theycharge to their average farm customer would have an adverse effect on theguaranteed program. There have been cases where some lenders will chargea lower interest rate because of the guarantee. It reduces the lender'srisk and exposure, while increasing the lender's profitability and liquidityif they participate in the secondary market. Another point of view expressedwas that borrowers with guaranteed loans require a greater amount of servicing,thus the lender justifies increasing the rate. There have been times whena lender has obtained a guarantee and the servicing of the account decreases,as the feeling is that if the account does not perform, FmHA will pay forany loss incurred. The Agency believes that by allowing the lender to chargean additional one percent, in many instances it places a greater financialburden on the borrower, thus increasing the possibility of failure. TheAgency adopts the proposed rule.One respondent commented that paragraph (f)(5) should be amended to deletepurchasing feed while crops are being established as an eligible balloonpurpose. The feed cost should always be collected when the livestock issold. The Agency agrees and has amended the proposed rule accordingly.One respondent commented that paragraph (h) of this section should be amendedto insure that where multiple entities own the chattels, a guarantee wouldnot be issued unless all entities guarantee and pledge security for theloan, and that FmHA and the lender would have to concur before any transferof ownership could occur. FmHA agrees and has amended the proposed ruleaccordingly.One respondent commented that the Agency should require the guaranteedborrower to obtain insurance, as applicable, on loan security prior toor at loan closing and that proof of such insurance must be documentedat loan closing. The Agency agrees with the principle behind this commentand will continue to encourage lenders to have guaranteed borrowers obtaininsurance. In those instances where it is apparent that insurance is necessary,the approval official will so indicate by making it a condition for theloan. The Agency adopts the proposed rule.One respondent commented that the last sentence in paragraph (h) shouldbe amended to allow different lien positions on chattels to be consideredas separate and identifiable. The Agency disagrees, as this would allowmixing and matching of security and if a loss claim was ever processed,the security covering the guarantee would be the one that was missing.The Agency adopts the proposed rule.One respondent commented that paragraph (j) should be amended to correspondwith andSection; 1980.180 of this subpart regarding the handling of otherassets which are definitely not needed or used directly in the farmingoperation. The Agency agrees and has amended the proposed rule.One respondent commented that in general it was supportive of this regulation,but additional clarification was needed regarding protecting environmentalresources. One suggestion was that in andSection;andSection; 1980.175, 1980.180and 1980.185 of this subpart, a reference should be made to the ``Memorandumof Understanding Between FmHA and the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service,''to be used as a guide in implementation of the Environmental Program. ExhibitM to Subpart G of Part 1940 covers much more than what this Memorandumof Understanding covers and it would be inappropriate to refer to thatmemorandum in the context of the paragraphs in question. The Agency adoptsthe language proposed in these sections as is. <T3>Section 1980.180 Farm Ownership loans.</T3> This section sets forthguidance for granting a guarantee to a lender to allow a farmer to purchasefarm real estate. One respondent commented that the same concerns should be addressed inthis section as in andSection; 1980.175 of this subpart regarding characterand farm experience. Another respondent commented that for clarification,it would be possible to combine paragraph (b) of andSection; 1980.180 withthe requirements set forth in andSection; 1980.175(b) and andSection; 1980.180(e)(2)and andSection; 1980.185(e)(1) with the requirements set forth in andSection;1980.175(e). The Agency agrees, as this will allow the lender to go toone section for the regulations governing these requirements. The Agencyadopts the proposed rule as amended. One respondent commented that paragraph (f)(2)(i) seems to be excessiveas it requires a mortgage to be taken on the entire farm owned or to beowned by the applicant. The respondent suggested that this paragraph beamended to state, ``A mortgage on the entire farm will not be necessaryif a mortgage on the property to be purchased or refinanced or on whichimprovements will be made with the loan proceeds is given and that mortgageis sufficient to adequately secure the loan.'' Section 307 (7 U.S.C. 1927)states that the Secretary shall take as security for the obligations enteredinto in connection with loans, mortgages on farms with respect to whichsuch loans are made or such other security as the Secretary requires. Aprudent lender would require a mortgage on the total farm and the Agencybelieves the lender should secure the loan with a mortgage on the totalfarm. The Agency adopts the proposed rule.  One respondent commented that paragraph (g)(2)(i) should be amended asit presently allows for the lender to take a mortgage on a borrower's dwellingwhen it is located somewhere other than on the farm. The respondent indicatedthere was no justification for automatically requiring a mortgage on theborrower's dwelliing simply because it is not located on the farm. A mortgageshould only be taken if it is necessary to provide adequate security forthe guaranteed FO loan. The Agency disagrees as it provides additionalsecurity for the loan and, as stated in the regulations, must be locatedclose enough to the farm so the farm may be operated successfully. Takinga mortgage on the dwelling will insure the borrower has a desire to makethe operation a success. <T3>Section 1980.185 Soil and Water loans.</T3> This section provides guidancein the granting of a guarantee to a lender to allow a farmer to obtaina guaranteed Soil and Water loan to encourage and facilitate the improvement,protection, and proper use of farmland. The objectives should help a farmermake needed land-use adjustments and should lessen the impact of adverseweather conditions on farming operations. One respondent commented that this section should be revised to amend thereference to character and experience as indicated in andSection; 1980.175.The Agency amends these paragraphs and has adopted the proposed rule aschanged. One respondent commented that exception authority should be included inthis subpart. This authority is inappropriate for a regulation containingvarious statutory requirements such as eligibility. Therefore, the Agencyis not adopting this suggestion. <T3>Exhibit A to Subpart B_Approved Lender Program/Farm Ownership and Operatingloans.</T3> This section provides guidance for the making and servicingof a guaranteed loan by an Approved Lender. Several respondents commented as to the absence of the Soil and Water programand the requirement that these agreements do not allow the ALP lender tosubmit loans involving subsidy payments under the ALP. The Agency agreesand has revised this section to allow ALP lenders to make soil and waterloans and loans involving subsidy under this section. One respondent suggested that the list of approved lenders be providedto the potential applicant or borrower. The statute states the County Supervisorshall make available to farmers, on request, a list of approved lendersin the area that participate in the FmHA guaranteed loan programs and otherlenders in the area that express a desire to participate in the program.The Agency believes the proposed rule is in accordance with the statuteand thus adopts the proposed rule. One respondent commented on the fact that ALP status will expire at theend of any 2-year period for a FCS member institution not having acceptableloan losses. The concern was that FmHA should be attempting to get a statementfrom the Farm Credit Administration at the end of the normal 2-year periodthat the FCS member institution still maintains an acceptable loan losslevel. The regulation already requires FCA to provide this informationto the Agency. Once this information is received, FmHA notifies its fieldoffices as to those FCS institutions that are eligible. The Agency adoptsthe proposed rule as is. One respondent commented on paragraph II (A)(1)(b)(ii). The respondentsuggested that the requirement as to the 1\1/2\ percent of the lender'stotal loan portfolio or the lender's total loan portfolio of all typesof loans be clarified. The Agency agrees and has amended this requirementto refer to the Agricultural loan portfolio of the lender. The Agency adoptsthe proposed rule as amended. One respondent commented in paragraph II (A)(2)(c) regarding the requirementthat the training for the person designated to process and service guaranteedloans for an ALP lender should read as follows, ``Training in AgriculturalEconomics and/or at least two years agricultural lending experience.''The Agency agrees and has adopted this change to the proposed rule.One respondent commented that the information required by FmHA for approvinga lender for the ALP is usually only background material. The respondentsuggested a more useful document would be to require the lender's auditedfinancial statements or its most recent quarterly submission file, Reportof Condition and Income. The Agency agrees and has adopted the change torequire the Report of Condition and Income in the optional criteria foundin paragraph II A(2)(d) of Exhibit A. The Agency adopts the proposed ruleas changed.One respondent commented that, if the cash flow statement that a lendernormally uses does not list at least a debt repayment source and breakdownof income, this information should be required. When this was provided,it greatly expedited the processing of the ALP applications. The Agencyagrees and has amended paragraph III A of the proposed rule to ask fora statement similar to item 28 of the Request for Loan Note Guarantee.One respondent commented on the need to be sure that paragraph IV of ExhibitA, Attachments 1 and 2, contain the language that allows Farm Credit Systemboard members to obtain an FmHA guarantee under certain circumstances.The Agency agrees and has revised these paragraphs accordingly.One respondent commented as to the ability to modify Attachments 1 and2 to allow for an extension of less than 2 years and to provide guidanceas to when a new ALP agreement is needed. Paragraph XVII of these agreementsprovides the guidance as to when an agreement is needed. The Agency doesnot understand why a lender would request an extension of less than 2 years.The Agency adopts the proposed regulation.<T3>Exhibit D Interest Rate Buydown Program. </T3>This section providesguidance on the issuance of a buydown of interest to a lender whose borrowercannot meet a repayment schedule due to interest cost. Several commentswere received  on  cash  flow  projections,  24-month cash flows, needfor additional cash flows following initial cash flows, and projected financialstatements.The requirement for a 24-month cash flow is statutory. The other commentswere addressed and projected financial statements deleted. The word typicalwas added to 24-month cash flow in order   to  avoid  judging  feasibility of  3-year buydowns on transition cash flows. Several comments were receivedabout the need for interest rate buydowns for loans longer than 3 years.The law only provides for one buydown per loan at a time and only allowsfor the maximum period for a buydown to be three years.A comment was received to clarify the .25 percent increments on buydownin paragraph IV I. The Agency has done so. A comment was received on deletingnon-essential assets requirement from buydown, as experience has shownsome problem areas. The Agency added it back to the Exhibit, but confinedthe requirement to nonfarm non-essential assets. The Agency adopts theproposed rule as amended.<T3>Exhibit E_Demonstration Project for Purchase of Certain Farm CreditSystem Acquired Farm Land. </T3>This exhibit provides guidance for theoperation of the program between FmHA and the Farm Credit System. A commentwas received stating all lenders should be eligible to sell acquired propertyunder this Exhibit. The statute limits the property to property owned byFarm Credit System Organizations; thus, the Agency cannot change this languageof the proposed rule. A comment was received about the inconsistency ofthe title and the language in the body of the exhibit. The Agency has reconciledthe language differences. A comment was received on the use of the preliminaryapplications and dropping the use of suitability, ratios, and amount ofcash flow needed to be feasible. The Agency aligned the exhibit to moreclosely follow the preliminary procedure in andSection; 1980.113 of thissubpart, dropped the paragraph on ratios, dropped the word suitable, andadjusted needed cash flow, to allow for a cash flow from 100 percent to110 percent once the buydown is in effect.One respondent commented as to the ability of ALP lenders to use theirforms for the demonstration project. The Agency changed its requirementsto authorize ALP lenders to use their own forms.One respondent commented that an eligible borrower should be able to buyfarms at auction. It would be extremely difficult to help farmers buy landat auctions through use of guaranteed loans. The Agency does not adoptthis suggestion.A comment was received concerning publicizing the availability of farmsand projects. An agreement between FmHA and Farm Credit District Bankshas been developed to cover joint responsibilities in this area. This effortwill be coordinated between the State Director and the FCS district wherethe demonstration program is available to ensure that inventory land isavailable.One respondent was concerned about lenders passing on the interest ratereduction of 4 percentage points to the borrower. This has been coveredin Form FmHA 1980-58, ``Interest Rate Buydown Agreement,'' rather thanin the exhibit itself.A comment was received on criteria that would be used to determine feasibility.The concern was that the County Supervisor and the applicant would notbe able to determine feasibility. Feasibility requirements are the onesestablished in this subpart for all guaranteed loans except for those specialchanges as set forth in this Exhibit.Several respondents commented on the term ``positive cash flow.'' The concernwas the window of eligibility is very small, as a less than positive cashflow is required to get the interest assistance, but a positive cashflow(at least 110%) is required after the interest assistance is considered.The Agency agrees and has amended the proposed rule to allow borrowersto have a positive cash flow after the interest assistance is granted from100 to 110 percent. The proposed rule is adopted as amended.One respondent commented, regarding loans to purchase inventory propertyof the Farm Credit System, FCS should comply with various environmentalrequirements found in FmHA regulations such as those governing conservationeasements. The Agency disagrees. These requirements do not apply in thesecases, as the inventory property is in the possession of the Farm CreditSystem, not FmHA. However, both the lender and the borrower must agreeto comply with various other environmental requirements found in SubpartG of Part 1940 of this chapter before FmHA will issue a guarantee.Lender Agreements_Form FmHA 449-35 ``Lender's Agreement,'' Form FmHA 1980-38``Lender's Agreement (Line of Credit),'' ``Lender's Agreement (Loan NoteGuarantee Only),'' and ``Lender's Agreement (Operating Line of Credit Guarantee)for Approved Lenders.''  These agreements set forth guidance for lenders who are involved in boththe regular guaranteed program and the approved lender program.  Several comments were received on making regulations and forms conformwith each other requiring Finance Loan Status reports. The Agency agreesand has incorporated this aspect wherever possible.  <T3>Form FmHA 449-35, ``Lender's Agreement,'' Paragraph XI K.</T3> A commentwas received about making payment within 30 days after completion of reviewversus the existing 60-day requirement. The Agency agrees and adopts thisproposal.  <T3>Form FmHA 449-35, ``Lender's Agreement,'' Paragraph I E 2.</T3> A commentwas received regarding why the Agency had 30 days to submit Report of Lossto Finance Office after the report of loss estimate had been approved.The Agency deleted the 30-day phrase and has revised the proposed ruleaccordingly.  Several respondents commented regarding paragraph IX of Forms FmHA 449-35and 1980-38 and suggested the lender should be required to inspect collateralat least annually and persons having a partial ownership should providea personal guarantee.  Section 1980.108 requires personal guarantees routinely and they must beobtained unless waived by the Agency. Paragraph IX of the forms requireinspecting the collateral as often as is necessary to service the collateral.Bare farmland may not require an annual visit, whereas in other cases avisit might be needed monthly. The Agency did not adopt these suggestionsas it feels the regulations adequately address these concerns.  Comments were received on Forms FmHA 449-35 and 1980-38, paragraph XI,stating a reasonable period of time for curing default should be specificallyidentified. Different circumstances would dictate different time tables,which would vary when trying to determine what is reasonable. Therefore,the agency did not choose to set a specific time table for all cases. TheAgency adopts the proposed rule as is.  Additionally, a comment was received stating a lender should submit anestimated Forms FmHA 449-30, ``Report of Loss,'' when liquidation is expectedto take a long time, in order to stop the accrual of interest. The Agencyhas amended the proposed rule advising lenders they will file an estimatedloss if it will take over 90 days to liquidate the security.  An additional comment stated that interest should stop accruing within90 days of acceleration. This is not always possible as there are timeswhere it will take longer than 90 days to liquidate the security, whichis beyond the lender's control. The Agency is not changing its statementthat accruing interest is covered, provided the lender proceeds expeditiouslywith the approved liquidation plan. The Agency adopts the proposed ruleas is.  An additional comment was received about release of liability when a guaranteedborrower transfers the loan. The suggestion was that paragraph XV of FormsFmHA 449-35 and 1980-38 should be revised to require FmHA approval of therelease. Section 1980.123(f) requires FmHA written concurrence. The Agencybelieves the current regulations adequately address this concern.  A comment was received recommending that the ALP lender's agreements mustbe conformed to allow the same application of regulations when applicable.Therefore, the agency is conforming paragraph IV of both ALP lender agreementsto paragraph V of Forms FmHA 449-35 and 1980-38.  One comment was received recommending that Forms FmHA 449-35 and 1980-38be combined and also both ALP lender agreements. Form FmHA 1980-38 dealswith lines of credit unlike Form 449-35 which deals with fixed loans. Also,Form FmHA 1980-38 is used with Subparts C and F of Part 1980 and, therefore,cannot be combined at this time as this would necessitate extensive revisionsof those regulations. This suggestion has merit and will be consideredat a later date.  One comment was received requesting some lender discretion on loaning fornonguaranteed short-term operating without FmHA concurrence on each request,which is now prohibited by paragraph XIII of Forms FmHA 449-35 and 1980-38.The Agency has modified this paragraph.A comment was received that Forms FmHA 449-35 and 1980-38 should addressthe guarantee of protective advances. The guarantee of protective advancesis covered on the Forms FmHA 449-34 and 1980-27. The Agency believes thisadequately covers the subject. A comment was received on paragraph IX C 2 stating the holder could possiblydeny the reamortization, renewal, or rescheduling of the guaranteed portionof the loan. When a loan is sold on the secondary market the holder hascertain rights. It must be pointed out that the lender has the abilityto buy back a loan from the holder, if needed, to properly service theloan. A comment was received on paragraph X A of Forms FmHA 449-35 and 1980-38stating FmHA should list the write down of principal and interest as actionwhich can be done to resolve a default status. The Agency has added thewrite down option to the paragraph. A further comment was received on paragraph X B of the same forms aboutincluding FmHA as negotiating in good faith. The real test of good faithis between the lender and the borrower. If they can come to an agreementand the restructuring of the loan is within the scope of the regulations,the Agency will work with the lender in staying with the borrower. Theability for the lender to write down a guaranteed loan provides anothertool for the lender to continue with the borrower. The Agency adopts theproposed rule. A comment was received on paragraph X of Forms FmHA 449-35 and 1980-38concerning the borrower's appeal rights regarding denial of servicing actions.The refusal by FmHA to concur in a lender's proposed servicing action isnot appealable by the borrower alone, as the party directly affected isthe lender. Both the borrower and the lender would have to join in anyappeal.A further comment was received on paragraph XI B stating that FmHA concurrenceon a lender's liquidation is appealable. FmHA is not making an adversedecision and the lender's decision is not appealable under FmHA's administrativeappeal procedure. The FmHA did not make the loan and has only issued aguarantee. Only adverse decisions which FmHA makes are appealable underSubpart B of Part 1900 of this chapter. It should be further noted that there are very few circumstances whereFmHA ever purchases the entire guaranteed loan. Utilizing the insured loanliquidation procedures, as one commentator suggested, is not applicableunless the lender would assign its portion of the loan to FmHA and then,and only then, would the loan be treated under Subpart S of Part 1951 ofthis chapter. One commentator suggested paragraph XI K of Forms FmHA 449-35 and 1980-38should clarify loss. All of paragraph XI refers to loss when liquidating,and Form FmHA 449-30 is the ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss.'' TheAgency adopts the proposed rule. One lender commented on the need for a subsection on bankruptcy and loanwrite down in lender's agreements. The Agency had previously published proposed rules on bankruptcy in the<T4>Federal Register </T4>on May 7, 1988, and received comments which werepositive. All lender's agreements have paragraphs added to them to coverboth items. <ITAG tagnum="84">General Comments </ITAG>One respondent was concerned that there was no mention of Section 711,``Improvement of Secondary Market Operations for Loans Guaranteed by theFarmers Home Administration'' in this proposed rule. This section of thelaw provides guidance to the Agency in the continued development of a secondarymarket for guaranteed loans. It allows for the Secretary to directly, orthrough a market maker, issue pool certificates representing ownershipof part or all of the guaranteed portion of any loan guaranteed by theSecretary under this title and the process of servicing guaranteed loansthat are sold on the secondary market. Due to the complexity of the requirementthe Agency has determined that this requirement will be issued under aseparate regulation which will be published in the near future as a proposedrule for public comment. One respondent commented that the proposed rule did not reference Section625, ``Sense of Congress Regarding Guaranteed Loan Program.'' This sectionencouraged the Secretary to issue guarantees for loans under the ConsolidatedFarm and Rural Development Act, to the maximum extent practical to assisteligible borrowers whose loans are restructured by institutions of theFarm Credit System, commercial banks, insurance companies, and other lendinginstitutions. The Agency believes that with the past emphasis placed onthe guaranteed program that the agricultural lenders who wish to participatein the program are knowledgeable about the program. The Agency has used``Operation Assist'' as a means by which FmHA assisted current FmHA borrowersto apply for guarantees with local lenders. This program resulted in 2533guaranteed loans with a value of $181.9 million being made this past springwhich otherwise would have resulted in insured loans. A number of lendershave backed off of agricultural-type loans due to past experience of havingto charge off a number of agricultural loans. As the farm economy improves,lenders will move back into agricultural lending and the Agency believesthe effort it has put forth over the past couple of years will insure thecontinued growth of the guaranteed program. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 7 CFR Part 1980 </ITAG>Agriculture, Loan program_Agriculture.Accordingly Chapter XVIII, Title 7, of the Code of Federal Regulationsis amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1980_GENERAL</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 1980 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>7 U.S.C. 1989; 42 U.S.C. 1480; 5 U.S.C. 301; 7 CFR2.23 and 2.70.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General</ITAG>2. Section 1980.6 is amended by revising the definition of ``borrower''in paragraph (a) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions and abbreviations.</ITAG>(a) * * *<T3>Borrower. </T3>(Bandamp;I and RH loans only). All parties liable forthe loan or any part thereof. For Farmer Programs loans, see andSection;1980.106(b)(4) of Subpart B of this part for the definition of borrower.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>3. Section 1980.13 is amended by revising paragraph (b) introductory textto read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.13 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligible lenders.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) <T3>An eligible lender is</T3>: Any Federal or State chartered bank, FarmCredit Bank, other Farm Credit System Institution with direct lending authority,Bank for Cooperatives, Savings and Loan Association, Building and LoanAssociation, mortgage company that is a part of a bank-holding company,or an insurance company that is regulated by the National Association ofInsurance Commissioners. For Farmer Program loans, an Agricultural CreditCorporation which is a subsidiary of any Federal or State chartered bankis an eligible lender. The above entities must be subject to credit examinationand supervision by either an agency of the United States or a State. (Creditunions that are subject to credit examination and supervision by eitherthe National Credit Union Administration or a State agency are eligiblelenders only for Farmer Program guaranteed loans). Only those lenders listedin this paragraph are eligible to make and service guaranteed loans andsuch lenders must be in good standing with their licensing authority andhave met licensing, loan making, loan servicing, and other requirementsof the State in which the collateral will be located, and the loan makingand/or loan servicing office requirements in paragraph (b)(3) of this section.A lender must have the capability to adequately service the loan for whicha guarantee is requested.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>4. Section 1980.20 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Loan guarantee limits.</ITAG>(a) Lenders and applicants will propose the percentage of guarantee. Lendersand applicants will be advised in writing on Form FmHA 449-14 by FmHA ofany percentage of guarantee less than proposed by the lender and applicant,and the reasons therefor. (See andSection; 1980.80 of this subpart regardingappeals.) The maximum percentage of guarantee (as opposed to the maximumloss covered by the guarantee) on a Business and Industrial loan is definedin andSection; 1980.420 of Subpart E of this part. The maximum percentageof guarantee for all other loans covered by this section will be 90 percent.Also, except in regards to D andamp; D Guaranteed loans (See Subpart E ofthis part), the maximum loss covered by the Loan Note Guarantee, Form FmHA449-34 or Form FmHA 1980-27, ``Contract of Guarantee (Line of Credit),''can never exceed the lesser of:(1) The percentage of guarantee of principal and interest indebtednessas evidenced by said note(s) or by assumption agreement(s), any loan subsidydue, and the percentage of guarantee of principal and interest indebtednesson secured protective advances for protection and preservation of collateralmade with FmHA's authorization; or(2) The percentage of guarantee of the principal advanced to or assumedby the borrower under said note(s) or assumption agreement(s) and any interestdue (including any loan subsidy) thereon.(b) FmHA will determine the percentage of guarantee after considering allcredit factors involved, including but not limited to:(1) <T3>Applicant's management. </T3>The applicant's management, and when appropriate,equity capital, history of operation, marketing plan, raw material requirements,and availability of necessary supporting utilities and services.(2) <T3>Collateral. </T3>Collateral for the loan.(3) <T3>Financial condition. </T3>Financial condition of applicant or applicant'sprincipals if appropriate.(4) <T3>Lender's exposure. </T3>The lender's exposure before and after theloan.(5) <T3>Trends and conditions. </T3>Current trends and economic conditions.5. Section 1980.22 is amended by revising paragraph (a) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.22 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Charges and fees by lender.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Routine charges and fees. </T3>The lender may establish the chargesand fees for the loan, provided they are the same as those charged otherapplicants for similar types of transactions. ``Similar types of transactions''means those transactions involving the same type of loan requested forwhich a non-guaranteed loan applicant would be assessed charges and fees.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>6. Section 1980.40 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1980.40 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Environmental requirements.</ITAG>The need for an Environmental Impact Statement (EIS) will be determinedby the FmHA approval official. The determination will be based upon FmHA'sreview of Form FmHA 1940-20, ``Request for Environmental Information,''when required as set forth in Subpart G of Part 1940 of this chapter andother agency comments or other information available. If an EIS is necessary,applicants and lenders will be required to provide essential data for usein its preparation. FmHA State Directors will coordinate preparation andprocessing of any required EIS. If joint financing for the proposal isinvolved, the lead agency will be responsible for preparation of the EIS.In all cases, FmHA is responsible for assuring that the requirements ofsection 102(2)(c) of the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (NEPA),and Subpart G of Part 1940 of this chapter are met.7. Section 1980.41 is amended by revising paragraph (a) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1980.41 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Equal opportunity and nondiscrimination requirements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Equal Credit Opportunity Act. </T3>In accordance with Title V of Pub.L. 93-495, the Equal Credit Opportunity Act, with respect to any aspectof a credit transaction, neither the lender nor FmHA will discriminateagainst any applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin,age, sex, martial status or physical/mental handicap providing the applicantcan execute a legal contract. The lender will comply with the requirementsof this Act as set forth in the Federal Reserve Board's Regulation implementingthis Act. (See 12 CFR Part 202.) Such compliance will be accomplished priorto loan closing.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1980.68 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated from andSection;1980.67]</ITAG>8. Section 1980.67 is redesignated as andSection;1980.68 and a new andSection;1980.67is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1980.67 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bankruptcy.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Reference. </T3>Refer to Subparts B, C, E, or F of this part. FormFmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss,'' will be used for calculationsof all estimated and final loss determinations. Payments will be made inaccordance with applicable FmHA regulations.(b) <T3>Lender's option. </T3>If a lender has made a loan or line of creditguaranteed by FmHA under previous regulations, and the borrower has filedfor protection under a reorganization bankruptcy, the lender has the optionof requesting an estimated loss payment under the provisions of this part.9. Section 1980.85 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1980.85 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exception authority.</ITAG>The Administrator may in individual cases make an exception to any requirementor provision of this subpart which is not inconsistent with the authorizingstatute or other applicable law, or opinion of the Comptroller General,provided the Administrator determines that application of the requirementor provision would adversely affect the Government's interest. Requestsfor exception, must be in writing by the State Director and submitted throughthe appropriate Assistant Administrator. Requests must be supported withdocumentation to explain the adverse effect on the Government's interest,propose alternative courses of action, and show how the adverse effectwill be eliminated or minimized if the exception is granted. In addition,any request for an exception to andSection;1980.13(b) of this subpart mustdocument that the lender involved has furnished acceptable evidence ofregulation and supervision.10. Appendix B to Subpart A is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix B to Subpart A_Lender's Agreement \1\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Public reporting burden for this collection of informationis estimated to average 1\1/2\ hours per response, including the time forreviewing instructions, searching existing data sources, gathering andmaintaining the data needed, and completing and reviewing the collectionof information. Send comments regarding this burden estimate or any otheraspect of this collection of information, including suggestions for reducingthis burden to, Department of Agriculture, Clearance Officer, OIRM, Room404-W, Washington, D.C. 20250; and to the Office of Management and Budget,Paperwork Reduction Project (OMB No. 0575-0024), Washington, D.C. 20503.<ITAG tagnum="74">USDA-FmHA</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Form FmHA 449-35</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Rev. 1-89)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">FORM APPROVED</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">OMB. NO. 0575-0024</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Type of Loan:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Applicable 7 CFR</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Part 1980 Subpart</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">FmHA Loan Ident. No.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20"/><T2>XXXXXXXXXXXXX</T2> (Lender of<ITAG tagnum="20"/><T2>XXXXXXXXX</T2> has made a loan(s) to<ITAG tagnum="20"/><T2>XXXXXXXXXXXXXX</T2>(Borrower)<ITAG tagnum="20"/><T2>XXX</T2>in the principal amount of $<T2>XXXXXX</T2><ITAG tagnum="20"/><T2>XXXXXXXXXXX</T2>as evidenced by<ITAG tagnum="20"/><T2>XXXXXXXX</T2>note(s) (include Bond<ITAG tagnum="20">as appropriate) described as follows:__</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="20">The United States of America, acting through Farmers Home Administration(FmHA) has entered into a ``Loan Note Guarantee'' (Form FmHA 449-34) orhas issued a ``Conditional Commitment for Guarantee'' (Form FmHA 449-14)to enter into a Loan Note Guarantee with the Lender applicable to suchloan to participate in a percentage of any loss on the loan not to exceed</ITAG><T2>XXX</T2>% of the amount of the principal advance and any interest (includingany loan subsidy) thereon. The terms of the Loan Note Guarantee are controlling.In order to facilitate the marketability of the guaranteed portion of theloan and as a condition for obtaining a guarantee of the loan(s), the Lenderenters into this agreement.<ITAG tagnum="20">THE PARTIES AGREE:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">I. The maximum loss covered under the Loan Note Guarantee will notexceed </ITAG><T2>XXX</T2> percent of the principal and accrued interest including anyloan subsidy on the above indebtedness.<ITAG tagnum="20">II. Full Faith and Credit. The Loan Note Guarantee constitutes anobligation supported by the full faith and credit of the United Statesand is incontestable except for fraud or misrepresentation of which theLender has actual knowledge at the time it became such Lender or whichLender participates in or condones. Any note which provides for the paymentof interest on interest shall not be guaranteed. Any Loan Note Guaranteeor Assignment Guarantee Agreement attached to or relating to a note whichprovides for payment of interest on interest is void.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Loan Note Guarantee will be unenforceable by the Lender to theextent any loss is occasioned by violation of usury laws, negligent servicing,or failure to obtain the required security regardless of the time at whichFmHA acquires knowledge of the foregoing. Any losses will be unenforceableby the Lender to the extent that loan funds are used for purposes otherthan those specifically approved by FmHA in its Conditional Commitmentfor Guarantee. Negligent servicing is defined as the failure to performthose services which a reasonably prudent Lender would perform in servicingits own portfolio of loans that are not guaranteed. The term includes notonly the concept of a failure to act but also not acting in a timely manneror acting in a manner contrary to the manner in which a reasonably prudentlender would act up to the time of loan maturity or until a final lossis paid.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">III. Lender's Sale or Assignment of Guarantee Loan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The Lender may retain all of the guaranteed loan. The Lender isnot permitted to sell or participate any amount of the guaranteed or unguaranteedportion(s) of the loan(s) to the applicant or Borrower or members of theirimmediate families, their officers, directors, stockholders, other owners,or any parent, subsidiary or affilate. If the Lender desires to marketall or part of the guaranteed portion of the loan at or subsequent to loanclosing, such loan must not be in default as set forth in the terms ofthe notes. The Lender may proceed under the following options:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Assignment. </T3>Assign all or part of the guaranteed portion of theloan to one or more Holders by using Form FmHA 449-36, ``Assignment GuaranteeAgreement.'' Holder(s), upon written notice to Lender and FmHA, may reassignthe unpaid guaranteed portion of the loan sold thereunder. Upon such notificationthe assignee shall succeed to all rights and obligations of the Holder(s)thereunder. If this option is selected, the Lender may not at a later datecause to be issued any additional notes.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Multi-Note System. </T3>When this option is selected by the Lender,upon disposition the Holder will receive one of the Borrower's executednotes and Form FmHA 449-34, ``Loan Note Guarantee'' attached to the Borrower'snote. However, all rights under the security instruments (including personaland/or corporate guarantees) will remain with the Lender and in all casesinsure to its and the Government's benefit notwithstanding any contraryprovisions of state law.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. <T3>At Loan Closing: </T3>Provide for no more than 10 notes, unless theBorrower and FmHA agree otherwise, for the guaranteed portion and one notefor the unguaranteed portion. When this option is selected, FmHA will providethe Lender with a Form FmHA 449-34, for each of the notes.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. <T3>After Loan Closing:</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Upon written approval by FmHA, the Lender may cause to be issueda series of new notes, not to exceed the total provided in 2.a. above,as replacement for previously issued guaranteed note(s) provided:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) The Borrower agrees and executes the new notes.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) The interest rate does not exceed the interest rate in effectwhen the loan was closed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) The maturity of the loan is not changed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) FmHA will not bear any expenses that may be incurred in referenceto such reissue of notes.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) There is adequate collateral securing the note(s).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) No intervening liens have arisen or have been perfected and thesecured lien priority remains the same.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) FmHA will issue the appropriate Loan Note Guarantees to be attachedto each of the notes then extant in exchange for the original Loan NoteGuarantee which will be cancelled by FmHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Participations.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. The Lender may obtain participation in its loan under its normaloperating procedures. Participation means a sale of an interest in theloan wherein the Lender retains the note, collateral securing the note,and all responsibility for loan servicing and liquidation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The Lender is required to hold in its own portfolio or retain aminimum of 10% of Farmer Programs loans and 5% for Business and IndustryProgram loans of the total guaranteed loan(s) amount. The amount requiredto be retained must be of the unguaranteed portion of the loan and cannotbe participated to another. The Lender may sell the remaining amount ofthe unguaranteed portion of the loan, except for Farmer Program loans,only through participation. However, the Lender will always retain theresponsibility for loan servicing and liquidation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. When a guaranteed portion of a loan is sold by the Lender to aHolder(s), the Holder(s) shall thereupon succeed to all rights of Lenderunder the Loan Note Guarantee to the extent of the portion of the loanpurchased. Lender will remain bound to all the obligations under the LoanNote Guarantee, and this agreement, and the FmHA program regulations foundin the applicable Subpart of Title 7 CFR Part 1980, and to future FmHAprogram regulations not inconsistent with the express provisions hereof.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. The Holder(s) upon written notice to the Lender may resell theunpaid guaranteed portion of the loan sold under provision III A.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IV. The Lender agrees loan funds will be used for the purposes authorizedin the applicable Subpart of Title 7 CFR Part 1980 and in accordance withthe terms of Form FmHA 449-14.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">V. The Lender certifies that none of its officers or directors stockholdersor other owners (except stockholders in a Farm Credit Bank or other FarmCredit System Institution with direct lending authority that have normalstockshare requirements for participation) has a substantial financialinterest in the Borrower. The Lender certifies that neither the Borrowernor its officers or directors stockholders or other owners has a substantialfinancial interest in the Lender. If the Borrower is a member of the boardof directors or an officer of a Farm Credit Bank or other Farm Credit SystemInstitution with direct lending authority, the Lender certifies that anFCS institution on the next highest level will independently process theloan request and will act as the Lender's agent in servicing the account.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VI. The Lender certifies that it has no knowledge of any materialadverse change, financial or otherwise, in the Borrower, Borrower's business,or any parent, subsidiaries, or affiliates since it requested a Loan NoteGuarantee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VII. Lender certifies that a loan agreement and/or loan instrumentsconcurred in by FmHA has been or will be signed with the Borrower.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VIII. Lender certifies it has paid the required guarantee fee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IX. Servicing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The Lender will service the entire loan and will remain mortgageeand/or secured party of record, not withstanding the fact that anothermay hold a portion of the loan. The entire loan will be secured by thesame security with equal lien priority for the guaranteed and unguaranteedportions of the loan. Lender may charge Holder a servicing fee. The unguaranteedportion of a loan will not be paid first nor given any preference or priorityover the guaranteed portion of the loan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. Disposition of the guaranteed portion of a loan may be made priorto full disbursement, completion of construction and acquisitions onlywith the prior written approval of FmHA. Subsequent to full disbursement,completion of construction, and acquisition, the guaranteed portion ofthe loan may be disposed of as provided herein.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">It is the Lender's responsibility to see that all construction isproperly planned before any work proceeds; that any required permits, licensesor authorizations are obtained from the appropriate regulatory agencies;that the Borrower has obtained contracts through acceptable procurementprocedures; that periodic inspections during construction are made andthat FmHA's concurrence on the overall development schedule is obtained.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. Lender's servicing responsibilities include, but are not limitedto:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Obtaining compliance with the covenants and provisions in the note,loan agreement, security instruments, and any supplemental agreements andnotifying in writing FmHA and the Borrower of any violations. None of theaforesaid instruments will be altered without FmHA's prior written concurrence.The Lender must service the loan in a reasonable and prudent manner.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Receiving all payments on principal and interest (including anyloan subsidy) on the loan as they fall due and promptly remitting and accountingto any Holder(s) of their pro rata share thereof determined according totheir respective interests in the loan, less only Lender's servicing fee.The loan may be reamortized, renewed, rescheduled or (for Farmer Ownership,Soil and Water, and Operating loans only) written down only with agreementof the Lender and Holder(s) of the guaranteed portion of the loan and onlywith FmHA's written concurrence.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Inspecting the collateral as often as necessary to properly servicethe loan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Assuring that adequate insurance is maintained. This includes hazardinsurance obtained and maintained with a loss payable clause in favor ofthe Lender as the mortgagee or secured party.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Assuring that: taxes, assessment or ground rents against or affectingcollateral are paid; the loan and collateral are protected in foreclosure,bankruptcy, receivership, insolvency, condemnation, or other litigation,insurance loss payments, condemnation awards, or similar proceeds are appliedon debts in accordance with lien priorities on which the guarantee wasbased, or to rebuilding or otherwise acquiring needed replacement collateralwith the written approval of FmHA; proceeds from the sale or other dispositionof collateral are applied in accordance with the lien priorities on whichthe guarantee is based, except that proceeds from the disposition of collateral,such as machinery, equipment, furniture or fixtures, may be used to acquireproperty of similar nature in value up to $___ without written concurrenceof FmHA; the Borrower complies with all laws and ordinances applicableto the loan, the collateral and or operating of the farm, business or industry.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Assuring that if personal or corporate guarantees are part of thecollateral, current financial statements from such loan guarantors willbe obtained and copies provided to FmHA at such time and frequency as requiredby the loan agreement or Conditional Commitment for Guarantee. In the caseof guarantees secured by collateral, assuring the security is properlymaintained.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Obtaining the lien coverage and lien priorities specified by theLender and agreed to by FmHA, properly recording or filing lien or noticeinstruments to obtain or maintain such lien priorities during the existenceof the guarantee by FmHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. Assuring that the Borrower obtains marketable title to the collateral.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. Assuring that the Borrower (any party liable) is not released fromliability for all or any part of the loan, except in accordance with FmHAregulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. Providing FmHA Finance Office with loan status reports semiannuallyas of June 30 and December 31 on Form FmHA 1980-41, ``Guaranteed Loan StatusReport.'' For Farm Ownership, Soil and Water, and Operating loans, FormFmHA 1980-41 will only be submitted annually as of December 31.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. Obtaining from the Borrower periodic financial statements underthe following schedule:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Lender is responsible for analyzing the financial statements, takingany servicing actions and providing copies of statements and record ofactions to the FmHA office immediately responsible for the loan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12. Monitoring the use of loan funds to assure they will not be usedfor any purpose that will contribute to excessive erosion of highly erodibleland or to the conversion of wetlands to produce an agricultural commodity,as further explained in 7 CFR Part 1940, Subpart G, Exhibit M.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. If a Farm Ownership, Soil and Water or Operating loan is involvedthe Lender shall participate in any farm credit mediation program of astate in accordance with the rules of that system and 7 CFR Part 1980,Subpart B, andSection; 1980.126.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">X. Default.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The Lender will notify FmHA when a Borrower is thirty (30) days(90 days for guaranteed rural housing loan) past due on a payment or ifthe Borrower has not met its responsibilities of providing the requiredfinancial statements to the Lender or is otherwise in default. The Lenderwill notify FmHA of the status of a Borrower's default on Form FmHA 1980-44,``Guaranteed Loan Borrower Default Status.'' A meeting will be arrangedby the Lender with the Borrower and FmHA to resolve the problem. Actionstaken by the Lender with written concurrence of FmHA will include but arenot limited to the following or any combination thereof:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Deferment of principal payments (subject to rights of any Holder(s)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. An additional temporary loan by the Lender to bring the accountcurrent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Reamortization of or rescheduling the payments on the loan (subjectto rights of any Holder(s)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Transfer and assumption of the loan in accordance with the applicableSubpart of Title 7 CFR Part 1980.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Reorganization.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Liquidation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Subsequent loan guarantees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. Changes in interest rates with FmHA's, Lender's, and the Holder'(s)approval; provided, such interest rate is adjusted proportionally betweenthe guaranteed and unguaranteed portion of the loan and the type of rateremains the same.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. Principal and interest write down in accordance with 7 CFR Part1980, Subpart B, andSection; 1980.125.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The Lender will negotiate in good faith in an attempt to resolveany problem to permit the Borrower to cure a default, where reasonable.In the case of Farm Ownership, Soil and Water, or Operating Loans, theLender agrees that if liquidation of the account becomes imminent, theLender will consider the Borrower for an Interest Rate Buydown under ExhibitC of Subpart B of 7 CFR, Part 1980, and request a determination of theBorrower's eligibility by FmHA. The Lender may not initiate foreclosureaction on the loan until 60 days after a determination has been made withrespect to the eligibility of the Borrower to participate in the InterestRate Buydown Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. The Lender has the option to repurchase the unpaid guaranteed portionof the loan from the Holder(s) within 30 days of written demand by theHolder(s) when: (a) the Borrower is in default not less than 60 days inpayment of principal or interest due on the loan or (b) the Lender hasfailed to remit to the Holder(s) its pro rata share of any payment madeby the Borrower or any loan subsidy within 30 days of its receipt thereof.The repurchase by the Lender will be for an amount equal to the unpaidguaranteed portion of the principal and accured interest less the Lender'sservicing fee. The loan note guarantee will not cover the note interestto the Holder on the guaranteed loan(s) accuring after 90 days from thedate of the demand letter to the Lender requesting the repurchase. Holder(s)will concurrently send a copy of demand to FmHA. The Lender will acceptan assignment without recourse from the Holder(s) upon repurchase. TheLender is encouraged to repurchase the loan to facilitate the accountingfor funds, resolve the problem, and to permit the borrower to cure thedefault, where reasonable. The Lender will notify the Holder(s) and FmHAof its decision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. If Lender does not repurchase as provided by paragraph C, FmHAwill purchase from Holder(s) the unpaid principal balance of the guaranteedportion herein together with accrued interest (including any loan subsidy)to date of repurchase, within 30 days after written demand to FmHA fromthe Holder(s). The loan note guarantee will not cover the note interestto the Holder on the guaranteed loan(s) accruing after 90 days from thedate of original demand letter of the Holder(s) to the Lender requestingthe repurchase. Such demand will include a copy of the written demand madeupon the Lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Holder(s) or its duly authorized agent will also include evidenceof its right to require payment from FmHA. Such evidence will consist ofeither the originals of the Loan Note Guarantee and note properly endorsedto FmHA or the original of the Assignment Guarantee Agreement properlyassigned to FmHA without recourse including all rights, title, and interestin the loan. FmHA will be subrogated to all rights of Holder(s). The Holder(s)will include in its demand the amount due including unpaid principal, unpaidinterest (including any loan subsidy) to date of demand and interest subsequentlyaccruing from date of demand to proposed payment date. Unless otherwiseagreed to by FmHA, such proposed payment will not be later than 30 daysfrom the date of the demand.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The FmHA office serving the Borrower will promptly notify the Lenderof the Holder'(s) demand for payment. The Lender will promptly providethe FmHA office servicing the Borrower with the information necessary forFmHA's determination of the appropriate amount due the Holder(s). Any discrepancybetween the amount claimed by the Holder(s) and the information submittedby the Lender must be resolved before payment will be approved. FmHA willnotify both parties who must resolve the conflict before payment by FmHAwill be approved. Such a conflict will suspend the running of the 30 daypayment requirement. Upon receipt of the appropriate information, the FmHAoffice servicing the Borrower will review the demand and submit it to theState Director for verification. After reviewing the demand, the StateDirector will transmit the request to the FmHA Finance Office for issuanceof the appropriate check. Upon issuance, the Finance Office will notifythe office serving the Borrower and State Director and remit the check(s)to the Holder(s).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. Lender consents to the purchase by FmHA and agrees to furnish onrequest by FmHA a current statement certified by an appropriate authorizedofficer of the Lender of the unpaid principal and interest then owed bythe Borrower on the loan and the amount due the Holder(s). Lender agreesthat any purchase by FmHA does not change, alter or modify any of the Lender'sobligations to FmHA arising from said loan or guarantee, nor does suchpurchase waive any of FmHA's rights against Lender, and FmHA will havethe right to set-off against Lender all rights inuring to FmHA from theHolder against FmHA's obligation to Lender under the Loan Note Guarantee.To the extent FmHA holds a portion of a loan, loan subsidy will not bepaid the Lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">F. Servicing fees assessed by the Lender to a Holder are collectibleonly from payment installments received by the Lender from the Borrower.When FmHA repurchases from a Holder, FmHA will pay the Holder only theamounts due the Holder, FmHA will not reimburse the Lender for servicingfees assessed to a Holder and not collected from payments received fromthe Borrower. No servicing fee shall be charged FmHA and no such fee iscollectible from FmHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">G. Lender may also repurchase the guaranteed portion of the loan consistentwith paragraph 10 of the Loan Note Guarantee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XI. Liquidation. If the Lender concludes that liquidation of a guaranteedloan account is necessary because of one or more defaults or third partyactions that the Borrower cannot or will not cure or eliminate within areasonable period of time, a meeting will be arranged by the Lender withFmHA. When FmHA concurs with the Lender's conclusion or at any time concludesindependently that liquidation is necessary, it will notify the Lenderand the matter will be handled as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Lender will liquidate the loan unless FmHA, at its option, decidesto carry out liquidation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">When the decision to liquidate is made, the Lender may proceed topurchase from Holder(s) the guaranteed portion of the loan. The Holder(s)will be paid according to the provisions in the Loan Note Guarantee orthe Assignment Guarantee Agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If the Lender does not purchase the guaranteed portion of the loan,FmHA will be notified immediately in writing. FmHA will then purchase theguaranteed portion of the loan from the Holder(s). If FmHA holds any ofthe guaranteed portion, FmHA will be paid first its pro rata share of theproceeds from liquidation of the collateral.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Lender's proposed method of liquidation. </T3>Within 30 days afterthe decision to liquidate, the Lender will advise FmHA in writing of itsproposed detailed method of liquidation called a liquidation plan and willprovide FmHA with:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Such proof as FmHA requires to establish the Lender's ownershipof the guaranteed loan promissory note(s) and related security instruments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Information lists concerning the Borrower's assets including realand personal property, fixtures, claims, contracts, inventory (includingperishables), accounts receivable, personal and corporate guarantees, andother existing and contingent assets, advice as to whether or not eachitem is serving as collateral for the guaranteed loan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. A proposed method of making the maximum collection possible onthe indebtedness.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. If the outstanding principal Bandamp;I loan balance including accruedinterest is less than $200,000, the Lender will obtain an estimate of themarket and potential liquidated value of the collateral. On Bandamp;I loanbalances in excess of $200,000, and all other loans regardless of the outstandingprincipal balance, the Lender will obtain an independent appraisal reporton all collateral securing the loan, which will reflect the current marketvalue and potential liquidation value. The appraisal report is for thepurpose of permitting the Lender and FmHA to determine the appropriateliquidation actions. Any independent appraiser's fee will be shared equallyby FmHA and the Lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>FmHA's response to Lender's liquidation plan. </T3>FmHA will informthe Lender in writing whether it concurs in the Lender's liquidation planwithin 30 days after receipt of such notification from the Lender. If FmHAneeds additional time to respond to the liquidation plan, it will advisethe Lender of a definite time for such response. Should FmHA and the Lendernot agree on the Lender's liquidation plan, negotiations will take placebetween FmHA and the Lender to resolve the disagreement. The Lender willordinarily conduct the liquidation; however, should FmHA opt to conductthe liquidation, FmHA will proceed as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. The Lender will transfer to FmHA all rights and interests necessaryto allow FmHA to liquidate the loan. In this event, the Lender will notbe paid for any loss until after the collateral is liquidated and the finalloss is determined by FmHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. FmHA will attempt to obtain the maximum amount of proceeds fromliquidation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Options available to FmHA include any one or combination of theusual commercial methods of liquidation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>Acceleration. </T3>The Lender or FmHA, if it liquidates, will proceedas expeditiously as possible when acceleration of the indebtedness is necessaryincluding giving any notices and taking any other legal actions requiredby the security instruments. A copy of the acceleration notice or otheracceleration document will be sent to FmHA or the Lender, as the case maybe.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. <T3>Liquidation: </T3>Accounting and Reports. When the Lender conductsthe liquidation, it will account for funds during the period of liquidationand will provide FmHA with periodic reports on the progress of liquidation,disposition of collateral, resulting costs and additional procedures necessaryfor successful completion of liquidation. The Lender will transmit to FmHAany payments received from the Borrower and/or pro rata share of liquidationor other proceeds, etc. when FmHA is the holder of a portion of the guaranteedloan using Form FmHA 1980-43, ``Lender's Guaranteed Loan Payment to FmHA.''When FmHA liquidates, the Lender will be provided with similar reportson request.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. <T3>Determination of Loss and Payment. </T3>In all liquidation cases, finalsettlement will be made with the Lender after the collateral is liquidated.FmHA will have the right to recover losses paid under the guarantee fromany party liable.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss,'' willbe used for calculations of all estimated and final loss determinations.Estimated loss payments may be approved by FmHA after the Lender has submitteda liquidation plan approved by FmHA. Payments will be made in accordancewith applicable FmHA regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. When the Lender is conducting the liquidation, and owns any ofthe guaranteed portion of the loan, it may request a tentative loss estimateby submitting to FmHA an estimate of the loss that will occur in connectionwith liquidation of the loan. FmHA will agree to pay an estimated losssettlement to the Lender provided the Lender applies such amount due tothe outstanding principal balance owed on the guaranteed debt. Such estimatewill be prepared and submitted by the Lender on Form FmHA 449-30, usingthe basic formula as provided on the report except that the appraisal valuewill be used in lieu of the amount received from the sale of collateral.For Farm Ownership, Soil and Water, and Operating loans only, if it appearsthe liquidation period will exceed 90 days, the Lender will file an estimatedloss claim. Once this claim is approved by FmHA, the Lender will discontinueinterest accrual on the defaulted loan and the loss claim will be processedin accordance with the applicable FmHA regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">After the Report of Loss estimate has been approved by FmHA, and within30 days thereafter, FmHA will send the original Report of Loss estimateto FmHA Finance Office for issuance of a Treasury check in payment of theestimated amount due the Lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">After liquidation has been completed, a final loss report will besubmitted on Form FmHA 449-30 by the Lender to FmHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. After the Lender has completed liquidation, FmHA upon receipt ofthe final accounting and report of loss, may audit and will determine theactual loss. If FmHA has any questions regarding the amounts set forthin the final Report of Loss, it will investigate the matter. The Lenderwill make its records available to and otherwise assist FmHA in makingthe investigation. If FmHA finds any discrepancies, it will contact theLender and arrange for the necessary corrections to be made as soon aspossible. When FmHA finds the final Report of Loss to be proper in allrespects, it will be tentatively approved in the space provided on theform for that purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. When the Lender has conducted liquidation and after the final Reportof Loss has been tentatively approved:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. If the loss is greater than the estimated loss payment, FmHA willsend the original of the final Report of Loss to the Finance Office forissuance of a Treasury check in payment of the additional amount owed byFmHA to the Lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. If the loss is less than the estimated loss, the Lender will reimburseFmHA for the overpayment plus interest at the note rate from date of payment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. If FmHA has conducted liquidation, it will provide an accountingand Report of Loss to the Lender and will pay the Lender in accordancewith the Loan Note Guarantee. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. In those instances where the Lender has made authorized protectiveadvances, it may claim recovery for the guaranteed portion of any lossof monies advanced as protective advances and interest resulting from suchprotective advances as provided above, and such payment will be made byFmHA when the final Report of Loss is approved. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">F. <T3>Maximum amount of interest loss payment. </T3>Notwithstanding any otherprovisions of this agreement, the amount payable by FmHA to the Lendercannot exceed the limits set forth in the Loan Note Guarantee. If FmHAconducts the liquidation, loss occasioned by accruing interest (includingany loan subsidy) will be covered by the guarantee only to the date FmHAaccepts this responsibility. Loss occasioned by accruing interest (includingsubsidy) will be covered to the extent of the guarantee to the date offinal settlement when the liquidation is conducted by the Lender providedit proceeds expeditiously with the liquidation plan approved by FmHA, exceptfor Farm Ownership, Soil and Water, and Operating loans only, when theLender files an estimated loss claim. For Farm Ownership, Soil and Waterand Operating loans, only, when the Lender files an estimated loss claim,the Lender will discontinue interest accrual on the defaulted loan whenthe estimated loss claim is approved by FmHA. The balance of accrued interest(including any loan subsidy) payable to the Lender, if any, will be calculatedon the final Report of Loss form. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">G. <T3>Application of FmHA loss payment. </T3>The estimated loss payment shallbe applied as of the date of such payment. The total amount of loss paymentremitted by FmHA will be applied by the Lender on the guaranteed portionof the loan debt. However, such application does not release the Borrowerfrom liability. At time of final loss settlement the Lender will notifythe Borrower that the loss payment has been so applied. In all cases afinal Form FmHA 449-30 prepared and submitted by the Lender must be processedby FmHA in order to close out the files at the FmHA Finance Office. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">H. <T3>Income from collateral. </T3>Any net rental or other income that hasbeen received by the Lender from the collateral will be applied on theguaranteed loan debt.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. <T3>Liquidation costs. </T3>Certain reasonable liquidation costs will beallowed during the liquidation process. These liquidation costs will besubmitted as a part of the liquidation plan. Such costs will be deductedfrom gross proceeds from the disposition of collateral unless the costshave been previously determined by the Lender (with FmHA written concurrence)to be protective advances. If changed circumstances after submission ofthe liquidation plan require a revision of liquidation costs, the Lenderwill procure FmHA's written concurrence prior to proceeding with the proposedchanges. No in-house expenses of the Lender will be allowed. In-house expensesinclude, but are not limited to, employees' salaries, staff lawyers, traveland overhead. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">J. <T3>Foreclosure. </T3>The parties owning the guaranteed portion and unguaranteedportions of the loan will join to institute foreclosure action or, in lieuof foreclosure, to take a deed of conveyance to such parties. When theconveyance is received and liquidated, net proceeds will be applied tothe guaranteed loan debt. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">K. <T3>Payment. </T3>Such loss will be paid by FmHA within 60 days after thereview of the accounting of the collateral. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XII. Protective Advances. Protective advances must constitute an indebtednessof the Borrower to the Lender and be secured by the security instrument(s).FmHA written authorization is required on all protective advances in excessof $500. Protective advances include, but all not limited to, advancesmade for taxes, annual assessments, ground rent, hazard or flood insurancepremiums affecting the collateral, and other expenses necessary to preserveor protect the security. Attorney fees are not a protective advance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XIII. Additional Loans or Advances. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Lender will not make additional expenditures or new loans withoutfirst obtaining the written approval of FmHA even though such expendituresor loans will not be guaranteed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XIV. Future Recovery. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">After a loan has been liquidated and a final loss has been paid byFmHA, any future funds which may be recovered by the Lender, will be pro-ratedbetween FmHA and the Lender. FmHA will be paid such amount recovered inproportion to the percentage it guaranteed for the loan and the Lenderwill retain such amounts in proportion to the percentage of the unguaranteedportion of the loan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XV. Transfer and Assumption Cases. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Refer to the applicable Subpart of Title 7 of CFR Part 1980.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If a loss should occur upon consummation of a complete transfer andassumption for less than the full amount of the debt and the transferor-debtor(including personal guarantees) is released from personal liability, theLender, if it holds the guaranteed portion, may file an estimated Reportof Loss on Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss,'' torecover its pro rata share of the actual loss at that time. In completingForm FmHA 449-30, the amount of the debt assumed will be entered on line24 as Net Collateral (Recovery). Approved protective advances and accruedinterest thereon made during the arrangement of a transfer and assumption,if not assumed by the Transferee, will be entered on Form FmHA 449-30,line 13 and 14. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XVI. Bankruptcy. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The Lender is responsible for protecting the guaranteed loan debtand all collateral securing the loan in bankruptcy proceedings. When theloan is involved in a reorganization bankruptcy proceeding under Chapters11, 12 or 13 of the Bankruptcy Code, payment of loss claims may be madeas provided in this paragraph XVI. For a Chapter 7 bankruptcy or a liquidationplan in a Chapter 11 bankruptcy, only paragraphs XVI B3 and B6 are applicable.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Loss Payments.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Estimated Loss Payments. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. If a borrower has filed for protection under a reorganization bankruptcy,the Lender will request a tentative estimated loss payment of accrued interestand principal written off. This request can only be made after the bankruptcyplan is confirmed by the court. Only one estimated loss payment is allowedduring the reorganization bankruptcy. All subsequent claims during thereorganization will be considered revisions to the initial estimated loss.A revised estimated loss payment may be processed by FmHA, at its option,in accordance with any court approved changes in the reorganization plan.At the time the performance under the confirmed reorganization plan hasbeen completed, the Lender is responsible for providing FmHA with the documentationnecessary to review and adjust the estimated loss claim to (a) reflectthe actual principal and interest reduction on any part of the guaranteeddebt determined to be unsecured and (b) to reimburse the Lender for anycourt ordered interest rate reduction during the term of the reorganizationplan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The Lender will use Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Reportof Loss,'' to request an estimated loss payment and to revise estimatedloss payments during the course of the reorganization plan. The estimatedloss claim as well as any revisions to this claim will be accompanied byapplicable legal documentation to support the claim. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Upon completion of the reorganization plan, the lender will completeForm FmHA 1980-44, ``Guaranteed Loan Borrower Default Status,'' and forwardthis form to the Finance Office. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Interest Loss Payments.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Interest loss payments sustained during the period of the reorganizationplan will be processed in accordance with paragraph XVI B1.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. Interest loss payments sustained after the reorganization planis completed will be processed annually when the Lender sustains a lossas a result of a permanent interest rate reduction which extends beyondthe period of the reorganization plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Form FmHA 449-30 will be completed to compensate the Lender forthe difference in interest rates specified on the Loan Note Guarantee orInterest Rate Buydown Agreement and the rate of interest specified by thebankruptcy court. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Final Loss Payments. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Final loss payments will be processed when the loan is liquidated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. If the loan is paid in full without an additional loss, the FinanceOffice will close out the estimated loss account at the time notificationof payment in full is received. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Payment Application. </T3>The Lender must apply estimated loss paymentsfirst to the unsecured principal of the guaranteed portion of the debtand then to the unsecured interest of the guranteed portion of the debt.In the event the bankruptcy court attempts to direct the payments to beapplied in a different manner, the Lender will immediately notify the FmHAservicing office. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. <T3>Overpayments. </T3>Upon completion of the reorganization plan, theLender will provide FmHA with the documentation necessary to determinewhether the estimated loss paid equals the acutal loss sustained. If theactual loss sustained, as a result of the reorganization, is greater thanthe estimated loss payment, the Lender will submit a revised estimatedloss in order to obtain payment of the additional amount owed by FmHA tothe Lender. If the actual loss payment is less than the estimated loss,the Lender will reimburse FmHA for the overpayment plus interest at thenote rate from the date of the payment of the estimated loss. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. <T3>Protective Advances. </T3>If approved protective advances were madeprior to the borrower having filed bankruptcy, as a result of prior liquidationaction, these protective advances and accrued interest will be enteredon Form FmHA 449-30. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XVII. Debt Write-down. For Farm Ownership, Soil and Water, and Operatingloans only, refer to Title 7 of CFR Part 1980, Subpart B, andSection; 1980.125.The maximum amount of loss payment associated with a loan/line of creditagreement which has been written down will not exceed the percent of theguarantee multiplied by the difference between the outstanding principaland interest balance of the loan/line of credit before the write-down andthe outstanding balance of the loan/line of credit after the write-down.The Lender will use Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss,''to request an estimated loss payment to receive its pro-rata share of anyloss sustained. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XVIII. Other Requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This agreement is subject to all the requirements of the applicableSubpart of Title 7 CFR Part 1980, and any future amendments of these regulationsnot inconsistent with this agreement. Interested parties may agree to abideby future FmHA regulations not inconsistent with this agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XIX. Execution of Agreements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If this agreement is executed prior to the execution of the Loan NoteGuarantee, this agreement does not impose any obligation upon FmHA withrespect to execution of such contract. FmHA in no way warrants that sucha contract has been or will be executed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XX. Notices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">All notices and actions will be </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">initiated through FmHA for</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(State) with mailing address at the </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">date of this instrument</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated this ___ day of ___, 19_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">LENDER:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">By</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Title</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">United States of America</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Farmers Home Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">By</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Title</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Attest: ___ (Seal)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. Appendix E to Subpart A is revised to read as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="85">Appendix E to Subpart A_Lender's Agreement (Line of Credit)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">USDA-FmHA</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Form FmHA 1980-38</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Rev. 1-89)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">FORM APPROVED</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">OMB No. 0575-0079</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Type of Loan: } OL } EL or } EE</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">FmHA Loan ID No.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Applicable 7 CFR Part 1980, Subpart</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="77">(Lender) of </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">has established a line of credit to ___ (Borrower) for the fiscalperiod ending ___, 19_, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">for the purpose of</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">in the maximum sum of $___ as evidenced by a ``Line of Credit Agreement''dated ___, 19_.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The United States of America, acting through Farmers Home Administration(FmHA) has entered into a ``Contract of Guarantee (Line of Credit)'' (FormFmHA 1980-27) or has issued a ``Conditional Commitment for Contract ofGuarantee (Line of Credit)'' (Form FmHA 1980-15) to enter into a Contractof Guarantee with the Lender applicable to such line of credit to participatein a percentage of any loss on the loan advances not to exceed ___% ofthe amount of the principal and any accrued interest. The terms of theContract of Guarantee are controlling. As a condition for obtaining a guaranteeof the line of credit advances the Lender enters into this agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Parties agree:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. The maximum loss covered under the Contract of Guarantee will notexceed ___ percent of the principal and accrued interest owed on any OperatingLoan, Emergency Livestock Loan or Economic Emergency Loan advances madewithin the line of credit ceiling and the terms and conditions of the Contractof Guarantee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">II. <T3>Full Faith and Credit.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Contract of Guarantee constitutes an obligation supported by thefull faith and credit of the United States and is incontestable exceptfor fraud or misrepresentation of which the Lender has actual knowledgeat the time it became such Lender or which Lender participates in or condones.Any line of credit agreement which provides for the payment of intereston interest shall not be guaranteed. Any Contract of Guarantee attachedto or relating to the line of credit agreement which provides for the paymentof interest on interest is void. The Contract of Guarantee will be unenforceableby the Lender to the extent any loss is occasioned by violation of usurylaws, negligent servicing, or failure to obtain the required security regardlessof the time at which FmHA acquires knowledge of the foregoing. Any losseswill be unenforceable to the extent that loan funds are used for purposesother than those specifically approved by FmHA in its Conditional Commitmentfor Contract of Guarantee Line of Credit. Negligent servicing is definedas the failure to perform those services which a reasonably prudent Lenderwould perform in servicing its own portfolio of loans that are not guaranteed.The term includes not only the concept of a failure to act but also notacting in a timely manner or acting in a manner contrary to the mannerin which a reasonably prudent Lender would act up to the time of loan maturityor until a final loss is paid.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">III. <T3>Lender's Sale of Guaranteed Line of Credit by Participation.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The Lender may obtain participation in its line of credit underits normal operating procedures. The Lender is required to hold in itsown portfolio or retain a minimum of 10 percent of the total guaranteedline of credit amount. The amount required to be retained must be of theunguaranteed portion of the line of credit and cannot be participated toanother Lender. The Lender may obtain participation of only the unguaranteedportion of its line of credit in excess of the 10 percent minimum underits normal operations procedures. Participation means a sale of an interestin the line of credit in which the Lender retains the line of credit agreement(and note, if one exists), collateral securing the line of credit, andall responsibility for servicing and liquidation of the line of credit.Participation with a lender by any entity does not make that entity a lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The Lender may retain or sell any amount of the unguaranteed portion(s)of the line(s) of credit as provided in this section only through participation.However, the Lender cannot participate any amount of the line(s) of creditto the applicant or Borrower or members of their immediate families, theirofficers, directors, stockholders, or owners, or any parent, subsidiaryor affiliate. If the Lender desires to sell all or part of the guaranteedportion of the line of credit through participation at or subsequent toexecution of the line of credit agreement, such line of credit must notbe in default as set forth in the terms of the line of credit agreement(s)(and note(s), if any exist). The Lender will retain the responsibilityfor servicing and liquidation of the line of credit. Participation witha lender by any entity does not make the entity a holder.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto average 1 hour per response, including the time for reviewing instructions,searching existing data sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed,and completing and reviewing the collection of information. Send commentsregarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of this collection ofinformation including suggestions for reducing this burden to, Departmentof Agriculture, Clearance Officer, OIRM, Room 404-W, Washington, D.C. 20250;and to the Office of Management and Budget, Paperwork Reduction Project(OMB No. 0575-0079), Washington, D.C. 20503.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IV. The Lender agrees funds advanced under the line of credit willbe used for the purposes authorized in either Subpart B, C or F of Title7 CFR, Part 1980 as applicable in accordance with the terms of Form FmHA1980-15.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">V. The Lender certifies that none of its officers or directors, stockholders,or other owners (except stockholders in a Farm Credit Bank, other FarmCredit System institution with direct lending authority that have normalstockshare requirements for participation) has a substantial financialinterest in the Borrower. The Lender certifies that neither the Borrowernor its officers or directors, stockholders or other owners has a substantialfinancial interest in the Lender. If the Borrower is a member of the boardof directors or officer of a Farm Credit Bank or other Farm Credit Systeminstitution with direct lending authority, the Lender certifies that anFCS institution on the next highest level will independently process theloan request and will act as the Lender's agent in servicing the account. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VI. The Lender certifies that it has no knowledge of any materialadverse change, financial or otherwise, in the Borrower, the Borrower'sbusiness or any parent, subsidiaries, or affiliates since it requesteda Contract of Guarantee.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VII. Lender certifies that the Line of Credit Agreement and/or loaninstruments concurred in by FmHA has been or will be signed with the Borrower. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VIII. If an Operating Loan line of credit is guaranteed under SubpartB of 7 CFR, Part 1980, Lender certifies it has paid the required guaranteefee.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IX. <T3>Servicing.  </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The Lender will service the entire line of credit and will remainmortgagee and/or secured party of record. The entire line of credit willbe secured by the same security with equal lien priority of the guaranteedand unguaranteed portions of the line of credit. The unguaranteed portionof a line of credit will not be paid first nor given any preference orpriority over the guaranteed portion of the line of credit.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. It is the Lender's responsibility to see that all constructionis properly planned before any work proceeds; that any required permits,licenses or authorizations are obtained from the appropriate regulatoryagencies; that the Borrower has obtained contracts through acceptable procurementprocedures; that periodic inspections during construction are made andthat FmHA's concurrence on the overall development schedule is obtained. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. Lender's servicing responsibilities include, but are not limitedto:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Obtaining compliance with the covenants and provisions in the lineof credit agreement (and note, if one exists), security instruments, andany supplemental agreements. None of the aforesaid instruments will bealtered without FmHA's prior written concurrence. The Lender must servicethe line of credit in a reasonable prudent manner.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Receiving all payments on principal and interest on the line ofcredit advances as they fall due. The line of credit may be reamortized,rescheduled or (for Operating Loan lines of credit only) written down onlywith FmHA's written concurrence.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Inspecting the collateral as often as necessary to properly servicethe line of credit.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Assuring that adequate insurance is maintained. This includes hazardinsurance obtained and maintained with a loss payable clause in favor ofthe Lender as the mortgagee or secured party.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Assuring that: taxes, assessment or ground rents against or affectingcollateral are paid; the line of credit and collateral are protected inforeclosure, bankruptcy, receivership, insolvency, condemnation, or otherlitigation; insurance loss payments; condemnation awards, or similar proceedsare applied on debts in accordance with lien priorities on which the guaranteewas based, or to rebuilding or otherwise acquiring needed replacement collateralwith the written approval of FmHA; proceeds from the sale or other dispositionof collateral are applied in accordance with the lien priorities on whichthe guarantee is based, except that proceeds from the disposition of collateralsuch as machinery, equipment, furniture or fixtures, may be used to acquireproperty of similar nature in value up to $__ without written concurrenceof FmHA; the Borrower complies with all laws and ordinances applicableto the line of credit, the collateral and/or operation of the farm or ranch. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Assuring that if personal or corporate guarantees are part of thecollateral, current financial statements from such guarantors will be obtainedwhich are not over 90 days old for both types of guarantees for operatingLoan lines of credit, and for corporate guarantees for Emergency Livestockand Economic Emergency lines of credit. Financial statements of personalguarantors for Emergency Livestock and Economic Emergency lines of creditwill not be over 60 days old. In the case of guarantees secured by collateral,assuring the security is properly maintained.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Obtaining the lien coverage and line priorities specified by theLender and agreed to by FmHA, properly recording or filing lien or noticeinstruments to obtain or maintain such lien priorities during the existenceof the guarantee by FmHA.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. Assuring that the borrower obtains marketable title to the collateral. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. Assuring that the Borrower (any party liable) is not released fromliability for all or any part of the line of credit, except in accordancewith FmHA regulations.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. Providing FmHA Finance Office with loan status reports annuallyas of December 31 on Form FmHA 1980-41, ``Guaranteed Loan Status Report''. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. Obtaining from the Borrower periodic financial statements underthe following schedule:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Lender is responsible for analyzing the financial statements, takingany servicing actions needed, and providing copies of statements and recordof actions to the County Supervisor.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12. Monitoring loan funds to assure they will not be used for anypurpose that will contribute to excessive erosion of highly erodible landor to the conversion of wetlands to produce an agricultural commodity.Failure to do so will be considered negligent servicing and any loss attributedto such negligent servicing will not be paid by FmHA, as explained in 7CFR Part 1940, Subpart G, Exhibit M.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. For Operating Loan lines of credit only, the Lender shall participatein any farm credit mediation program of a state in accordance with therules of that system and 7 CFR, Part 1980, Subpart B, andSection; 1980.126 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">X. <T3>Defaults.  </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The Lender will notify FmHA when a Borrower is thirty (30) dayspast due on a payment and is unlikely to bring its account current withinsixty (60) days, or if the Borrower has not met its responsibilities ofproviding the required financial statements to the Lender or is otherwisein default. The Lender will notify FmHA of the status of a Borrower's defaulton Form FmHA 1980-44, ``Guaranteed Loan Borrower Default Status''. A meetingwill be arranged by the Lender with the Borrower and FmHA to resolve theproblem. Actions taken by the Lender with concurrence of FmHA may includebut are not limited to any curative actions contained in either SubpartB, C or F as applicable, or liquidation.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The Lender will negotiate in good faith in an attempt to resolveany problem and to permit the Borrower to cure a default, where reasonable.The Lender agrees that if liquidation of the account becomes imminent,the Lender will consider the Borrower of an Operating Loan Line of Creditfor an Interest Rate Buydown under Exhibit D of Subpart B of 7 CFR, Part1980, and request a determination of the Borrower's eligibility by FmHA.The Lender may not initiate foreclosure action on the line of credit until60 days after a determination has been made with respect to the eligibilityof the Borrower to participate in the Interest Rate Buydown Program.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XI. <T3>Liquidation.  </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If the Lender concludes that liquidation of a guaranteed line of creditaccount is necessary because of one or more defaults or third party actionsthat the Borrower cannot or will not cure or eliminate within a reasonableperiod of time, a meeting will be arranged by the Lender with FmHA. WhenFmHA concurs with the Lender's conclusion or at any time concludes independentlythat liquidation is necessary, it will notify the Lender and the matterwill be handled as follows:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Lender will liquidate the loan unless FmHA, at its option decidesto carry out liquidation.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Lender's proposed method of liquidation.</T3> Within 30 days afterthe decision to liquidate is made, the Lender will advise FmHA of its proposedmethod of liquidation and will provide FmHA with.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Such proof as FmHA requires to establish the Lender's ownershipof the guaranteed line of credit agreement(s) and related security instruments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Information lists concerning the Borrower's assets including realand personal property, fixtures, claims, contracts, inventory (includingperishables), accounts receivable, personal and corporate guarantees, andother existing and contingent assets, advice as to whether or not eachitem is serving as collateral for the guaranteed line of credits.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. A proposed method making the maximum collection possible on theindebtedness.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Lender will obtain an independent appraisal report on all collateralsecuring the loan, which will reflect the current market value and potentialliquidation value. The appraisal report is for the purpose of permittingthe Lender and FmHA to determine the appropriate liquidation actions. Anyindependent appraiser's fee will be shared equally by FmHA and the Lender. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>FmHA's response to Lender's liquidation proposal.</T3> FmHA will informthe Lender whether it concurs in the Lender's proposed method of liquidationwithin 30 days after receipt of such notification from the Lender. If FmHAneeds additional time to respond to the liquidation plan, it will advisethe Lender of a definite time for such response. Should FmHA and the Lendernot agree on the Lender's liquidation proposal, negotiation will take placebetween FmHA and the Lender to resolve the disagreement. The Lender willordinarily conduct the liquidation; however, should FmHA opt to conductthe liquidation, FmHA will proceed as follows:  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. The Lender will transfer to FmHA all its rights and interests necessaryto allow FmHA to liquidate the loan. In this event, the Lender will notbe paid for any loss until after the collateral is liquidated and the finalloss is determined by FmHA.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. FmHA will attempt to obtain the maximum amount of proceeds fromliquidation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Options available to FmHA include any one or combination of theusual commercial methods of liquidation.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>Acceleration.</T3> The Lender or FmHA, if it liquidates, will proceedas expeditiously as possible when acceleration of the indebtedness is necessaryincluding giving any notices and taking any other legal actions requiredby the security instruments. A copy of the acceleration notice or otheracceleration document will be sent to FmHA or the Lender, as the case maybe.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. <T3>Liquidation.</T3> Accounting and Reports. When the Lender conductsthe liquidation, it will account for funds during the period of liquidationand will provide FmHA with periodic reports on the progress of liquidation,disposition of collateral, resulting costs, and additional procedures necessaryfor successful completion of liquidation. When FmHA liquidates, the Lenderwill be provided with similar reports on request.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. <T3>Determination of Loss and Payment.</T3> In all liquidation cases, afinal settlement will be made with the Lender after the collateral is liquidated.FmHA will have the right to recover losses paid under the guarantee fromany party liable.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. From FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss,'' willbe used for calculations of all estimated and final determinations. Estimatedloss payments may be approved by FmHA after the Lender has submitted aliquidation plan approved by FmHA. Payment will be made in accordance withthe applicable FmHA regulations.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. When the Lender is conducting the liquidation, it may request atentative loss estimate by submitting to FmHA an estimate of the loss thatwill occur in connection with liquidation of the line of credit. FmHA willagree to pay an estimated loss settlement to the Lender provided the Lenderapplies such amount due to the outstanding principal balance owed on theguaranteed debt. Such estimate will be prepared on Form FmHA 449-30, usingthe basic formula as provided in the report except that the appraisal valuewill be used in lieu of the amount received from the sale of collateral.For Operating Loan lines of credit only, if it appears the liquidationperiod will exceed 90 days, the Lender will file an estimated loss claim.Once this claim is approved by FmHA, the Lender will discontinue interestaccrual on the defaulted loan and the loss claim will be promptly processedin accordance with the applicable FmHA regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">After the Report of Loss Estimate has been approved by FmHA, and within30 days thereafter, FmHA will send the original Report of Loss Estimateto FmHA Finance Office for issuance of a Treasury check in payment of theestimated amount due the Lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">After liquidation has been completed, a final loss report will besubmitted on Form FmHA 449-30 by the Lender to FmHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. After the Lender has completed liquidation FmHA, upon receipt ofthe final accounting and report of loss, may audit and will determine theactual loss. If FmHA has any questions regarding the amounts set forthin the Final Report of Loss, it will investigate the matter. The Lenderwill make its records available to and otherwise assist FmHA in makingthe investigation. If FmHA finds any discrepancies, it will contact theLender and arrange for the necessary corrections to be made as soon aspossible. When FmHA finds the Final Report of Loss to be proper in allrespects, it will be tentatively approved in the space provided on theform for that purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. When the Lender has conducted liquidation and after the Final Reportof Loss has been tentatively approved: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. If the loss is greater than the estimated loss payment, FmHA willsend the original of the Final Report Loss to the Finance Office for issuanceof a Treasury check in payment of the additional amount owed by FmHA tothe Lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. If the loss is less than the estimated loss, the Lender will reimburseFmHA for the overpayment plus interest at the note rate from date of payment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. If FmHA has conducted liquidation, it will provide an accountingand report of loss to the Lender and will pay the Lender in accordancewith the Contract of Guarantee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. In those instances where the Lender has made authorized protectiveadvances, it may claim recovery for the guaranteed portion of any lossof monies advanced as protective advances and interest resulting from suchprotective advances as provided above, and such payment will be made byFmHA when the final Report of Loss is approved.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">F. <T3>Maximum amount of interest loss payment. </T3>Notwithstanding any otherprovisions of this agreement, the amount payable by FmHA to the Lendercannot exceed the limits set forth in the Contract of Guarantee. If FmHAconducts the liquidation, loss occasioned by accruing interest will becovered by the guarantee only to the date FmHA accepts this responsiblity.Loss occasioned by accruing interest will be covered to the extent of theguarantee to the date of final settlement when the liquidation is conductedby the Lender provided it proceeds expeditiously with the liquidation planapproved by FmHA, except for Operating Loan lines of credit only, whenthe Lender files an estimated loss claim. For Operating Loan lines of creditonly, when a Lender files as estimated Loss claim, the Lender will discontinueinterest accrual on the defaulted loan when the estimated Loss claim isapproved by FmHA. The balance of accrued interest payable to the Lender,if any, will be calculated on the final Report of Loss form.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">G. <T3>Application of FmHA loss payment. </T3>The estimated loss payment shallbe applied as of the date of such payment. The amount of the loss paymentremitted by FmHA will be applied by the Lender on the guaranteed loan debt.However, such application does not release the Borrower from liability.At time of final loss settlement the Lender will notify the Borrower thatthe loss payment has been so applied. In all cases a final Form FmHA 449-30prepared and submitted by the Lender must be processed by FmHA in orderto close out the files at the FmHA Finance Office.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">H. <T3>Income from collateral. </T3>Any net rental or other income that hasbeen received by the Lender from the collateral will be applied on theguaranteed loan debt.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. <T3>Liquidation costs. </T3>Certain reasonable liquidation costs will beallowed during the liquidation process. These liquidation costs will besubmitted as a part of the liquidation plan. Such costs will be deductedfrom gross proceeds from the disposition of collateral unless the costshave been previously determined by the Lender (with FmHA written concurrence)to be protective advances. If changed circumstances after submission ofthe liquidation plan require a revision of liquidation costs, the Lenderwill procure FmHA's written concurrence prior to proceeding with the proposedchanges. No in-house expenses of the Lender will be allowed. In-house expensesinclude, but are not limited to, employees' salaries, staff lawyers, traveland overhead.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">J. <T3>Payment. </T3>Such loss will be paid by FmHA within 60 days after thereview of the account of the collateral.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XII. <T3>Protective advances. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Protective advances must constitute an indebtedness of the Borrowerto the Lender and be secured by the security instrument(s). FmHA writtenauthorization is required on all protective advances in excess of $500.Protective advances include, but are not limited to, advances for taxes,annual assessments, ground rent, hazard or flood insurance premiums effectingthe collateral, and other expenses necessary to preserve or protect thesecurity. Attorney fees are not a protective advance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XIII. <T3>Additional Loans or Advances. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Lender will not make additional expenses or new lines of creditor loans without first obtaining the written approval of FmHA even thoughsuch expenditures or lines of credit or loans will not be guaranteed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XIV. <T3>Future Recovery. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">After a loan has been liquidated and a final loss has been paid byFmHA, any future funds which may be recovered by the Lender, will be pro-ratedbetween FmHA and the Lender. FmHA will be paid such amount recovered inproportion to the percentage it guaranteed for the loan and the Lenderwill retain such amount in proportion to the percentage of the unguaranteedportion of the loan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XV. <T3>Transfer and Assumption Cases. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Refer to Subpart B, C or F of Title 7 of CFR, Part 1980. If a losswill occur upon consummation of a complete transfer and assumption forless than the full amount of the debt and the transferor-debtor (includingpersonal guarantees) is released from personal liability, the Lender mayfile an estimated Report of Loss on Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note GuaranteeReport of Loss,'' to recover its pro rata share of the actual loss at thattime. In completing Form FmHA 449-30, the amount of the debt assumed willbe entered on line 24 as Net Collateral (Recovery). Approved protectiveadvances and accured interest thereon made during the arrangement of atransfer and assumption, if not assumed by the Transferee, will be enteredon Form FmHA 449-30, lines 13 and 14.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XVI. <T3>Bankruptcy. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The Lender is responsible for protecting the guaranteed loan debtand all collateral securing the loan in bankruptcy proceedings. If theloan is involved in a reorganization bankruptcy proceeding under Chapter11, 12 or 13 of the Bankruptcy Code, payment of loss claims may be madeas provided in this paragraph XVI. For a Chapter 7 bankruptcy or a liquidationplan in a Chapter 11 bankruptcy, only paragraphs XVI B3 and B6 are applicable.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Loss Payments. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Estimated Loss Payments: </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. If a borrower has filed for protection under a reorganization bankruptcy,the Lender will request a tentative estimated loss payment of accrued interestand principal written off. This request can only be made after the bankruptcyplan is confirmed by the court. Only one estimated loss payment is allowedduring the reorganization bankruptcy. All subsequent claims during reorganizationwill be considered revisions to the initial estimated loss. A revised estimatedloss payment may be processed by FmHA, at its option, in accordance withany court approved changes in the reorganization plan. At the time theperformance under the confirmed reorganization plan has been completed,the Lender is responsible for providing FmHA with the documentation necessaryto review and adjust the estimated loss claim to (a) reflect the actualprincipal and interest reduction on any part of the guaranteed debt determinedto be unsecured and (b) to reimburse the Lender for any court ordered interestrate reduction during the term of the reorganization plan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The Lender will use Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Reportof Loss,'' to request an estimated loss payment and to revise estimatedloss payments during the course of the reorganization plan. The estimatedloss claim as well as any revisions to this claim will be accompanied byapplicable legal documentation to support the claim.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Upon completion of the reorganization plan, the Lender will completeForm FmHA 1980-44, ``Guaranteed Loan Borrower Default Status,'' and forwardthis form to the Finance Office.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Interest Loss Payment:</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Interest loss payments sustained during the period of the reorganizationplan will be processed in accordance with paragraph XVI B1.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. Interest loss payments sustained after the reorganization planis completed will be processed annually when the Lender sustains a lossas a result of a permanent interest rate reduction which extends beyondthe period of the reorganization plan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. For FmHA 449-30 will be completed to compensate the Lender forthe difference in interest rates specified on the Loan Note Guarantee orInterest Rate Buydown Agreement and the rate of interest specified by thebankdruptcy court.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Final Loss Payments: </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Final loss payments will be processed when the loan is liquidated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. If the loan is paid in full without an additional loss, the FinanceOffice will close out the estimated loss account at the time notificationof payment is received.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Payment Application. </T3>The Lender must apply estimated loss paymentsfirst to the unsecured principal of the guaranteed portion of the debtand then to the unsecured interest of the guaranteed portion of debt. Inthe event the bankruptcy court attempts to direct the payments to be appliedin a different manner, the Lender will immediately notify the FmHA servicingoffice.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. <T3>Overpayments. </T3>Upon completion of the reorganization plan, theLender will provide FmHA with the documentation necessary to determinewhether the estimated loss paid equals the actual loss sustained. If theactual loss sustained, as a result of the reorganization, is greater thanthe estimated loss payment, the Lender will submit a revised estimatedloss in order to obtain payment of the additional amount owed by FmHA tothe Lender. If the actual loss payment is less than the estimated loss,the Lender will reimburse FmHA for the overpayment plus interest at thenote rate from the date of the payment of the estimated loss.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6 <T3>Protective Advances. </T3>If approved protective advances were madeprior to the borrower having filed bankruptcy, as a result of prior liquidationaction, these protective advances and accrued interest will be enteredon Form FmHA 449-30.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XVII. <T3>Debt Write-down. </T3>For Operating Loan lines of credit only, referto Title 7 of CFR, Part 1980, Subpart B, 1980.125. The maximum amount ofloss payment associated with a loan/line of credit agreement which hasbeen written down will not exceed the precent of the guarantee multipliedby the difference between the outstanding principal and interest balanceof the loan/line of credit before the write-down and the outstanding balanceof the loan/line of credit after the write-down. The Lender will use FormFmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss,'' to request an estimatedloss payment to receive its pro-rata share of any loss sustained.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XVII. <T3>Debt Write-down. </T3>For Operating Loan lines of credit only, referto Title 7 of CFR, Part 1980, Subpart B, 1980.125. The maximum amount ofloss payment associated with a loan/line if credit agreement which hasbeen written down will not exceed the percent of the guarantee multipliedby the difference between the outstanding principal and interest balanceof the loan/line of credit before the write-down and the outstanding balanceof loan/line of credit after the write-down. The Lender will use Form FmHA449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss,'' to request an estimatedloss payment to receive its pro-rata share of any loss sustained. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XVIII. <T3>Other Requirements. </T3>This agreement is subject to all the requirementsof either Subpart A, B, C or F of Title 7 CFR, Part 1980 as applicable,and any future amendment of these regulations, or other FmHA regulations,not inconsistent with this agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XIX. <T3>Execution of Agreement. </T3>If this agreement is executed prior tothe execution of the Contract of guarantee, this agreement does not imposeany obligation upon FmHA with respect to execution of such contract. FmHAin no way warrants that such a contract has been or will be executed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XX. <T3>Notices. </T3>All notices and actions will be initiated through theFmHA County Supervisor for ____ (County) ____. (State with mailing addressat the date of this instrument):</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Dated this ____ day of ____, 19 _. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">LENDER: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">ATTEST: ____. SEAL  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">By </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Title </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">UNITED STATES OF AMERICA </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Department of Agriculture </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Farmers Home Administration </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">By </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Title </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11A. Appendix H to Subpart A is revised to read as follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix H to Subpart A_Interest Rate Buydown Agreement </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">USDA-FmHA </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Form FmHA 1980-58 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Rev. 1-89) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">}Loan Note Guarantee </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">}Contract of Guarantee </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Type of Loan ____ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">7 CFR Part 1980 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Subpart B </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">FORM APPROVED </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">OMB NO. 0575-0079 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">State </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">County </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Date of Note </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Borrower </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">FmHA Loan ID No. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Lender </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Lender's IRS ID Tax No. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Lender's Address </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Principal Amount of Loan/Line of Credit Ceiling </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The principal amount of loan or line of credit is evidenced by ____note(s) or line of credit agreement(s) described below. This instrumentis attached to note or line of credit agreement dated ____ in the faceamount of $ ____ and is number ____ of ____. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Copies of the lender's Loan Note Guarantee, or Contract of Guaranteefor a line(s) of credit, and any Assignment Guarantee Agreement, if applicable(Loan Note Guarantee cases only) are attached to this Agreement as a partof it.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,tp0,i1,s5,r5,r5,r5,r5 </C> <H1>Lender's Note No.</H1><H1>Note/Line of Credit Agreement</H1><H1>Interest Rate (If variable calculate in accordance with Part 1980,Subpart B Exhibit D, Paragraph IV I)</H1><H1>Lender Write Down</H1><H1>FmHA Interest Rate Buydown</H1></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This agreement is effective beginning ____ and expires on ____. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In consideration of the subject lender's write down of interest rateon the above borrower's account by ____ percentage points, the United Statesof America, acting through the Farmers Home Administration of the UnitedStates Department of Agriculture (called FmHA) pursuant to the ConsolidatedFarm and Rural Development Act (7 U.S.C. 1921 et seq.) agrees that in accordancewith and subject to the conditions and requirements in this agreement itwill reimburse the lender for ___ percentage points of the write down.The full amount of the interest rate buydown made by FmHA to the lenderwill be passed on to the borrower. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto average 5 minutes per response, including the time for reviewing instructions,searching existing data sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed,and completing and reviewing the collection of information. Send commentsregarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of this collection ofinformation, including suggestions for reducing this burden to, Departmentof Agriculture, Clearance Officer, OIRM, Room 404-W, Washington, D.C. 20250;and to the Office of Management and Budget, Paperwork Reduction Project(OMB No. 0575-0075), Washington, D.C. 20503.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">CONDITIONS OF INTEREST RATE BUYDOWN</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Buydown Rates</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The buydown rate set forth in this agreement will remain constantduring the term of this agreement. If a 95 percent guarantee has been issuedto the lender by FmHA under Exhibit E to 7 CFR Part 1980, Subpart B, thepercentage of this interest rate reduction made by the lender will be permanent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Interest Rate Buydown Payments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">FmHA's payments made in connection with the interest rate buydownwill be calculated using 360 or 365 day year method on a declining balance.The lender will indicate on Form FmHA 1980-19, ``Guaranteed Loan ClosingReport,'' the preferred method, which may not change once established.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Annual Rate Buydown Claims and Payments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The intial Interest Rate Buydown claim will be prepared by the lenderusing form FmHA 1980-24, ``Request Interest Rate Buydown/Subsidy Paymentto Guaranteed Loan Lender,'' on or about a date 12 months from the dateof this agreement, unless it is the first or last claim which may be submittedin accordance with the first and last due date on the borrower's promissorynote. Subsequent claims will be filed by the lender on or about a date12 months thereafter but no later than the anniversary date of filing ofthe initial interest rate buydown claim. Upon full payment of the noteor line of credit agreement the lender will immediately prepare Form FmHA1980-24 and mail a copy to the FmHA serving office.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. When Interest Rate Buydown Payments Cease</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For Loan Note Guarantee cases, when FmHA purchases a portion of aloan, interest buydown payments on that portion will cease. Interest ratebuydown payments will cease upon termination of the Loan Note Guaranteeor Contract of Guarantee, upon reaching the expiration date set forth inthis agreement or upon cancellation by the Government. Interest buydownpayments shall cease upon the assumption/transfer of the loan if the transfereewas not liable for the debt at the time the buydown was granted. The lendershall complete Form FmHA 1980-24, ``Request Interest Rate Buydown/SubsidyPayment to Guaranteed Loan Lender,'' to request payment for the buydown/subsidythrough the date of the transfer or assumption of the guaranteed loan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Cash Flow</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The lender certifies that the interest rate reduction to the borrowerresults in a reduced, equally amortized payment schedule for the term ofthis agreement so that the borrower's operation projects a positive cashflow on all income and expenses including debt service for the term ofthis agreement. A typical plan of operation must show that a positive cashflow can be expected during the initial 24 month buydown period. For thoseloans/lines of credit with terms less than 24 months, then the operationmust show a positive cash flow for the term of the loan/line of credit.In cases where the term of the loan or line of credit agreement exceedsthe term of this agreement, the lender certifies that the borrower is projectedto have a positive cash flow on all income and expenses including debtservice after this agreement expires. Cash flow and positive cash floware defined in Exhibit D or Exhibit E to Subpart B of 7 CFR 1980, as applicable,and must be calculated in accordance with andSection; 1980.113(d)(8) of SubpartB of Part 1980.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Cancellation of Interest</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Lender certifies that the amount of interest written down on subjectborrower's account will be permanently canceled as it becomes due and noattempt will be made to collect that portion of the debt.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Repurchase of loans presently guaranteed by FmHA eligible for interestrate buydown. (Loan Note Guarantee Cases Only). See also item 10 of FormFmHA 449-36.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In the case of converting a guaranteed loan without an interest ratebuydown to one with such a buydown, the lender must obtain the holder'sconsent in writing. If the holder does not consent to the interest ratereduction proposed by the lender, the lender must repurchase the unpaidportion of the loan from any holder(s) before the interest rate buydowncan be granted. Any repurchase will only be made after the lender obtainsFmHA's written approval. In the event the lender assigns the guaranteedportion of the loan to a holder(s) the Assignment Guarantee Agreement (FormFmHA 449-36) will be amended as provided in 7 CFR, Part 1980, Subpart B,Exhibit D, paragraph VI B2 or Exhibit E, paragraph VI B2, as applicable,to reflect the reduced interest rate.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. Regulatory Changes</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This Agreement is subject to the present regulations of the FmHA andits future regulations not inconsistent with any provisions of this agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. Cancellation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Interest Rate Buydown Agreement is in contestable except for fraudor misrepresentation of which the lender has actual knowledge at the timethis Agreement is executed or for which the lender participates in or condones.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. Excessive Interest Rate Buydown</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Government may amend or cancel this agreement and collect fromthe lender any amount of reduction granted as a result of incomplete orinaccurate information, computation errors, or other circumstances whichresulted in interest rate buydown payments that the lender was not entitledto receive.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. Access to Lender's Files</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Lender agrees to allow FmHA access to audit findings by the lender'ssupervising agency when examining interest rate buydown claims.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Lender</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">By</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Title</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">United States of America, Farmers Home Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Attest:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">[SEAL]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Address:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="77">By</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Title</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Acknowledged:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Borrower</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Attest:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">[SEAL]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12. Subpart B, consisting of andSection;andSection; 1980.101 through 1980.200,and Exhibits A and D of Subpart B are revised, Exhibit B is removed andreserved, and Exhibits E and F of Subpart B are added to read as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Farmer Program Loans </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.101 Introduction. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.102_1980.105 Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.106 Abbreviations and definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.107 Full faith and credit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.108 General provisions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.109 Promissory notes, line of credit agreements, security instruments,and financing statements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.110 Loan subsidy rates, claims, and payments (for EM actual lossloans only). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.111_1980.112 [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.113 Receiving and processing applications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.114 FmHA evaluation of applications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.115 County Committee review. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.116 Review of requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.117 Conditions precedent to issuance of the Loan Note Guaranteeor Contract of Guarantee. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.118 Issuance of Lender's Agreement, Loan Note Guarantee, Contractof Guarantee, and Assignment Guarantee Agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.119_1980.121 [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.122 Substitution of lenders. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.123 Transfer and assumption of Farmer Program loans. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.124 Consolidation, rescheduling, reamortizing and deferred. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.125 Debt write down. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.126 Mediation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.127_1980.128 [Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.129 Planning and performing development. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.130 Loan servicing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.131_1980.135 [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.136 Protective advances. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.137_1980.138 [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.139 Termination of Loan Note Guarantee or Contract of Guarantee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.140 1980.143 [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.144 Bankruptcy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.145 Defaults by borrower. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.146 Liquidation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.147 Graduation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.148 Appeal procedure. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.149 Access to lender's records. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.150_1980.152 [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.153 FmHA forms. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.154 1980.174 [Reserved </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.175 Operating loans. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.176_1980.179 [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.180 Farm Ownership loans. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.181_1980.184 [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.185 Soil and Water loans. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.186_1980.199 [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1980.200 OMB control number. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Exhibit A_Approved Lender Program_Farm Ownership, Soil and Water andOperating Loans </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Exhibit B_[Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Exhibit D_Interest Rate Buydown Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Exhibit E_Demonstration Project for Purchase of Certain Farm CreditSystem Acquired Farm Land.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Exhibit F_Shared Appreciation Agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Farmer Program Loans</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.101 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Introduction</ITAG>(a) <T3>Policy. </T3>This Subpart, supplemented by Subpart A of this part,contains regulations for making the following Farmer Program loans guaranteedby the Farmers Home Administration (FmHA): Operating (OL) (both loans andlines of credit), Farm Ownership (FO) and Soil and Water (SW) loans. Italso contains regulations concerning the servicing of these loans as wellas the servicing of Emergency (EM) and Recreation (RL) loans, which areno longer guaranteed by FmHA. It is the policy of FmHA to guarantee loansmade to any otherwise qualified applicant without regard to race, color,religion, sex, national origin, marital status, age or physical/mentalhandicap, providing the applicant can execute a legal contract. These regulationsapply to lenders, holders, borrowers, FmHA personnel, and other partiesinvolved in making, guaranteeing, holding, servicing, or liquidating suchloans. Exhibit A provides policies and procedures for an Approved LenderProgram (ALP) for Guaranteed Operating (OL) loans, and Guaranteed FarmOwnership (FO) loans. Exhibit C (available in any FmHA office) providesan Application Processing guide for lenders packaging applications underthis subpart. Exhibit D provides policies and procedures for an InterestRate Buydown Program for Guaranteed Operating (OL) loans including linesof credit, Guaranteed Farm Ownership (FO) loans including lines of credit,Guaranteed Farm Ownership (FO) loans and Guaranteed Soil and Water (SW)loans. Exhibit E provides policies and procedures for a Demonstration Projectfor purchase of certain Farm Credit System Acquired Farm Land. ExhibitF provides the precedures for the recapturing of shared appreciation whena lender requests a write down on the debt.(b) <T3>Program administration. </T3>Farmer Programs are administered by theFmHA Administrator through a State Director, who serves each State throughDistrict Directors and County Supervisors. The County Supervisor is thefocal point for the program and is the local contact person for processingand servicing activities, even though this subpart refers in various placesto the duties and responsibilities of other FmHA employees.(c) <T3>Administrative provisions. </T3>Within this subpart there are administrativeprovisions which, for the benefit of the State Directors, District Directors,and County Supervisors, set out the internal duties and responsibilitiesof FmHA personnel and outline the procedures to be followed in carryingout the requirements of the program. These provisions are identified as``ADMINISTRATIVE'' and correspond to the sections of this subpart whichthey follow.(d) <T3>References. </T3>Sections 1980.101_1980.174 pertain to the FO, EM,OL, RL, and SW loan programs. The requirements set forth in Subpart A ofPart 1980 of this chapter which are not in conflict with the provisionsset forth in this subpart must be met.(e) <T3>Type of guarantee.</T3>_(1) <T3>Loan Note Guarantee. </T3>Lenders desiring to sell the guaranteed portionof fixed amount and term loans will use the method contained in SubpartA of this part. In accordance with that method, loans may be made by alender and guaranteed by issuance of Form FmHA 449-34, ``Loan Note Guarantee.''(2) <T3>Contract of Guarantee </T3>(Operating Loans_Line of Credit only). Lendersdesiring a guarantee on a ``line of credit'' will use the method containedin Subpart A of this part. Line of credit loans are guaranteed by FormFmHA 1980-27, ``Contract of Guarantee (Line of Credit).'' The amount ofloan may not exceed the line of credit ceiling set forth in the contract.This procedure will be followed for operating purposes_line of credit only.(See andSection; 1980.175(c)(2) of this Subpart.)<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 1980.102_1980.105 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.106 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Abbreviations and definitions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Abbreviations. </T3>See andSection; 1980.6 of Subpart A of this part.(b) <T3>Definitions. </T3>The following definitions are applicable to the termsused in this subpart. Additional definitions may be found in andSection;1980.6 of Subpart A of this part.(1) <T3>Applicant. </T3>The party applying for a guaranteed loan or line ofcredit.(2) <T3>Approval official. </T3>An FmHA field official who has been delegatedloan and grant approval authorities within applicable loan programs, subjectto the dollar limitations contained in tables available in any FmHA office.(3) <T3>Aquaculture. </T3>The husbandry of aquatic organisms in a controlledor selected environment. An aquatic organism is any fish (as defined inthis section), amphibian, reptile, or aquatic plant. An aquaculture operationis considered to be a farm only if it is conducted on the grounds whichthe applicant owns, leases, or has an exclusive right to use. An exclusiveright to use must be evidenced by a permit issued to the applicant andthe permit must specifically identify the waters available to be used bythe applicant only.(4) <T3>Borrower. </T3>When a loan is made to an individual, the individualis the lender's borrower. When a loan is made to an entity, the corporation,cooperative, partnership, or joint operation is the lender's borrower.(5) <T3>Cooperative. </T3>An entity which has farming as its purpose and whosemembers have agreed to share the profits of the farming enterprise. Theentity must be recognized as a farm cooperative by the laws of the State(s)in which the entity will operate a farm(s).(6) <T3>Corporation. </T3>For the purpose of this subpart, a private domesticcorporation recognized as a corporation by the laws of the State(s) inwhich the entity will operate a farm(s).(7) <T3>Family farm. </T3>A farm which:(i) Produces agricutlural commodities for sale in sufficient quantitiesso that it is recognized in the community as a farm rather than a ruralresidence.(ii) Provides enough agricultural income by itself, including rented land,or together with any other dependable income to enable the borrower to:(A) Pay necessary family living and operating expenses.(B) Maintain essential chattel and real property.(C) Pay debts.(iii) Is managed by:(A) The borrower when a loan is made to an individual.(B) The members, stockholders, partners, or joint operators responsiblefor operating the farm when a loan is made to a cooperative, corporation,partnership, or joint operation.(iv) Has a substantial amount of the labor requirements for the farm andnonfarm enterprise provided by:(A) The borrower and the borrower's immediate family for a loan made toan individual.(B) The members, stockholders, partners, or joint operators responsiblefor operating the farm, along with the families of these individuals, fora loan made to a cooperative, corporation, partnership, or joint operation.(v) May use a reasonable amount of full-time hired labor and seasonal laborduring peak load periods.(8) <T3>Farm. </T3>A tract or tracts of land, improvements, and other appurtenancesconsidered to be farm property which is used or will be used in the productionof crops, livestock, and/or aquacultural products for sale in sufficientquantities so that the property is recognized as a farm rather than a ruralresidence. The term ``farm'' also includes any such land and improvementsand facilities used in a nonfarm enterprise. It may also include a residencewhich, although physically separate from the farm acreage, is ordinarilytreated as part of the farm in the local community.(9) <T3>Fish. </T3>Any aquatic, gilled animal commonly known as ``fish'' aswell as mollusks, or crustaceans (or other invertebrates) produced undercontrolled conditions (that is, feeding, tending, harvesting and such otheractivities as are necessary to properly raise and market the products)in ponds, lakes, streams, or similar holding areas.(10) <T3>Fixture. </T3>Generally an item attached to a building or other structureor to land in such a way that it cannot be removed without defacing ordismantling the structure, or substantially damaging the structure itself.(11) <T3>Joint Operation. </T3>Individuals that have agreed to operate a farmor farms together as a business unit. The real and personal property isowned separately or jointly by the individuals. For example, husband andwife who apply for a loan together will be considered a joint operation.(12) <T3>Majority interest. </T3>Any individual or a combination of individualsowning more than a 50 percent interest in a cooperative, corporation, jointoperation, or partnership.(13) <T3>Market value. </T3>The amount which an informed and willing buyer wouldpay an informed and willing but not forced seller in a completely voluntarysale.(14) <T3>Mortgage. </T3>Any form of security interest or lien upon any rightsor interest in real property of any kind. In Louisiana and Puerto Ricothe term ``mortgage'' also refers to any security interest in chattel property.(15) <T3>Nonfarm enterprise. </T3>Any nonfarm business enterprise, includingrecreation, which is closely associated with the farm operation and locatedon or adjacent to the farm and provides income to supplement farm income.The business must provide goods or services for which there is a need anda reasonably reliable market. This may include, but is not limited to,such enterprises as raising earthworms, exotic birds, tropical fish, dogs,and horses for nonfarm purposes, welding shops, roadside stands, boardinghorses and riding stables.(16) <T3>Partnership. </T3>Any entity consisting of individuals who have agreedto operate a farm. The entity must be recognized as a partnership by lawsof the State(s) in which the entity will operate a farm and must be authorizedto own both real estate and personal property and to incur debts in itsown name.(17) <T3>Positive cash flow. </T3>A positive cash flow must indicate that allof the anticipated cash farm and non-farm income equals or exceeds allthe anticipated cash outflows plus the planned reserve for the plannedperiod. Production records and prices used in the preparation of a positivecash flow will be in accordance with andSection; 1980.113(d)(8) of this subpart.A positive cash flow must show that a borrower will be at least able to:(i) Pay all operating expenses and all taxes which are due during the projectedfarm budget period.(ii) Meet scheduled payments on all open accounts and carryover debts includingdelinquent taxes.(iii) Provide a reserve of at least 10 percent in addition to the loaninstallments due and payable as recorded in Table K of the Farm and HomePlan or other similar plans of operation acceptable to FmHA. The reservewill allow for new investments, risk and uncertainties associated withthe farming operation.(iv) Provide living expenses for an individual borrower and that borrower'sfamily members of for the farm operator in the case of a cooperative, corporation,partnership, or joint operation borrower and that operator's family memberswhich is in accordance with the essential family needs. Family membersinclude the immediate members of the family which reside in the same household.(18) <T3>Recreation enterprise. </T3>An outdoor enterprise which generates incomeand supplements or supplants farm or ranch income.(19) <T3>Related by blood or marriage.</T3> As used in this Subpart, individualswho are connected to one another as husband, wife, parent, child, brother,or sister.(20) <T3>Security.</T3> Property of any kind subject to a real or personal propertylien. Any reference to ``collateral'' or ``security property'' shall beconsidered a reference to the term ``security.''(21)<T3> State or United States.</T3> The United States itself, each of theseveral States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands ofthe United States, Guam, American Samoa, and the Commonwealth of the NorthernMariana Islands.(22) <T3>Subsequent loans.</T3> Any loans processed by the Finance Office afterit processes an initial loan for a borrower.(23)<T3> Veteran.</T3> One who has been discharged or released from the activeforces of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps or CoastGuard under conditions other than dishonorable, who served on active dutyin such forces: (1) during the period of April 6, 1917, through March 31,1921; (2) during the period of December 7, 1941, through December 31, 1946;(3) during the period of June 27, 1950, through January 31, 1955; or (4)for a period of more than 180 days, any part of which occurred after January31, 1955, but on or before May 7, 1975. Discharges under conditions otherthan dishonorable include ``clemency discharges.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.107</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Full faith and credit.</ITAG>See andSection; 1980.11 of Subpart A of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.108</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General provisions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Security, personal and corporate guarantees, and other requirements.</T3>See andSection;andSection; 1980.175(h), 1980.180(f) and 1980.185(f) of thissubpart for specific security requirements for the type of loan or lineof credit being considered.(1)<T3> Security.</T3> (i) The lender is responsible for seeing that properand adequate security is obtained and maintained in existence and of recordto protect the interest of the lender, the holder, and FmHA.(ii) All security must secure the entire loan/line of credit. The lendermay not take separate security to secure only that portion of the loan/lineof credit not covered by the guarantee. The lender may not require compensatingbalances or certificates of deposit as a means of eliminating the lender'sexposure on the unguaranteed portion of the loan/line of credit. However,compensating balances or certificates of deposit as used in the ordinarycourse of business are not prohibited.(iii) When FmHA and a guaranteed lender are involved in separate loansto the <T3>same borrower,</T3> separate collateral must be clearly identifiedfor both the FmHA and the lender's loan. Different lien positions on realestate are considered separate collateral. FmHA will not subordinate anyinterest in property which secures as insured loan, except it may do sowhen crops are involved to permit a guaranteed lender to advance fundsand perfect its security interest in the crop.(iv) When the lender is involved in both a guaranteed loan and an unguaranteedloan to the same borrower and there will be like collateral for each, theguaranteed loan(s) must be adequately secured by a lien on separate collateralthat is clearly identifiable or a lien of higher priority if the same collateralis used to secure both loans. When the same collateral secures both loans,the lender must agree in writing that scheduled installments on the guaranteedloan will be paid first.(2) <T3>Personal and corporate guarantees.</T3> (i) for FO, SW and OL loans/linesof credit, personal guarantees from all partners of a partnership, andall joint operators of a joint operation will be required. The lender and/orFmHA also may require that such guarantees be secured.(ii) For OL loans/lines of credit, personal guarantees from principal membersof cooperatives, and stockholders of corporations, will be required. Forthis purpose, any member or stockholder owning or controlling a 20 percentinterest in a cooperative or corporation is considered a principal memberor stockholder. If no member or stockholder owns or controls at least a20 percent interest, all members or stockholders will be considered principalmembers or stockholders. For FO, and SW loans, personal guarantees frommembers holding a majority interest in cooperatives, and stockholders ofcorporations, will be required. Guarantees of parent, subsidiary, or affiliatedcompanies may also be required. Guarantees will be required on an amountwhich reasonably assures repayment of the loan/line of credit and providessufficient security. If a review of all credit factors indicates the needfor additional security, the lender and/or FmHA may require additionalpersonal and corporate guarantees. The lender and/or FmHA also requirethat such guarantees be secured.(iii) The lender may ask FmHA to make an exception to the requirement forpersonal or entity guarantees if the proposed guarantors cannot providesuch guarantees due to other existing contractual obligations or legalrestrictions. Applicants will give the lender written evidence of any suchobligations or restrictions. FmHA's concurrence is required before an exceptionis made.(iv) <T3>Guarantors of applicants will:</T3>(A) In the case of personal guarantees, provide current financial statements(not over 90 days old at time of filing) signed by the guarantors, anddisclosing community or homestead property.(B) In the case of corporate guarantees, provide current financial statements(not over 90 days old at time of filing) certified by an officer of thecorporation.(3) <T3>Other requirements.</T3> (i) The lender must ascertain that there areno claims or liens of laborers, materialmen, contractors, subcontractors,suppliers of machinery and equipment, or other parties against the securityof the borrower, and that no suits are pending or threatened that wouldadversely affect the borrower's interest in the collateral when the securityinstruments are filed when final loan disbursement is made.(ii) Appropriate hazard insurance with a standard mortgage clause namingthe lender as beneficiary may be required by the lender when deemed necessary.(iii) The lender will encourage any borrower who grows crops to obtainand maintain Federal Crop Insurance Corporation (FCIC) crop insurance ormulti-peril crop insurance, if it is available.(iv) When the lender believes it is necessary, life insurance will be requiredfor the individual borrower or all members of the entity borrower and willbe assigned or pledged to the lender. This life insurance may be decreasingterm insurance. A schedule of life insurance available will be includedas part of the application.(v) Worker's Compensation Insurance will be obtained as required by Statelaw.(vi) The requirements found in Exhibit M to Subpart G of Part 1940 of thischapter will be met.(b) <T3>Preference.</T3> When it appears that available funds will be inadequateto meet the needs of all applicants, the following preference will apply;(1) An application on hand from a veteran as defined in andSection; 1980.106(b)(23)of this subpart will be given preference by the lender over an applicationfrom a nonveteran on file at the same time.(2) An application on hand from an FmHA insured loan borrower will be givenpreference over one from an applicant who does not have an FmHA insuredloan.(3) An application for a loan for land purchase from an applicant who hasa dependent family; or is an owner of livestock and farm implements necessaryto successfully carry on a farming operation; or is able to make downpaymentswill be given preference over one from an applicant who does not meet anyof these criteria.(c) <T3>Determining whether credit is available.</T3> The lender will certifyon the appropriate forms that the applicant is unable to obtain the requestedloans/lines of credit without the guarantee from the Government. Propertyand interests in property owned and income received by an individual applicant,a cooperative and its members as individuals, a corporation and its stockholdersas individuals, a joint operation and the joint operators as individuals,and a partnership and its members as individuals will be considered andused by an applicant in obtaining credit without a guarantee.(d) <T3>Relationship between FmHA loans, insured and guaranteed.</T3> (1) Borrowersindebted to FmHA and/or an FmHA guaranteed lender for EE loans, may beconsidered for FO or SW guaranteed loans, or OL guaranteed loans/linesof credit, provided the total outstanding principal indebtedness for EE,FO, RL, SW, or OL guaranteed or insured loans/lines of credit to FmHA and/oran FmHA guaranteed lender would not exceed $650,000.(2) A guaranteed FO or OL loan may be made to an insured borrower withthe same type of loan provided:(i) The outstanding combined insured and guaranteed FO or OL principalbalance owned by the loan applicant or owed by anyone who will sign thenote as cosigner may not exceed the authorized guaranteed loan limit forthat type of loan.(ii) Chattel and/or real estate security must be separate and identifiablefrom the security pledged to FmHA for an insured loan. Different lien positionson real estate are considered separate and identifiable collateral.<ITAG tagnum="73">Administrative</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The County Supervisor will determine whether the lender is requiringadequate security. If necessary, the assistance of the District Directoror Farmer Programs Staff will be obtained.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1980.109 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Promissory notes, line of credit agreements, security instruments,and financing statements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Promissory notes, line of credit agreements, mortgages, and securityagreements. </T3>The lender will use its own promissory notes, line ofcredit agreements, real estate mortgages (including deeds of trust andsimilar instruments), and security agreements (including chattel mortgagesin Louisiana and Puerto Rico), provided such forms do not contain any provisionsthat are in conflict or are inconsistent with the provisions of this subpartor Subpart A of this part.(1) Repayment Schedules_In order for notes to be acceptable, the principaland interest repayment schedules will be clearly shown in the note(s).Use of a note with a ``payment on demand'' feature is not permissible unlessit is modified by a supplemental agreement in the form of an allonge tothe note or other legally effective amendment which waives the demand featureand sets forth the repayment schedule.(2) Signatures_Except in those unusual circumstances where an exemptionis obtained in accordance with andSection;1980.108 of this subpart the promissorynote will be signed as follows:(i) Individuals. Only one person will sign the note as a borrower. If acosigner is needed, the cosigner will also sign the note.(ii) Partnerships or joint operations. The note will be executed by thepartner or joint operator authorized to sign for the entity, and all partnersin the partnership or joint operators in the joint operation, as cosigners.(iii) Corporations or cooperatives_OL guaranteed loans/lines of credit.The promissory note(s) or line of credit agreement(s) will be executedso as to evidence liability of the entity as well as each principal memberor stockholder as an individual. Any member or stockholder owning or controllinga 20 percent interest in a cooperative or corporation is considered a principalmember or stockholder. If no member, partner, or stockholder owns or controlsat least a 20 percent interest, all members or stockholders will be consideredprincipal member stockholders.(iv) Corporations or cooperatives_FO and SW guaranteed loans. The promissorynote(s) will be executed so as to evidence liability of the entity as wellas liability of member(s) or stockholder(s) holding a majority interestin the entity as individuals.(b) <T3>Financing statements. </T3>Commercial financing statement forms thatcomply with State laws and regulations may be used. They must be adaptedto meet FmHA requirements by inserting provisions:(1) Covering the ``proceeds and products'' of the collateral described,and(2) Stating that ``disposition of the collateral is not authorized hereby.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1980.110 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Loan subsidy rates, claims, and payments (for EM actual loss loansonly).</ITAG>Loan subsides are payments made by FmHA to lenders to induce them to serviceand collect guaranteed EM loans. (a) <T3>Subsidy rates. </T3>FmHA will establish subsidy rates periodically.Thus, the subsidy rate may vary from time to time. However, the subsidyrate set forth in the Loan Note Guarantee will remain constant during thelife of the loan guarantee. The subsidy rate will be a rate equal to thedifference, if any, between the interest rate charged to the borrower andany higher annual rate prevailing in the private market for similar loansas determined by the Secretary of Agriculture. The lender may contact thelocal County Supervisor servicing the area to obtain the current subsidyrate. (See FmHA Instruction 440.1, Exhibit B, a copy of which is availablein any FmHA Office.)(b) <T3>Annual subsidy claims and payments. </T3>The initial subsidy claimwill be prepared by the lender using Form FmHA 1980-24, ``Request InterestRate Buydown/Subsidy Payment to Guaranteed Loan Lender,'' on or about 12months from the date of the note. The original will be mailed by the lenderto the County Supervisor. Subsequent subsidy claims will be filed by thelender on or about 12 months thereafter, but no later than the anniversarydate of the filing of the initial subsidy claim. Upon full payment of anote the lender will immediately prepare Form FmHA 1980-24 and mail theoriginal to the County Supervisor.(c) <T3>When subsidy payments cease. </T3>When FmHA purchases a guaranteedportion of a loan, subsidy payments on that portion will cease. Loan subsidypayments will also cease when the Loan Note Guarantee terminates.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection;1980.111-1980.112 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1980.113 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Receiving and processing applications.</ITAG>An applicant and/or lender may file either a preliminary or complete application.In either case, the requirements of andSection;1980.46 of Subpart A of thispart must be met. A preliminary application may be used when an applicantor lender wants FmHA to determine eligibility, feasibility, or the availabilityof guaranteed authority before filing a complete application. Exhibit Cof this subpart (available in any FmHA office) may be used by leaders forsubmitting applications under this subpart. The County Supervisor willcooperate with the lender and applicant and will provide appropriate assistancein connection with loan/line of credit application processes. The degreeof this assistance will be determined by the lender's experience with FmHAguaranteed loan processing, the lender's farm lending experience, and thecomplexity of the proposal. The lender and applicant should contact thelocal FmHA office serving the area where the farming operation is conductedfor guidance and assistance in preparing the request and for obtainingthe guarantee. The County Supervisor will provide copies of all applicableFmHA forms and regulations.(a) <T3>Preliminary application. </T3>This will consist of:(1) Form FmHA 410-1, ``Application for FmHA Services.'' For applicationsto be processed under the Approved Lender feature set out in Exhibit Aof this subpart, Form FmHA 410-1 need only reflect the name, address, telephonenumber, purpose of the loan or line of credit, and date and signature ofthe applicant, provided the information requested on the form is providedon an attached alternative document such as the lender's application form,the FmHA Request for Loan Note Guarantee/Contract of Guarantee, etc.(2) Verification of off-farm employment, if any.(3) Commercial credit report or other information concerning an applicant'scredit history.(4) For a cooperative, corporation, partnership, or joint operation, thoseadditional items listed in andSection;1980.113(b) of this subpart.(5) Any proposed line of credit agreement.(b) <T3>Cooperative, corporation, partnership, or joint operation applicants.</T3>If the applicant is a cooperative, corporation, partnership, or jointoperation, the following additional information will be obtained and includedin the loan docket:(1) A complete list of members, stockholders, partners, or joint operatorsshowing the address, citizenship, principal occupation, and the numberof shares and percentage of ownership or of stock held in the cooperativeor corporation, by each, or the percentage of interest held in the partnershipor joint operation, by each.(2) A current personal financial statement from all members of a cooperative,joint operators of a joint operation, partners of a partnership, or stockholdersof a corporation.(3) A current financial statement from the cooperative, corporation, partnership,or joint operation itself. (4) A copy of the cooperative's or corporation's charter, or any partnershipor joint operation agreement, any articles of incorporation and bylaws,any certificate or evidence of current registration (good standing), anda resolution(s) adopted by the Board of Directors or members or stockholdersauthorizing specified officers of the cooperative, corporation, partnership,or joint operation to apply for and obtain the desired loan and executerequired debt, security, and other instruments and agreements. (c) <T3>Preliminary determination by FmHA. </T3>If it appears, after a reviewof the preliminary application, that the applicant is not eligible, theCounty Supervisor will notify the loan applicant and the lender in writingwithin 5 calendar days of FmHA's decision of all the reasons for the decisionand advise them of their opportunity for an appeal, as set out in SubpartB of Part 1900 of this chapter, if applicable. If it appears that the applicantis eligible and loan guarantee funding authority is available, the CountySupervisor will inform the lender and applicant not later than 10 calendardays after receipt of the preliminary application and request the lenderto submit a complete application. (d) <T3>Complete application. </T3>The complete application will consist of:(1) Those items listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section. (2) Applicable items required by andSection;andSection; 1980.40, 1980.41, 1980.42,1980.43, 1980.44 and 1980.45 of Subpart A of this part. (3) Form FmHA 449-12, ``Request for Loan Note Guarantee (Farmer ProgramLoans),'' or Form FmHA 1980-25, ``Request for Guarantee (Operating Loan/Lineof Credit, Emergency Livestock Loan, or Economic Emergency Loan).'' (4) A copy of any lease, contract or agreement entered into by the applicantwhich may be pertinent to the consideration of the application, or whena written lease is not obtainable, a statement setting forth the termsand conditions of the agreement will be included in the loan docket. (5) Form FmHA 440-32, ``Request for Statement of Debts and Collateral,''or similar documentation provided by Approved Lenders. (6) Notices of compliance with the Privacy Act of 1974. (7) Proposed loan agreements or line of credit agreements when a Contractof Guarantee is requested, between the applicant and lender. (See paragraphVII of Form FmHA 449-35, ``Lender's Agreement,'' or paragraph VII of FormFmHA 1980-38, ``Lender's Agreement.'') Loan Agreements of Line of CreditAgreements will include <T3>at least the following</T3>: (i) Any improved management practices to be implemented. (ii) Requirements for accounting and recordkeeping and periodic financialreporting. Line of credit agreements will require the borrower to submitannual financial statements and cash flow projections prepared in accordancewith paragraph (d)(3) of this section. (iii) A list of security for the loan/line of credit and plans for at leastan annual accounting for security. (iv) Prohibitions against assuming liabilities or obligations of others.(v) Restrictions on patronage refunds, if the applicant is a cooperative;dividend payments, if the applicant is a corporation; or distribution ofnet income, if the applicant is a partnership or joint operation. (vi) Limitations on purchase or sale of equipment and/or fixed assets.(vii) Limits on compensation of officers and/or owners if not a sole proprietorship.(viii) Minimum working capital requirements. (ix) Maximum debt to asset ratio. (x) Restrictions concerning consolidation, mergers or other circumstancesif the applicant is a corporate entity. (xi) Purposes for which loan funds or funds advanced under the line ofcredit will be used. (xii) Interest rate. (xiii) The plan for repayment, reamortization, or rescheduling of the loanor line of credit. (xiv) Establishment of the period of time (1, 2 or 3 years) and the ceiling($ amount) for lines of credit. (8) Production history and operation forecast must also be provided bythe lender and/or applicant. Financial and production history must includethe past 5 years. The information will also include current financial condition;projected production; income and expenses; and loan/line of credit repaymentplan. Forms ordinarily used by the lender or Form FmHA 431-2, ``Farm andHome Plan,'' Form FmHA 431-1, ``Long-Time Farm and Home Plan,'' or FormFmHA 1924-1, ``Development Plan,'' may be used, or other similar plansof operation acceptable to FmHA. (i) Lenders will use the following sources of price information to developoperation forecast projections: (A) Futures market price less the recognized basis points for the area,documented by date, location, time and degree of use. (B) Government loan rates, i.e., ASCS target prices. (C) Published current market prices. (D) The negotiated price in any forward contract. (E) Prices developed by the State land grant university for the time ofcrop sale. (F) For specialty crops, the average of three previous years' prices, <T3>only </T3>if the above data is not available. (ii) Lenders will use the following guidelines for estimating crop yields:(A) for existing farmers, actual production/yields for the past 5 yearswill be utilized.(B) For those farmers with less than a 5 year production/yield history,the actual production history will be utilized.(C) For those beginning farmers, consider the use of Agricultural and StabilizationConservation Service (ASCS) records, Cooperative Extension Service (CES)data, State averages, County averages or any other reliable sources ofinformation that are agreeable with the lender and the applicant.(D) When an accurate projection cannot be made because the applicant'sproduction history has been affected by a disaster(s) declared by the Presidentor designated by the Secretary of Agriculture, County average yields willbe used for the disaster year(s). If the applicant's disaster year's(s')yields are less than the County average yields, County average yields willbe used for that year(s). If County average yields are not available yieldswill be used.(9) Appraisals_(i) <T3>Appraisal Report.</T3> (A) Real estate or chattel property that willserve as collateral for a loan/line of credit will be appraised. Appraisalreports may be on forms approved by the lender and/or Form FmHA 422-1,``Appraisal Report Farm Tract,'' and Form FmHA 440-21, ``Appraisal of ChattelProperty.''(B) A real estate appraisal report will be based on at least two comparablesales made within 2 years. If the real estate has been appraised by FmHAor by a qualified appraiser within the last 12 months and if no significantchanges in the market value of real estate have occurred in the area withinthe past 12-month period, a new appraisal does not have to be made.(C) A chattel appraisal is required when an initial loan is made and chattelsare taken as security.(ii) <T3>Appraiser Qualifications.</T3> The lender is responsible for substantiatingthe appraiser's qualifications. The lender will obtain FmHA's concurrencethat the appraiser has the necessary qualifications and experience beforethe lender will utilize the appraiser in any appraisal work. If FmHA isnot familiar with the appraiser, the lender will submit a recent appraisalcompleted by the appraiser. The appraiser completing the report must meet<T3>one</T3> of the following qualifications in the following order ofpreference:(A) Certification by a National or State appraisal society.(B) If a certified appraiser is not available, the lender may use otherqualified appraisers, if the lender can establish that the appraiser meetsthe criteria for certification in a National or State appraisal society.(C) The appraiser has recent, relevant, documented appraisal experienceor training, or other factors clearly establish the appraiser's qualifications.(10) The lender's plan for servicing the loan/line of credit and any planfor providing management assistance to the borrower, including the stepsnecessary to see that the requirements of the loan agreement are met.(11) Notices of compliance with the Privacy Act of 1974.(12) Applicable items required in Subpart G of Part 1940 of this chapter,including SCS Form CPA-26, ``Highly Erodible Land and Wetland ConservationDetermination,'' and Form AD-1026, ``Highly Erodible Land and Wetland ConservationCertification,'' as specified in Exhibit M to Subpart G of Part 1940 ofthis chapter.<ITAG tagnum="74">Administrative</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. Regardless of whether the applicant is acting as an individualor as a representative of a cooperative, corporation, partnership, or jointoperation, when FmHA solicits personal information, the individual willbe given FmHA 401-9, ``Statement Required by the Privacy Act.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. If FmHA desires to obtain information concerning an individualfrom any source, FmHA will provide such source with Form FmHA 410-10, ``PrivacyAct Statement to References.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. Immediately after a preliminary or complete application is received,and prior to County Committee action, the County Supervisor will send Attachment1 to Exhibit D of this subpart to the borrower and lender describing theInterest Rate Buydown Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.114</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">FmHA evaluation of applications.</ITAG>When the County Supervisor receives a complete application, the properindependent investigations, inspections, and appraisal reviews will bemade to determine whether the applicant is eligible, whether the proposedloan/line of credit is for authorized purposes, whether there is reasonableassurance of a positive cash flow projection, and whether there is sufficientcollateral and equity. The determination will be recorded on Form FmHA449-23, ``Guaranteed Loan Evaluation (Farmer Programs).'' This evaluationis for the benefit of FmHA, not the lender. The County Supervisor willnotify participants in the Approved Lender Program within three workingdays whether an application submitted is complete and acceptable. Nonapprovedlenders will be advised on the completeness of applications within 14 workingdays. This requirement is contingent upon the availability of a CountySupervisor during the prescribed timeframe, and employment ceilings affectingFmHA.(a) <T3>Indication of unacceptability. </T3>If the application for a guaranteecannot be approved for reasons that would not be affected by the CountyCommittee certification, the County Supervisor will so inform the lenderand the loan applicant in writing within 5 working days of the decision.Factual reasons for the decision will be clearly set forth along with noticeof the opportunity for an appeal as set out in Subpart B of Part 1900 ofthis chapter.(b) <T3>Indication of acceptability. </T3>If the evaluation indicates thatthe guarantee may be approved, the County Supervisor will present the applicationto the County Committee for certification or rejection.<ITAG tagnum="74">Administrative</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">The County Supervisor will:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. Determine if the material and information submitted is complete.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. Determine that a positive cash flow projection as defined in andSection;1980.106(b)(17) of this subpart can be reasonably achieved.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. Determine if the proposed collateral is adequate, repayment planrealistic, and loan agreement is satisfactory.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. Determine that the requirements of andSection;andSection; 1980.40 through1980.45 of Subpart A of this part and those found in Exhibit M to SubpartG of Part 1940 of this chapter are met.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. Follow the requirements of Subpart G of Part 1940 of this chapter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.115</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">County Committee review.</ITAG>The County Committee will review completed loan applications within 30calendar days (or 14 calendar days when possible, if a participant in theApproved Lender Program is involved) to determine whether the applicantsmeet FmHA eligibility requirements. The County Supervisor will promptlynotify the lender and applicant in writing of the County Committee's determination.(See andSection; 1980.115 Administrative paragraph B of this subpart.)(a) <T3>Favorable action. </T3>If the County Committee finds the applicanteligible, the members will sign form FmHA 440-2, ``County Committee Certificationor Recommendation.'' This form will be retained in the County Office file.When the applicant has been determined eligible for assistance and additionalinformation becomes available before issuance of the conditional commitmentthat indicates the original determination may be in error, the applicantwill be reconsidered by the County Committee taking the new informationinto account. The County Committee will then recertify whether or not theapplicant continues to meet eligibility requirements by the use of FormFmHA 440-2. Proper notification as to action taken will be sent to theapplicant.(b) <T3>Unfavorable action. </T3>If the County Committee finds the applicantineligible, the members will complete Form FmHA 440-2 and the County Supervisorwill inform the lender and the loan applicant in writing within 10 calendardays of FmHA's decision of the reasons for disapproval and of their opportunityfor an appeal as set out in Subpart B of Part 1900 of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="74">Administrative</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. After County Committee certification is obtained, the County Supervisorwill:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Prepare Form FmHA 1940-1, ``Request for Obligation of Funds,''and, for initial loans/lines of credit only, Form FmHA 1980-50, ``Add,Delete, or Change Guaranteed Loan Borrower Information,'' in accordancewith the Forms Manual Insert (FMI).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Prepare Form FmHA 449-14, ``Conditional Commitment for Guarantee,''or Form FmHA 1980-15, Conditional Commitment for Contract of Guarantee(Line of Credit).'' In no case will Form FmHA 449-14 or 1980-15 be executedprior to the determination of availability of funds for the loan/line ofcredit. Any special conditions of approval will be listed in the spaceprovided on the form, including requirements for security, improved managementpractices, and the type and frequency of financial report required by FmHAbut not required by the lender. An attachment to the form may be used ifnecessary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Forward the loan docket to the appropriate approval official ifthe loan/line of credit is not within the County Supervisor's approvalauthority.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The approval official will:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Approve or disapprove all guaranteed applications not later than45 calendar days after receipt of completed applications, execute FormsFmHA 1940-1, 449-14 and/or 1980-15 and distribute the copies in accordancewith the FMI. In order to meet the prompt approval requirement when fundsare temporarily exhausted and the loan will be approved, Form FmHA 1940-1must be signed. The following approval condition will be included, underSection 41, ``Comments and Requirements of Certifying Official,'' for guaranteedFarmer Program loans.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``This loan guarantee is approved subject to the availability of funds.If this loan guarantee is not issued for any reason within 90 calendardays from the date of approval on this document, the approval officialmay request updated information concerning the lender and the loan applicant.The approval official will have 14 working days to review any updated informationand decide whether to submit this document for obligation of funds.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">When funds are exhausted, a Conditional Commitment for Guarantee <T3>will not </T3>be executed until such time as funds become availableand have been obligated in connection with the guarantee request.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Set forth in the space provided on Form FmHA 449-14 (A.2. above)or Form FmHA 1980-15 (A.2. above) any special conditions of approval, includingrequirements for security, improved management practices relating to highlyerodible land and conversion of wetland found in Exhibit M of Subpart Gof Part 1940 of this chapter, and type and frequency of financial reportsrequired by FmHA but not required by the lender. When Form FmHA 1980-15is executed, the approval official will add the the requirement that thelender will submit to FmHA a current financial statement and cash flowprepared in accordance with andSection; 1980.113(d)(8) of this subpart forprior approval of advances to be made for the second and third years ofa line of credit. The loan approval official will also include the followingrequirement as condition of approval for either Conditional Commitment:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">``The lender agrees that, if liquidation of the account becomes imminent,the lender will consider the borrower for an Interest Rate Buydown underExhibit D of Subpart B of 7 CFR Part 1980, and request a determinationof the borower's eligibility by FmHA. The lender may not initiate foreclosureaction on the loan (or line of credit if Form FmHA 1980-15 is used) until60 calendar days after a determination has been made with respect to theeligibility of the borrower to participate in the Interest Rate BuydownProgram.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. An attachment to the form may be used, if necessary. Return FormsFmHA 449-14 or FmHA 1980-15 to the County Supervisor for execution andproper distribution. When Form FmHA 1980-15 is executed the approval officialwill add the requirement that the lender will submit to FmHA a currentfinancial statement and cash flow prepared in accordance with andSection;1980.113(d)(8) of this Subpart for prior approval of advances made forthe second and third years of a line of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Forward the loan docket to the appropriate approval official ifthe loan/line of credit exceeds the State Director's approval authorityor when the State Director needs assistance in handling any complaintsof noncompliance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. In addition to the requirements in paragraph B.1. above, determinationswill be made within 14 working days of County Committee Certification forApproved Lenders, if possible, and within 45 calendar days of receipt ofa completed application for nonapproved lenders.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.116</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review of requirements.</ITAG>The lender and applicant, after reviewing approval conditions and securityrequirements as set forth in Form FmHA 449-14 or Form FmHA 1980-15 willcomplete and execute the ``Acceptance or Rejection of Conditions'' andreturn a copy to the County Supervisor. If the conditions cannot be met,the lender and applicant may propose alternatives to the County Supervisor.These alternatives will be considered and the lender will be advised ofFmHA's decision to accept or reject the alternatives. If accepted, FormFmHA 449-14 or FmHA 1980-15 will be so revised. If rejected, the CountySupervisor will notify the loan applicant and the lender in writing within10 calendar days of FmHA's decision as set out in Subpart A of Part 1910of this chapter, of all the specific reasons for the decision, and advisesthem of their opportunity for appeal as set out in Subpart B of Part 1900of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.117</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conditions precedent to issuance of the Loan Note Guarantee or Contractof Guarantee.</ITAG>See andSection; 1980.60 of Subpart A of this part. The provisions of andSection;1980.60(a)(2) and (8) are <T3>not</T3> applicable to Farmer Program loans.<ITAG tagnum="73">Administrative</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The County Supervisor will:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. Consult with the lender and applicant concerning any changes madeto the initially issued or revised Form FmHA 449-14 or FmHA 1980-15. Acopy of Form FmHA 449-14 or FmHA 1980-15 and any amendments will be includedin the file.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. Review the loan agreement between the borrower and lender whichprovides for the periodic submission of financial statements to the CountySupervisor.<T3> An annual analysis report of the farming operation will be required.</T3>In line of credit cases, the County Supervisor will review the lender therequirement that the lender is to submit a current financial statementand cash flow prepared in accordance with andSection; 1980.113(d)(8) of thissubpart for prior approval of advances made in the second and third yearsof a line of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. Review plans for inspection on construction projects.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. Review basic credit requirements of all loans/lines of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. Review cost overruns, if any, and how they will be met.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.118</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Issuance of Lender's Agreement, Loan Note Guarantee, Contract of Guarantee,and Assignment Guarantee Agreement.</ITAG>(a) See andSection; 1980.61 of Subpart A of this part.(b) A guaranteed portion of the loan may not be sold by the lender untilthe loan has been fully disbursed to the borrower. The guaranteed portionof a line of credit will never be sold or assigned by the lender exceptas provided in paragraph III of Form FmHA 1980-38, ``Lender's Agreement(Line of Credit).''(c) The amount to be entered in the blank in paragraph IX. C.5. of FormFmHA 449-35 ``Lender's Agreement,'' or paragraph IX. C.5. of Form FmHA1980-38 for a loan secured by chattels, will be the lesser of $10,000 or20 percent of the loan/line of credit for OL loan/line of credit purposes.<ITAG tagnum="73">Administrative</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Section 1980.61(a).</T3> The original Form FmHA 449-35 or Form FmHA1980-83 will be kept in the County Office.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Section 1980.61(b)(1). </T3>Copy(ies) of the Loan Note Guarantee(s)or Contract of Guarantee(s) will be kept in the County Office. Additionalcopy(ies) may be retained by the State Office. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>Section 1980.61(b)(3). </T3>For reporting purposes where multi-notesare issued, the loan will be counted as one loan regardless of the numberof notes issued. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 1980.119-1980.121 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.122 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Substitution of lenders. </ITAG>With prior written approval of the FmHA State Director, a new eligiblelender may be substituted for the original provided the new lender agreesin writing to assume all servicing and other responsibilities <T3>of the original lender </T3>and acquires the unguaranteed portion ofthe loan. Such substitution may be made without the holder's consent butnot without notice to holder(s) by the substituted lender. The new lenderwill execute Form FmHA 449-35 or Form FmHA 1980-38 at the same time ofthe substitution. After approval of the lender, Form FmHA 1980-42, ``Noticeof Substitution of Lender,'' will be completed by the FmHA servicing representativeand mailed to the Finance Office. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.123 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Transfer and assumption of Farmer Program loans. </ITAG>(a) All transfers and assumptions must be approved in writing by FmHA.Such transfers and assumptions must be to an eligible applicant. EM actualloss loans may only be transferred to a co-obligor. All transfers and assumptionsmust meet the requirements of Exhibit M of Subpart G of Part 1940 of thischapter. (b) The transferee will submit Form FmHA 410-1 ``Application for FmHA Services,''and other needed information to the lender for evaluation. (c) In accordance with the Food Security Act of 1985 (Pub. L. 99-198),after December 23, 1985, if an individual transferee or any member, stockholder,partner, or joint operator of an entity transferee is convicted under Federalor State law of planting, cultivating, growing, producing, harvesting orstoring a controlled substance (see 21 CFR Part 1308, which is ExhibitC to Subpart A of Part 1941 of this chapter and is available in any FmHAoffice, for the definition of ``controlled substance'') prior to the approvalof the transfer and assumption in any crop year, the individual or entityshall be ineligible for a transfer and assumption for the crop year inwhich the individual or member, stockholder, partner, or joint operatorof the entity was convicted and the four succeeding years. Applicants willattest on Form FmHA 410-1 that as individuals or that its members, if anentity, have not been convicted of such crime after December 23, 1985.(d) When a transfer and assumption occurs and the transferee has an outstandinginsured or guaranteed FO, SW or RL loan, the borrower's total unpaid principalinsured and guaranteed indebtedness for these loans may not exceed thelesser of $300,000 or the market value of the farm or other security. Whenthe transferee is indebted for an OL loan/line of credit, the transferee'stotal insured and guaranteed OL principal balance may not exceed $400,000at the time of the transfer and assumption. (e) Available transfer and assumption options to eligible applicants includetransferring the <T3>total </T3>indebtedness to another borrower on the same terms, or ondifferent terms not to exceed those terms for which an initial loan/lineof credit can be made. (f) In any transfer and assumption case, the transferor, including anyguarantor(s), may be released from liability by the lender with FmHA writtenconcurrence only when the value of the collateral being transferred isat least equal to the amount of the loan or the line of credit ceilingfor Contracts of Guarantee. If the transfer is for less than this:(1) FmHA must determine that the transferor has no reasonable debt-payingability considering assets and income at the time of the transfer.(2) FmHA County Committee must certify that the transferor has cooperatedin good faith, used due diligence to maintain the collateral against loss,and has otherwise fulfilled all of the regulations of this subpart to thebest of the transferor's ability.(g) Any proceeds received from the sale of security before a transfer andassumption will be credited to the transferor's guaranteed loan debt ininverse order of maturity before the transfer and assumption transactionis closed. (h) The lender is responsible for getting an appraisal of the fair marketvalue of all the collateral securing the loan/line of credit. Subject tothe approval of the transferor and transferee, an appraisal can be madeby either independent fee appraisers or qualified appraisers on the lender'sstaff. Appraisers must meet the qualifications outlined in andSection; 1980.113(d)(9)(ii)of this subpart. The appraisal report fee and other related costs willbe paid by the transferor and the transferee, as they agree. (i) The market value of the security being acquired by the transferee,plus any additional security the transferee proposes to give, must be adequateto secure the balance of the total guaranteed loan/line of credit ceilingfor Contracts of Guarantee, plus any prior liens. (j) If any cash downpayment is made, it may be paid directly to the transferoras payment for the transferor's equity in the project provided: (1) The lender recommends and FmHA approves the cash downpayment be releasedto the transferor. (2) Any downpayment that is made by the transferee to the transferor doesnot suspend the transferee's obligation to continue to make the guaranteedloan/line of credit payments as they come due under the terms of the assumption.(3) The transferor agrees not to take any actions against the transfereein connection with such transfer in the future without first obtainingthe approval of FmHA and the lender.(4) The lender determines that the transferee has the ability to repaythe guaranteed debt assumed and any other indebtedness. (k) The lender will issue a statement to FmHA that the debt can be properlytransferred and the conveyance instruments must be filed, registered, orrecorded, as appropriate, and must be legally sufficient. (1) FmHA will not guarantee any additional loans to provide equity fundsfor a transfer and assumption.(m) The assumption will be made on the lender's form of assumption agreement.(n) The assumption agreement must contain the FmHA case number of the transferorand transferee.(o) The assumption agreement may change loan terms and/or interest ratesonly if a new Loan Note Guarantee or Contract of Guarantee will be executed.(p) In the case of a transfer and assumption at the same rates and termsthe lender must give any holder(s) notice of the transfer and notice thatfuture payments will be made under a different name and case number. Itis the lender's responsibility to see that the transfer and assumptionis noted on all originals of the Loan Note Guarantee or Contract of Guarantee.The lender must provide FmHA with a copy of the transfer and assumptionagreement. (q) Before allowing a transfer and assumption at <T3>different</T3> rates and terms, the lender must consult with any holder(s).If the holder(s) consents in writing to the change in rates and terms,the lender must provide FmHA with documentation of the holders concurrenceand a copy of the transfer and assumption agreement and must note the transferand assumption on all originals of the Loan Note Guarantee or Contractof Guarantee. <ITAG tagnum="73">Administrative </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Loan approval officials may consent: </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. To all transfer and assumption cases. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. To the release of the transferor and guarantor(s) from liabilityon the loan or line of credit agreement. The approval official will notifythe lender and the appropriate parties of the decision in writing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. To any changes in the loan or line of credit terms and/or interestrates provided the holder(s), if any, and lender agree. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The Loan Note Guarantee or Contract of Guarantee will be endorsedin the space provided on the form. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. A copy of the Assumption Agreement will be retained in the CountyOffice file. The County Supervisor will notify the Finance Office of allapproved transfer and assumption cases so that Finance Office records maybe adjusted accordingly. This will be accomplished by sending completedForms FmHA 1980-7, ``Notification of Transfer and Assumption of a GuaranteedLoan,'' FmHA 1980-51, ``Add, Change, or Delete Guaranteed Loan Record,''and, for new borrowers, FmHA 1980-50 to the Finance Office. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.124 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Consolidation, rescheduling, reamortizing and deferral. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General requirements.</T3> All borrowers are expected to repay theirloans according to the planned repayment schedule. However, circumstancesmay arise which will not permit borrowers to pay as scheduled. When rescheduling,reamortization, or deferral will assist in the orderly collection of aloan, such action <T3>may</T3> be taken upon prior concurrence given by FmHA provided: (1) The borrower meets the eligibility requirements for an initial loanguarantee and the lender's security position would not be adversely affected.For FO, SW loans and OL loans/lines of credit refer to this subpart forthese requirements. For EM loans refer to Subpart D of Part 1945 of thischapter for eligibility and security requirements. For RL loans refer toSW eligibility and security requirements as set out in this subpart. (2) The action will ensure that the borrower will be able to continue thefarming or ranching operation.(3) Any delinquency is due to circumstances beyond the borrower's control.Circumstances beyond the borrower's control are limited to one of the following:(i) A reduction in income has occurred which is not due to inadequate orpoor financial management decisions, such as untimely marketing practiceswhich might occur when a borrower has forward contracted and the pricecontinues to increase.(ii) Unforseen, but essential, farm expenses and/or, in the case of individualborrowers and the partners, joint operators, stockholders and members whooperate the farm, essential family living expenses.(iii) A natural disaster, such as a drought or flood, regardless of whetherthe area has been declared a disaster area.(4) The borrower has acted in good faith by demonstrating sincerity andhonesty in meeting agreements with, and promises made to, the lender. Thisincludes cooperating in servicing the account and maintaining the security;(5) The lender determines that a positive cash flow cannot be developedwith the existing repayment schedule, but can be developed with revisedrepayment terms;(6) Any holder(s) agrees in writing to the rescheduling, reamortization,and deferral. The holder(s) must understand that they will not receiveany payments from the lender or from FmHA during any deferral period.(7) No interest is ever charged on interest.(b) <T3>Consolidation and rescheduling. </T3>(1) The term ``consolidate'' meansto combine the outstanding principal and interest balances of two or moreEM loans <T3>made for operating (Subtitle B) purposes or two or more OL Loans.</T3>An existing OL line of credit loan may only be consolidated with a newOL line of credit loan if the terms (to make advances as well as finalmaturity date) of the new OL line of credit are within the terms of theexisting OL line of credit agreement.(2) The term ``rescheduling'' means to rewrite the rates and/or terms ofa single note or line of credit agreement which acknowledges indebtednessfor a loan made for operating purposes (EM loan or OL loan/line of credit).(3) EM loans made for operating loan purposes may be consolidated onlywith other EM loans made for operating loan purposes, including EM loansfor annual operating purposes and EM major adjustment loans for operating(Subtitle B) purposes. OL Loan Note Guarantee loans may be consolidatedonly with other OL Loan Note Guarantee loans.(4) An EM loan made for operating loan purposes or an OL loan/line of creditmay be rescheduled when it is in the best interest of the borrower andthe lender to do so.(5) EM loans for actual losses, EM major adjustment loans for real estatepurposes, OL loans secured by real estate, OL Contract of Guarantee lineof credit with unlike terms and OL loans/lines of credit with outstandinginterest rate buydown agreement or shared appreciation agreement will <T3>not</T3> be consolidated.(6) There is no limit on the number of times a consolidation or reschedulingaction may take place provided all the interest payments are being madeand a principal payment is made which is at least equal the amount of depreciationon the security.(7) Unless a note or line of credit agreement being rescheduled is consolidatedwith one or more notes or lines of credit agreements at the time of therescheduling, no new note or line of credit agreement will be taken whena loan/line of credit is rescheduled. Instead, the existing note or lineof credit agreement will be modified by attaching an ``allonge'' or otherlegally effective amendment, evidencing the revised repayment scheduleand any interest rate change. When a note or line of credit agreement beingrescheduled is also being consolidated with one or more other notes orlines of credit agreement, then a new note evidencing the consolidatedindebtedness will be taken.(8) The interest rate for a consolidated or rescheduled EM loan for operatingpurposes will be the current rate established by the Secretary of Agriculturefor similar type loans in effect at the time of action. This informationis available from any FmHA office (See FmHA Instruction 440.1, ExhibitB).(9) The interest rate for a consolidated OL loan or rescheduled OL loan/lineof credit will be the negotiated rate agreed upon by the lender and theborrower subject to the limitations set out in andSection; 1980.175(e) ofthis subpart. If the consolidated OL loan or rescheduled OL loan/line ofcredit still has an outstanding interest rate buydown agreement in effectat the time of consolidation or rescheduling, the interest rate will remainthe same during the balance of the buydown agreement period.(10) A rescheduled note or the new note which exists after a consolidationof two or more loans must be repaid over a period not to exceed fifteen(15) years from the date of the action, unless the note evidences a loanmade solely for recreation and/or nonfarm enterprise purposes, in whichcase it must be repaid over a period not to exceed seven (7) years fromthe date of the action. A rescheduled OL line of credit agreement mustbe repaid over a period not to exceed seven (7) years from the date ofthe action; however, a new OL line of credit agreement that exists afterconsolidating an existing line of credit with a new line of credit cannotexceed the terms (to make advances as well as final maturity date) of theexisting line of credit agreement. Balloon payments are prohibited, however,the loan can be rescheduled in unequal amortized installments, providedthe current year and any typical year plan(s) demonstrate that these installmentswill be used only in those cases where a new enterprise is being established,developing a farm, or during recovery from economic reverses. The consolidationwill be reported to the Finance Office with Form FmHA 1980-19, ``GuaranteedLoan Closing Report,'' along with a memorandum identifying which loansare being consolidated.(11) When a consolidation occurs, a new Form FmHA 449-34 will be executed.(12) When a consolidation occurs, the new note or line of credit agreementwill describe the note(s) or line of credit agreement(s) being consolidatedand will state that the indebtedness evidenced by such note(s) or lineof credit agreement(s) is not satisfied. The original note(s) or line ofcredit agreement(s) will be retained for identification purposes.(c) <T3>Reamortization.</T3> The term ``reamortize'' means to rearrange therates and/or terms of a loan(s) made for real estate purposes, i.e., FO,SW, RL, EM actual loss loans having basic security consisting of real estate,and EM major adjustment loans <T3>made for real estate (Subtitle A) purposes.</T3> Scheduled paymentsmay be rearranged over the remaining term of the original repayment periodestablished for the loan or assumption agreement (new terms), or be rearrangedover a period not to exceed the maximum statutory period which is set at40 years from the date of the original note.(1) No new note will be taken when a loan is reamortized. Instead, theexisting note will be modified by attaching an ``allonge'' or other legallyeffective amendment, evidencing the revised repayment schedule and anyinterest rate change.(2) The interest rate for a reamortized EM actual loss loan will be atthe same rate as the original loan.(3) The interest rate for a reamortized EM major adjustment loan for realestate purposes will be the current market rate in effect for similar typeloans at the time of reamortization as established by the Secretary ofAgriculture. This information is available from any FmHA office. (See FmHAInstruction 440.1, Exhibit B).(4) The interest rate for a reamortized FO or SW loan will be the negotiatedrate agreed upon by the lender and the borrower at the time of the actionsubject to the limitations set out in andSection;andSection; 1980.180 and 1980.185of this subpart, as applicable. The interest rate limitation set out inthese sections will also apply when RL loans are reamortized. If the reamortizedFO or SW loan still has an outstanding interest rate buydown agreementin effect at the time of reamortization, the interest rate will remainthe same during the balance of the buydown agreement period.(d) <T3>Deferral.</T3> The term ``defer'' means to postpone the payment ofprincipal and/or interest on an FO, SW, RL, OL or EM loan or OL line ofcredit. Principal may be deferred in whole or in part. Interest may bedeferred only in part. A partial payment of interest will be required duringthe deferment period.(1) Deferred interest will not be capitalized.(2) Payments may be deferred for no more than five years, but in no casewill the deferral period extend beyond the final due date of the note.(3) The lender must determine, and FmHA must concur, that scheduled paymentscannot be made for reasons beyond the borrower's control as defined inparagraphs (a)(3)(i) and (ii) of this section and must also determine thatthere are reasonable prospects that the borrower will be able to resumefull payments at the end of the deferral period.(e) <T3>Principal limit.</T3> The rescheduled/reamortized note or line of creditagreement which exists after a consolidation occurs will not increase theamount of principal which the borrower would have been required to payif the rescheduling, reamortization or consolidation had not been made.(f) <T3>Lien priority.</T3> Additional security instruments will be requiredif needed to maintain lien priority or to protect the interests of thelender and FmHa.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.125</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Debt write down.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General requirements.</T3> In addition to the authorities availablein andSection; 1980.124 of this subpart to consolidate, reschedule, reamortizeand/or defer a guaranteed loan/line of credit, whether or not that loan/lineof credit agreement is delinquent, and the authority available in ExhibitD concerning an Interest Rate Buydown, a lender may only write down a <T3>delinquent</T3> guaranteed loan/line of credit agreement in amountssufficient to permit the borrower to develop a feasible plan of operation.Such action may be taken with the written approval of FmHA provided:(1) The borrower cannot demonstrate a positive cash flow projection onall income and expenses, including debt service, after consideration isgiven to servicing the loan or line of credit agreement using the authoritiesprovided in andSection; 1980.124 of this subpart. If a positive cash flowprojection can be achieved using these authorities, then the loan or lineof credit agreement will be consolidated, rescheduled, reamortized and/ordeferred, and no write down will take place. If a positive cash flow cannotbe achieved and the lender contemplates an interest rate reduction in connectionwith the write down, the borrower may be considered for an Interest RateBuydown under Exhibit D of this subpart. If the proposed interest ratereduction results in a positive cash flow and the lender can achieve apositive cash flow at the end of the Interest Rate Buydown period, theinterest rate reduction and the write down may be approved, providing theremaining requirements in this paragraph can be met.(2) The loan or line of credit agreement, if written down, will resultin a net recovery to the lender, during the term of the loan or line ofcredit agreement as written down, that would be more than or equal to thenet recovery to the lender from the borrower through bankruptcy or froman involuntary liquidation or foreclosure of the security for the loanor line of credit. The calculations to be used in making this determinationare found in paragraph (b) of this section.(3) The requirements found in andSection; 1980.124(a)(2) through (a)(5) ofthis subpart are met.(4) After being asked by the lender, other creditors of the borrower mayagree to voluntarily adjust their debts as outlined in Subpart A of Part1903 of this chapter. If other major creditors of the borrower, other thanthose that are fully collateralized, agree to participate in developinga restructuring plan or agree to participate in a State's farm mediationprogram, then the write down may be approved, providing the remaining requirementsin this paragraph can be met. Failure of such creditors to agree to participatewill not preclude use of a write down if the lender, with FmHA's concurrence,determines that a write down results in the least cost to the lender.(5) If the borrower owns real estate which secures the loan, the borrowermust sign a shared appreciation agreement, as further specified in paragraph(c) of this section, covering the amount written down.(6) Any holder must agree to the write down in writing. If the holder doesnot agree to this action, the leader must repurchase the unpaid portionof the loan from the holder before the write down may be approved.(7) If a line of credit is written down, no further advances may be madeunder that agreement and the principal amount remaining after the writedown fixes the principal amount covered by the guarantee.(8) The lender will obtain FmHA approval of the proposed write down bysubmitting to the County Supervisor the following:(i) A cash flow statement indicating the borrower can pay all necessaryexpenses and service all debt after the write down.(ii) A current appraisal of the property securing the loan.(iii) An estimate of lender's cost relating to an involuntary liquidationor bankruptcy including disposal of any property taken into inventory.(iv) A proposed estimated loss claim.(v) A current balance sheet for the borrower.(9) If the borrower has both a line of credit and a loan, the lender willwrite down the line of credit before consideration will be given to a writedown of the loan.(10) The debt write down will be on principal first and then accrued interest,if needed.(b) <T3>Value determination. </T3>The lender must determine the recovery valueof the security and the value of the written down loan or line of creditagreement in order to determine the net recovery from a bankruptcy or aninvoluntary liquidation of the loan or line of credit. These determinationswill be done as follows:(1) The recovery value of the security will be based on the amount of thecurrent appraised value of the security <T3>less </T3>the estimated costs associated with liquidation and dispositionof the loan/line of credit security.(i) The current appraised value will be determined by an independent appraiserselected by the lender and approved by FmHA. The appraisal fee will beshared equally by the lender and FmHA.(ii) Any lease income estimated to be generated while the property is inthe lender's inventory will be calculated to offset any of the estimatedcost items listed in paragraph (iii) below.(iii) The estimated costs associated with liquidation and disposition includethe following:(A) The payment of prior liens;(B) Taxes and assessments, depreciation, management costs, yearly percentagedecrease or increase in the value of the property, and lost interest income,each calculated for the lender's average holding period, in the State inwhich the property is located, for the type of property involved;(C) Resale expenses, such as repairs, commissions, and advertising; and(D) Other reasonable and necessary administrative costs and expenses, includingattorney's fees, that customarily are incurred in such liquidation anddisposition.(2) The value of the written down loan/line of credit agreement will bebased on the present value of payments that the borrower would make tothe lender if the loan/line of credit terms were modified using any combinationof the authorities provided in andSection;andSection; 1980.124 and 1980.125of this subpart or an interest rate buydown as provided in Exhibit D ofthis subpart.(3) The loan may be written down with FmHA's approval if the calculationsspecified in paragraphs (b)(1) and (2) of this section show that the netrecovery to the lender, during the term of the loan or line of credit agreementas written down, would be more than or equal to the net recovery to thelender from the borrower through bankruptcy or from an involuntary liquidationor foreclosure of the security.(c) <T3>Shared Appreciation Agreement. </T3>If the loan/line of credit agreementis to be written down in accordance with this section and there is realestate which is security for the loan/line of credit agreement, then theborrower must enter into an agreement that provides for recapture of aportion of any appreciation in the value of the real estate securing theremaining loan/line of credit after write down. This agreement is ExhibitF to this subpart and is entitled ``Shared Appreciation Agreement.'' Thelender will provide a copy of the shared appreciation agreement to FmHA.(1) The shared appreciation agreement will have a term not to exceed 10years from the date of the shared appreciation agreement and provide forthe recapture of appreciation on real estate based on the difference betweenthe appraised market value of the real estate at the time the loan/lineof credit agreement is written down and at the time of recapture.(2) The shared appreciation agreement will provide that the amount recapturedwill be 75 percent of the appreciated value of the real estate if the eventsdescribed in paragraph (c)(3) of this section occur within 4 years of thewrite down, and 50 percent of such value if the recapture occurs duringthe remainder of the term of the agreement.(3) Recapture of the appreciated value of the real estate will occur eitherat the end of the term of the shared appreciation agreement or at the timethe real estate is conveyed, the loan/line of credit agreement is repaid,or the borrower ceases farming, whichever occurs earlier. Transfer of titleto the borrower's spouse on the borrower's death will not be treated asa conveyance for the purpose of recapture.(4) Any amount recaptured will be shared on a pro-rata basis between thelender and FmHA as provided in paragraph XIV of Form FmHA 449-35 or paragraphXIV of Form FmHA 1980-38.(5) In no case will the amount recaptured exceed the amount of debt writtendown.(d) <T3>Additional requirements. </T3>(1) The lender will use an addendum tothe existing note or line of credit agreement which reflects the writedown of the debt and the existence of any shared appreciation agreement.(2) If the interest rate is changed, the interest rate will be the negotiatedrate agreed upon by the lender and the borrower, subject to the provisionsof andSection; 1980.124 (b) (8) and (9) and (c) (2), (3), and (4) of thissubpart, depending on the type of loan involved.(3) The lender must attach the original of Exhibit F of this Subpart tothe promissory note or line of credit agreement which evidences a loan/lineof credit agreement that is written down and to the Loan Note Guaranteeor Contract of Guarantee. If a holder is involved, a copy of Exhibit Fwill be attached to the original Form FmHA 449-36, ``Assignment GuaranteeAgreement,'' along with a copy of the note and Loan Note Guarantee. A copyof Exhibit F will be kept in the County Office and attached to the appropriateLoan Note Guarantee or Contract of Guarantee.(4) As provided by paragraph XI C 2 of Form FmHA 449-35, the lender willremit to the holder the holder's pro-rata share of any estimated loss claimpayments made by FmHA after the write down.(5) Additional security instruments will be required if needed to maintainlien priority or to protect the interests of the lender and FmHA. In addition,if Exhibit F is executed, the lender is responsible for making sure thatthe security instruments also assure future collection of any appreciationin the real property covered by Exhibit F.(6) The maximum amount of loss payment associated with a loan/line of creditagreement which has been written down will not exceed the percentage ofthe guarantee multiplied by the difference between the outstanding principaland interest balance of the loan/line of credit before the write down andthe outstanding balance of the loan/line of credit after the write down.The lender will complete Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Reportof Loss,'' to receive its pro-rata share of any loss sustained.(7) During the period of time in which the shared appreciation agreementis in effect, a note or line of credit agreement which has been writtendown cannot be consolidated.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.126 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Mediation.</ITAG>Various States have mediation programs, which are designed to assist farmborrowers and their creditors in resolving financial disputes through theprocess of mediation. Where a State has such a farm credit mediation program,the lender shall participate in accordance with the rules of that system.The lender must not agree to any proposals concerning the rewriting ofthe terms of the guaranteed loan which do not comply with the provisionsof Subpart A of this Part and this Subpart, especially andSection;andSection;1980.124 and 1980.125. Any agreements reached as a result of such mediationmust have prior concurrence by the State Director or designee. FmHA isnot bound by any agreements developed in mediation or findings of the mediatorunless FmHA agrees to them in writing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 1980.127_1980.128 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.129 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Planning and performing development.</ITAG>The lender is responsible for seeing that any buildings or other improvementsor major land development to be paid for with loan funds are properly completedwithin a reasonable period of time. The security must be free of any mechanic's,materialmen's or other liens which would affect the priority of the lienwhich the lender told FmHA would be taken on the security. All major construction,major repairs, and major land development must be performed under contract.As soon as such construction, repair, or land development involving theuse of loan funds has been completed in accordance with the plans and specifications,Form FmHA 449-11, ``Certificate of Acquisition or Construction,'' willbe completed and given to the County Supervisor. This form will be usedby a lender, borrower, and/or contractor to certify that the security hasbeen acquired or the construction completed.In connection with construction the lender is responsible for:(a) Making sure there is compliance with applicable laws, ordinances, codesand regulations, including FmHA regulations, which affect all phases ofconstruction. The lender may inspect the site and any construction or developmentwork at any stage whenever the lender considers it necessary.(b) Seeing that the plans, specifications, and estimates are adequate.(c) Making sure of the rights to an adequate water supply of sufficientquantity and quality.(d) Identifying whether the construction or development will be performedby contract or other method.(e) Checking to see that any necessary bonds covering contractors are inproper form.(f) Seeing that all equal opportunity and nondiscrimination requirementsare met. (See andSection; 1980.41 of Subpart A of this part.)(g) Limiting periodic or partial payments for construction or developmentto a reasonable percentage of the actual value of work and material inplace. The lender will make final payment only after seeing that the finalinspection has been made.(h) Ascertaining that after planned development is completed, the requirementsof andSection; 1980.108(a)(3)(i) of this Subpart are met.<ITAG tagnum="73">Administrative</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The County Supervisor will:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Check to see that the construction, repair or land developmenthas been completed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Forward Form FmHA 449-11 to the lender for completion and executionby the lender, borrower, and contractor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.130 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Loan servicing.</ITAG>The lender is responsible for loan servicing as required by paragraph IXof Form FmHA 449-35, or paragraph IX of Form FmHA 1980-38.<ITAG tagnum="73">Administrative</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The lender has the responsibility for loan servicing and protectingthe collateral. Prompt followup on delinquent payments and early recognitionof problems are keys to resolving many delinquent loans. Contacts withthe borrower when determined necessary by the County Supervisor will bemade with the lender present. If the borrower also has an insured loan,normal servicing contacts will only be made by FmHA; however, FmHA shouldprovide the lender with a summary of the results of the visit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The County Supervisor is responsible for monitoring the lender'sservicing activities as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Unless previously reviewed, the lender's borrower case files willbe reviewed within 90 days after loan closing. The lender will be remindedof the lender's responsibilities in servicing the loan as required in paragraphIX of Form FmHA 449-35 or paragraph IX of Form FmHA 1980-38 when deficienciesare noted. Any deficiencies will be discussed with the lender and the discussionwill be confirmed in writing with a copy to the State Director throughthe District Director.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Contact the State Office when the case file review indicates thelender or the borrower has failed to fulfill any of the loan approval conditionsand the resulting problem cannot be resolved by the County Supervisor andthe lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Take the action required in paragraph X of Form FmHA 449-35 orparagraph X of Form FmHA 1980-38.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Use an office management system for guaranteed loans to assuretimely followup on all required financial statements, and to make sureany special requirements for loan servicing conditions are met.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Review at least 20 percent of the existing loan(s)/line of credit(s)which each lender has each year and any problem loan(s)/line of credit(s)which were previously identified.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Submit to the Finance Office immediately after December 31 of eachyear, the Lender's statement required in paragraph IX C 10 of Form FmHA1980-38or paragraph IX C 10 of Form FmHA 449-35 as modified by requirements setout in andSection; 1980.118(c) of this subpart, reflecting the unpaid principalbalance on the loan or line of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Contact, at least annually, all lenders with active shared appreciationagreements for borrowers who have received debt write down. When makingthis contact, the County Supervisor will ascertain if any collection hasbeen made from property covered by such agreement. Findings will be recordedin the County Office file. If any unauthorized collection is made by thelender, a report will be forwarded to the State Director.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. The State Director will approve all debt write downs. Approvalwill be evidenced by a letter to the lender with a copy to the borrowerand signed by the State Director. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. The District Director will: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Provide guidance and assistance to the County Supervisor in monitoringguaranteed loans/lines of credit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Review all field visit reports and make recommendations or commentsand transmit them to the State Director, if necessary. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. In the case of a debt write down, the District Director will reviewfor concurrence and forward to the State Director as appropriate. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. County Supervisors are authorized to approve or concur in: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Alterations in the approval conditions which will not prejudicethe Government's interest. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Any replacement of collateral for the loan/line of credit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. All lien coverage and lien priorities on the collateral establishedby the lender before issuance of the Loan Note Guarantee or Contract ofGuarantee. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Any deferral, rescheduling, or reamortization of the loan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. For debt write down, the County Supervisor will recommend StateDirector approval through the District Director. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. The use of proceeds from the disposition of collateral complyingwith the provisions of paragraph IX of Form FmHA 449-35 or paragraph IXof Form FmHA 1980-38. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 1980.131-1980.135</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.136</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Protective advances. </ITAG>Protective advances are advances made by a lender when the borrower isin liquidation or close to being liquidated to protect or preserve thecollateral itself from loss or deterioration. Examples of protective advancesare: payment of delinquent taxes, assessments, ground rents, hazard orflood insurance premiums against or affecting the collateral, harvestingcosts, cost for emergency measures to protect the collateral, etc., attorneyfees are not a protective advance. It is not intended that protective advancesbe made in lieu of additional loans. See paragraph XII of Form FmHA 449-35or paragraph XII of Form FmHA 1980-38. Administrative The County Supervisor is authorized, under paragraph XII of Form FmHA 449-35or paragraph XII of Form FmHA 1980-38, to approve protective advances inexcess of $500 and will consult with the lender on future servicing ofthe account. Such protective advances must be approved in writing by theCounty Supervisor. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 1980.137-1980.138</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.139</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination of Loan Note Guarantee or Contract of Guarantee. </ITAG>See paragraph 12 of Form FmHA 449-34, or paragraph 5 of Form FmHA 1980-27.<ITAG tagnum="73">Administrative </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The County Supervisor will advise the Finance Office by memorandumwhen a Loan Note Guarantee or Contract of Guarantee is terminated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 1980.140-1980.143</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.144</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bankruptcy. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>In bankruptcies, there are two separate proceedings:liquidation and reorganization under the bankruptcy court's protection.It is the lender's responsibility to protect the guaranteed loan debt andall collateral securing the loan in bankruptcy proceedings (refer to paragraphIX C 5 of Form FmHA 449-35 or Form 1980-38). These responsibilities include,but are not limited to: (1) The lender will file a proof of claim where necessary and all the necessarypapers and pleadings concerning the case. (2) The lender will attend and where necessary participate in meetingsof the creditors and all court proceedings. (3) The lender, whose collateral is subject to being used by the bankruptcyestate, will immediately seek adequate protection of the collateral, includingpetitioning for a super priority. Adequate protection of the collateral,depending on interpretation, may take several forms. In a bankruptcy, thetrustee is authorized to sell, lease or use the collateral if the borrower'sbusiness is in operation. The only collateral the trustee cannot utilizeis cash collateral unless the secured creditor grants permission or thebankruptcy court authorizes the use of such after giving a proper hearingand notice. (i) Cash collateral means cash, negotiable instruments, documents of title,securities, deposit accounts, or other cash equivalents, such as accountsreceivable.(ii) Concerning machinery, equipment and real estate, adequate protectioncan be interpreted differently under reorganization. The bankruptcy trusteecould dispose of certain collateral and grant to the secured party a replacementlien on some other collateral which may or may not have the same value.For example, the lender may hold a first lien on a good saleable pieceof real estate and could find replacement of this particular parcel ofproperty with a second or possibly a third lien on another parcel of landthat the lender may find undesirable for adequate protection. There areno guarantees to the lender when the borrower is in reorganization thatthe collateral will be protected to the lender's satisfaction. The lendershould be fully aware of what is taking place with the collateral and resistany adverse changes that may be made in the collateral securing the FmHAguaranteed loan. (4) When permitted by the Bankruptcy Code, the lender will request a modificationof any plan of reorganization whenever it appears that additional recoveriesare likely. In Chapters 11, 12, and 13 bankruptcy cases, the lender willmonitor the plans to determine whether the borrower is fulfilling the requirementsof the plan and take appropriate action to obtain dismissal of the caseif the borrower fails to comply with the requirements of the plan. A dismissalof the plan by the bankruptcy court would restore the original outstandingindebtedness at the time the reorganization plan was approved. (5) FmHA will be kept adequately and regularly informed in writing on allaspects of the proceedings. (b) <T3>Reorganization bankruptcy cases.</T3> (1) In Chapters 11, 12, or 13reorganization, if an independent appraisal of collateral is necessaryin FmHA's opinion, FmHA and the lender will share the appraisal fee equally.(2) Lender expenses, in Chapters 11, 12, or 13 reorganization cases, arenot deducted from the proceeds of the collateral because a reorganizationis not a liquidation. All expenses incurred by the lender (including attorney'sfees), while the borrower is in reorganization, are considered normal expensesof servicing the account, and therefore are the responsibility of the lenderand are not deductible from the proceeds of the collateral or covered underthe FmHA guarantee. (c) <T3>Liquidation bankruptcy cases.</T3> (1) Reasonable and customary liquidationexpenses may be deducted from the proceeds of the collateral in liquidationbankruptcy cases provided the lender is doing the actual liquidation ofthe collateral and presents adequate written justification for each expenseand secures FmHA's written concurrence prior to incurring the expense.(2) If a trustee is appointed by the bankruptcy court to sell the collateralunder a conversion of a reorganization plan to a liquidation plan or Chapter7, the trustee rather than the lender, in this instance, is responsiblefor liquidating the collateral. Normally, any expenses incurred by thelender during this period are not considered liquidation expenses and cannotbe deducted from collateral proceeds. The lender is not engaged in theactual liquidation but is performing in a manner considered to be normalservicing of the loan under the circumstances. (3) If the property is abandoned by the trustee and the lender is actuallyengaged in actual liquidation, reasonable liquidation expenses would berecoverable from liquidation proceeds with prior written concurrence foreach expense from FmHA before the expense is incurred. (d) <T3>Loss payments.</T3> See paragraph XVI of Form FmHA 449-35 or Form FmHA1980-38. <ITAG tagnum="73">Administrative </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The lender is responsible for advising FmHA of the completion ofthe reorganization plan. The lender is also responsible for advising FmHAif the borrower does not comply with the plan and servicing action thelender will take to protect the interest of the lender and FmHA. However,the FmHA servicing office will monitor the lender's files to ensure timelynotification of servicing actions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. When an estimated loss claim is paid during the operation of thereorganization plan, and the borrower repays the loan in full without anadditional loss sustained by the lender, a Final Report of Loss is notnecessary. The Finance Office will close out the estimated loss accountas a Final Loss at the time notification of payment in full is received.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. If the bankruptcy court attempts to direct that loss payments willbe applied to the account other than the unsecured principal first andthen to unsecured accrued interest, the lender is responsible for notifyingthe FmHA servicing office immediately. The FmHA servicing office will thenobtain advice from OGC on what actions FmHA should take. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. Protective Advances_Authorized Protective Advances may be includedwith the estimated loss payment associated with the reorganization bankruptcyprovided they were incurred in connection with liquidation of the accountprior to the borrower filing bankruptcy. Protective advances during a bankruptcyreorganization are not authorized. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. Accrued interest owed to the lender should be supported by documentationas to how the accrued interest amount was calculated by the lender. A copyof the promissory note and ledger should also be attached. As part of thereview of the final loss claim, FmHA should be assured that the lenderhas not accrued interest on the principal and interest amount of the loanthat was paid by the estimated loss payment. The approval official is responsiblefor verifying the accuracy of the interest calculations on the final reportof loss before submission to the Finance Office.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">F. Repurchase of Notes_In cases where a default on the guaranteednote does not exist, the State Director may approve the repurchase of theunpaid guaranteed portion of the loan(s) from any holder(s) to reduce interestaccrual during a Chapter 7 proceeding, or after a Chapter 11 proceedingbecomes a liquidation proceeding. (Refer to paragraph X C of Form FmHA449-35 or Form FmHA 1980-38).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">G. County Supervisors are authorized to approve Report of EstimatedLoss or Final Loss Payments on Form FmHA 449-30 in those cases where theloss payment will not exceed $55,000. The State Director is authorizedto accept the determination in all other cases. A copy of Form FmHA 449-30,when approved by the County Supervisor, will be sent to the District Director.The State Director will submit Form FmHA 449-30 to the Finance Office forpayment of any losses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.145 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Defaults by borrower.</ITAG>(a) See paragraph X of Form FmHA 449-35 or paragraph X of Form FmHA 1980-38.(b) The lender will prepare current financial information including a cashflow and will schedule a meeting with the County Supervisor and the borrowerto discuss possible solutions including interest rate buydown to resolvethe borrower's financial problems. The lender must notify the County Supervisorof the meeting at least 10 working days in advance. At least 10 workingdays prior to the meeting, the County Supervisor will mail Exhibit D andAttachment 1 of this subpart to the lender and the borrower.(c) A record of the meeting will be prepared by the lender, which willat least include a list of the individuals who attend, and a summary ofthe problem and proposed solutions. The original will be retained in thelender's loan file and a copy will be submitted to the County Supervisorand the borrower.(d) If the lender and the borrower's proposed action is either denied orpartially denied, the County Supervisor will notify the lender and theborrower in writing within 10 days of FmHA's decision of all the reasonsfor the decision and advise them of their opportunity to jointly appealthe decision as set out in Subpart B of Part 1900 of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="73">Administrative</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The County Supervisor will review and distribute Form FmHA 1980-44,``Guaranteed Loan Borrower Default Status,'' in accordance with the preparationinstructions in the FMI upon receipt of the lender's default notificationin accordance with paragraph X A of Form FmHA 449-35 or paragraph X A ofForm FmHA 1980-38. The County Supervisor will coordinate and process anyrequest for FmHA to purchase (as outlined in paragraph X D of Form FmHA449-35) when the holder(s) is located in close proximity to the local lender.If any holder is located ouside the area, the State Director will designatean employee to handle the repurchase arrangements. If the employee is notthe County Suprevisor, the County Supervisor will be notified of the transaction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The County Supervisor will verify the amounts due the holder(s),and transmit the holder's demand for paymant by memorandum to the StateDirector. Copies of evidence of the holder's ownership will be included.Any original evidence of ownership will be retained in the County Office.A proposed payment date will be established in order to calculate the interestdue the holder(s).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. In the event of default or servicing problems, the County Supervisorwill use Form FmHA 1980-37, ``FmHA purchase of a Guaranteed Loan Portion,''to request a check to pay the guaranteed portion of a loan(s) to the holder(s)when necessary. The Finance Office will forward the check within 10 daysafter receipt of the request.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. Any evidence of ownership retained in the County Office will beconsidered in any future report of loss calculations. A record of any purchasewill be maintained in the loan file.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.146</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Liquidation.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The general requirements for liquidating a guaranteedFarmer Program loan/line of credit are set out in andSection; 1980.64 ofSubpart A of this part and in paragraph XI of Form FmHA 449-35 or paragraphXI of Form FmHA 1980-38. The lender may use any method of liquidation customaryto the farm lending industry so long as the method will result in the maximumcollection possible on the debt. All liquidations must receive prior concurrenceby the appropriate FmHA official. Estimated or final loss claims will besubmitted using Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss,''along with the required supporting documentation set out in the instructionsfor preparing the form.  (b) <T3>Estimated loss claims</T3>. (1) Estimated loss claims will only beapproved after the lender has obtained FmHA approval of a liquidation plan,a debt write-down plan or a reorganization plan which has been approvedby the bankruptcy court. Once a liquidation plan is approved and it appearsthe liquidation period will exceed 90 days, the lender will file an estimatedloss claim. Once this claim is approved by FmHA, the lender will discontinueinterest accrual on the defaulted loan and the loss claim will be promptlyprocessed in accordance with Administrative paragraph D of this section.The County Supervisor may approve loss payments up to $55,000, or the StateDirector for loss payments in excess of $55,000. Estimated loss paymentswill be inserted under ``Amount Due Lender''on Form FmHA 449-30. The Director,Finance Office, will forward loss payment checks within 30 days of receiptof the request.  (2) If the actual loss is less than the estimated loss payment, the lenderwill reimburse FmHA for the overpayment, plus interest at the note or lineof credit agreement rate from the point of initial check issuance. Variableinterest notes or line of credit agreements will bear interest at the averagenote or line of credit agreement rate paid during the loan/line of creditterm.  (c) <T3>Allowable liquidation costs. </T3>In the preparation of a liquidationplan, reasonable liquidation costs will be allowed. Reasonable is definedas the prevailing rate charged in the area for like services. Liquidationcosts are paid from the sale of collateral when the lender has conductedthe liquidation. Therefore, if liquidation never occurs or if liquidationis conducted by someone other than the lender (a bankruptcy trustee, forexample), there can be no allowable liquidation costs.  (1) <T3>In-house expenses</T3>. In-house expenses of the lender <T3>are not allowable </T3>costs under a liquidation plan. In-house expensesinclude, but are not limited to, employee salaries, staff lawyers, traveland overhead.  (2) <T3>Appraisals. </T3>If an appraisal is required, the fee is shared byFmHA and the lender in accordance with Paragraph XI A 4 of Form FmHA 449-35or paragraph XI A 4 of Form FmHA 1980-38, this is an allowable liquidationcost. Both the lender and FmHA recover this cost from the first collateralsales proceeds received, each taking half of the proceeds until the costof the appraisal is recovered. The funds that are collected as recoveryof an appraisal fee will be forwarded to the Finance Office along withForm FmHA 1980-40, ``Reverse a Report of Liquidation Expenses.''  <ITAG tagnum="73">Administrative</ITAG>  <ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Meetings. </T3>The County Supervisor will meet with the lender whenthe lender or FmHA determines that liquidation is necessary and will informthe District Director and the State Director of the results.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Form FmHA 449-35, paragraph XI B or paragraph XI B of Form FmHA 1980-38</T3>.FmHA will exercise the option to liquidate only when there is reason tobelieve the lender's liquidation plan is not likely to provide a reasonablyadequate recovery. If FmHA liquidates, all of the requirements for liquidatingan FmHA insured loan will be followed (see Subpart A of Part 1955, SubpartA of Part 1962 and Subpart A of Part 1965 of this chapter). The CountySupervisor will approve lender liquidation plans. The District Directoror State Office may be consulted on complex cases for advice if necessary.When FmHA exercises the option to liquidate, the State Director or designeewill be the approval official. When such a decision is made, submit FormFmHA 1980-45, ``Notice of Liquidation Responsibility,'' to the FinanceOffice.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>Fom FmHA 449-35, paragraph XI D or paragraph XI D of Form FmHA 1980-38.</T3>County Supervisors are responsible for seeing that the lender complieswith the requirements of paragraph XI D. The County Supervisor will acceptor reject the accounting reports as submitted by the lender and will obtainthe advice of the District Director or State Office when necessary. WhenFmHA liquidates the security, the County Supervisor will submit these reportsto the lender and will send copies to the District Director and the StateOffice.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. <T3>Form FmHA 449-35, paragraph XI E 2 or paragraph XI E 2 of Form FmHA1980-38. </T3>County Supervisors are authorized to approve Report of EstimatedLoss or Final Loss Payment determinations on form FmHA 449-30 in thosecases where the loss payment will not exceed $55,000. The State Directoris authorized to accept the determinations in all other cases. A copy ofthe form will be given to the District Director. The State Director willsubmit form FmHA 449-30 to the Finance Office for payment of any losses.The Finance Office will forward loss payment checks within 10 days of receiptof the request to the County Supervisor for delivery to lender. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. <T3>Form FmHA 449-35, paragraph XI E 3 or paragraph XI E 3 of Form FmHA1980-38. </T3>Final loss payments will be made within 60 days after thereview of the accounting of the collateral. These payments will be reduced,if necessary, after considering the Conditions of Guarantee in Form FmHA449-34 or Form FmHA 1980-27. State Directors are responsible for seeingthat such reviews are accomplished in time to be evaluated and acceptedor otherwise resolved within the 60-day period. The County Supervisor mayconduct such reviews when the loss payment does not exceed $55,000. TheState Director will conduct all other reviews. The State Director may requestNational Office assistance in conducting any review. If a lender's finalloss claim is either denied or reduced, the County Supervisor will notifythe lender in writing within 10 days of FmHA's decision, of all the reasonsfor the decision, and advise the lender of its opportunity for an appealas set out in Subpart B of Part 1900 of this chapter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">F. The County Supervisor will establish a follow-up to contact lendersin writing who have received final loss claim payments to report any collectionsmade on the guaranteed loans. Such follow-up will be made annually for5 years after the final loss claim is paid. The County Supervisor willreport the results of the follow-up to the State Director no later than10 working days after the end of the fiscal year. The State Director willconsolidate the County Office reports and report the results to the Administratorby November 1 of each year. The information to be reported will be: lender,borrower, case number, loss claim amount, amount collected, and amountsubmitted to FmHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1980.147 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Graduation.</ITAG>There is no graduation requirement for guaranteed loans/lines of credit.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1980.148 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Appeal procedure.</ITAG>Refer to Subpart B of Part 1900 of this chapter for the method of appealingadverse decisions of County Committees, County Supervisors, District Directors,and State Directors.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1980.149 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Access to lender's records.</ITAG>See andSection;1980.81 of Subpart A of this part for this requirement.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection;1980.150-1980.152 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1980.153 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">FmHA forms.</ITAG>See andSection;1980.83 of Subpart A of this part and Exhibit C (availablein any FmHA office) of this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="73">General Administrative</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Office of the General Counsel (OGC): </T3>In performing administrativefunctions with respect to Farmer Program loans, FmHA may ask for the adviceand assistance of OGC on any legal matter. However, it is the responsibilityof the lender to ascertain that all requirements for making, securing,and servicing the loan are met. If FmHA has any questions concerning thelender's resolution of these matters, it should consult with OGC.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Delegation of Authority: </T3>State Directors should delegate to theirstaff members those administrative duties and responsibilities stipulatedin the Administrative sections of this subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection;1980.154-1980.174 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1980.175 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operating loans.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Objectives. </T3>The basic objective of the guaranteed OL loan programis to provide credit for family farmers and ranchers to conduct operationswhen credit is not available without a guarantee. This assistance providesfamily farm operators an opportunity to make efficient use of their land,labor and other resources, to improve their living conditions and to improvetheir overall economic situation.(b) <T3>Loan eligibility requirements. </T3>In accordance with the Food SecurityAct of 1985 (Pub. L. 99-198) after December 23, 1985, if an individualor any member, stockholder, partner, or joint operator of an entity isconvicted under Federal or State law of planting, cultivating, growing,producing, harvesting or storing a controlled substance (see 21 CFR Part1308, which is Exhibit C to Subpart A of Part 1941 of this chapter andis available in any FmHA office, for the definition of ``controlled substance'')prior to the issuance of the Loan Note Guarantee or the Contract of Guaranteein any crop year, the individual or entity shall be ineligible for a guaranteedloan for the crop year in which the individual or member, stockholder,partner, or joint operator of the entity was convicted and the four succeedingcrop years. Applicants will attest on Form FmHA 410-1, ``Application forFmHA Services,'' that as individuals or that its members, if an entity,have not been convicted of such crime after December 23, 1985. In addition,the following requirements must be met:(1) An individual must: (i) Be a citizen of the United States (See andSection; 1980.106(b)(21) ofthis subpart for the definition of ``United States'') or an alien lawfullyadmitted to the United States for permanent residence under the Immigrationand Nationality Act. Aliens must provide INS Forms I-151 or I-551, ``AlienRegistration Receipt Card.'' Indefinite parolees are not eligible. If theauthenticity of the information shown on the alien's identification documentis questioned, the County Supervisor may request the Immigration and NaturalizationService (INS) to verify the information appearing on the alien's identificationcard by completing INS Form G-641, ``Application for Verification of Informationfrom Immigration and Naturalization Records,'' obtainable from the nearestINS district. (See Exhibit B of Subpart A of Part 1944 of this chapter.)Mail the completed form to INS. The payment of a service fee by FmHA toINS is waived by inserting in the upper right hand corner of INS Form G-641,the following: ``INTERAGENCY LAW ENFORCEMENT REQUEST.'' (ii) Possess the legal capacity to incur the obligations of the loan. (iii) Have sufficient applicable educational and/or on the job trainingor farming experience in managing and operating a farm or ranch (within1 of the last 5 years) which indicates the managerial ability necessaryto assure reasonable prospects of success in the proposed plan of operation.(iv) Have the character (emphasizing credit history, past record of debtrepayment and reliability), and industry to carry out the proposed operation.Past record of debt repayment will not be cause for a determination thatthe applicant is not eligible if an honest attempt has been made to meetthe obligation. (v) Honestly try to carry out the conditions and terms of the loan. (vi) Be unable to obtain sufficient credit without a guarantee to financeactual needs at reasonable rates and terms, taking into consideration prevailingprivate and cooperative rates and terms in the community in or near whichthe applicant resides for loans for similar purposes and periods of time.(vii) Be an owner-operator or tenant-operator of not larger than a familyfarm after the loan is closed. (2) A cooperative, corporation, partnership or joint operation must: (i) Be unable to obtain sufficient credit without a guarantee to financeactual needs at reasonable rates and terms, taking into account prevailingprivate and cooperative rates and terms in or near the community for loansfor similar purposes and periods of time. This applies to the entity andall of its members, stockholders, partners, or joint operators, as individuals.(ii) Be controlled by farmers or ranchers engaged primarily and directlyin farming or ranching in the United States after the loan is made. (iii) Consist of members, stockholders, partners or joint operators whoare individuals and not a cooperative(s), corporation(s), partnership(s),or joint operation(s). (iv) If the members, stockholders, partners, or joint operators holdinga majority interest are related by marriage or blood: (A) They must be citizens of the United States (see andSection; 1980.106(b)(21)of this subpart for the definition of ``United States'') or an alien lawfullyadmitted to the United States for permanent residence under the Immigrationand Nationality Act. Aliens must provide INS Forms I-151 or I-551, ``AlienRegistration Receipt Card.'' Indefinite parolees are not eligible. If theauthenticity of the information shown on the alien's identification documentis questioned, the County Supervisor may request INS to verify the informationappearing on the alien's identification card by completing INS Form G-641,``Application for Verification of Information from Immigration and NaturalizationRecords,'' obtainable from the nearest INS district (see Exhibit B of SubpartA of Part 1944 of this chapter). Mail the completed form to INS. The paymentof a service fee by FmHA to INS is waived by inserting in the upper righthand corner of INS Form G-641, the following: ``INTERAGENCY LAW ENFORCEMENTREQUEST.'' (B) They must have sufficient educational or on the job training or farmingexperience in managing and operating a farm or ranch (within 1 of the last5 years) which indicates the managerial ability necessary to assure reasonableprospects of success in the proposed plan of operation.  (C) They and the entity itself must have the character (emphasizing credithistory, past record of debt repayment and reliability), and industry tocarry out the proposed operation. Past record of debt repayment will notbe cause for a determination that the applicant is not eligible if an honestattempt has been made to meet the obligation. (D) They and the entity itself will honestly try to carry out the conditionsand terms of the loan. (E) At least one member, stockholder, partner or joint operator must operatethe family farm. (F) The entity must operate the farm and be authorized to own or operatea farm in the State(s) in which the farm is located. (v) If the members, stockholders, partners or joint operators holding amajority interest are <T3>not </T3>related by marriage or blood: (A) The requirements of paragraphs (b)(2)(iv) (A) through (D) must be met.(B) They and the entity itself must operate the family farm. (C) The entity must operate the farm and be authorized to do so in theState(s) in which the farm is located. (vi) If each member's, partner's, stockholder's or joint operator's ownershipinterest does <T3>not </T3>exceed the family farm definition limits, their collectiveinterests can exceed the family farm definition limits only if: all ofthe members of the entity are related by blood or marriage, all of themembers are or will be operators of the entity, and the majority interestholders of the entity meet the requirements of paragraphs (b)(2)(iv) (A)through (D) and (F) of this section. (c) <T3>Loan purposes._</T3>(1) <T3>Loan Note Guarantee. </T3>Loans may be made for farm, forestry, recreationand nonfarm enterprises for the following purposes, when such purposesare essential to the operation: (i) Purchase of farm machinery and equipment, livestock, poultry, fur bearingand other farm animals, aquaculture, worms, birds, bees, tools, and inventories,or to purchase an individual undivided interest in such items. (ii) Payment of annual operating expenses. (iii) Payment of family living expenses. (iv) Refinancing debt incurred for any authorized operating loan purpose,including FmHA insured loans. (v) Purchase of membership and stock in a farm purchasing, marketing, orservice-type cooperative association, including a grazing association.(vi) Purchase and repair of essential home equipment. (vii) Purchase of milk base or milk quota with or without cows. (viii) Not more than $15,000 in a fiscal year for real estate improvementsor repairs. The following determinations must be made by the lender beforea guaranteed OL loan is made for real estate improvement: (A) Loans will not be needed year after year for this purpose. (B) The applicant owns the farm or has tenure arrangements, including acompensation agreement, sufficient to obtain a reasonable return on theinvestment. (ix) Payments to a creditor. In any one year, OL funds used to make thesepayments cannot exceed 20 percent of the appraised market value of theessential farm and nonfarm equipment and livestock under a prior lien tothe creditor, or 20 percent of the amount owed to such creditor, whicheveris less. (x) Purchase of a franchise, contract or privilege when necessary to theoperation of the planned enterprise. (xi) Partial payment for the purchase and construction of crop, storageand drying facilities when the Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC), throughthe ASCS, is providing a part of the credit under the Commodity CreditCorporation Farm Storage and Drying Equipment Loan Program. (2) <T3>Contract of Guarantee_Line of Credit. </T3>Lines of credit may be advancedfor farm, forestry, recreation and nonfarm enterprises for the followingpurposes, when such purposes are essential to the operation: (i) Payment of annual operating expenses, which may include the purchaseof feeder animals, and family living expenses. (ii) Payment of debts incurred by the borrower for current annual operatingexpenses that were advanced by the lender and/or other creditors/suppliersprior to the issuance of the guarantee. In no case will carryover debtsfrom previous crop years be refinanced. (d) <T3>Loan limitations. </T3>(1) The total outstanding insured and guaranteedOL principal balance owed by the loan applicant or owed by anyone who willsign the note/line of credit agreement as a cosigner may not exceed a totalof $400,000 at loan closing. The amount of principal outstanding at anytime on a guaranteed line of credit also must never exceed the ceilingset out on the Contract of Guarantee. (2) Loans may not be made for: (i) The purchase of real estate, or (ii)Making principal payments on real estate. (3) Guaranteed lines of credit <T3>will not </T3>be used for capital expenditures. (4) Loans also may not be made for any purpose that will contribute toexcessive erosion or highly erodible land or to the conversion of wetlandsto produce an agricultural commodity, as further explained in Exhibit Mto Subpart G of Part 1940 of this chapter. A decision by FmHA to rejectan application for this reason is appealable. However, an appeal questioningeither the presence of a wetland, converted wetland, or highly erodibleland must be filed directly with the USDA agency making the determinationin accordance with its appeal procedures. (5) Multiple Guarantees. More than one Loan Note Guarantee or Contractof Guarantee may be executed with the same or different lenders to a borrowerso long as each loan/line of credit is secured with separate collateralthat is clearly identified. This requirement does not preclude cross-collateralizationof loans/lines of credit with other guaranteed loans/lines of credit toobtain additional collateral provided that the loans/lines of credit areheld by the same lender. Total loans or line of credit ceilings must notexceed $400,000 at any time. (e) <T3>Interest rates. </T3>(1) The interest rate will be a fixed or variablerate agreed upon by the borrower and the lender. The lender will chargethe same rate on both the guaranteed and the non-guaranteed portions ofthe note. (2) The lender may charge a rate <T3>not to exceed </T3>the rate the lender charges its average farm customer.Average farm customers are those conventional borrowers who are requiredto pledge their crops, livestock and other chattel and real estate securityfor the loan. This does not include those high risk farmers with limitedsecurity and management ability that are generally charged a higher interestrate by conventional agricultural lenders. Also, this does not includethose low risk farm customers who obtain financing on a secured or unsecuredbasis who have as collateral items such as saving accounts, time deposits,certificates of deposit, stocks and bonds, and life insurance which theyare able to pledge for the loan. At the request of FmHA the lender willprovide evidence of the rate charged the average farm customers. Such evidencemay consist of average yield data, or documented administrative differentialrate schedule formulas used by the lender. (3) Except for Farm Credit System member institutions, if a variable rateis used, it must be tied to a rate specifically agreed to by the lenderand borrower. Such agreement on interest rate must be documented in theborrower/lender's loan agreement. The interest rate on loans made by aFarm Credit System member institution will be a fixed or variable ratebased on their administrative and borrowing costs. Variable rates may changeaccording to the normal practices of the lender for its average farm customers,but frequency of change must be set forth in the loan/line of credit intstrument.(4) The lender, borrower and holder (if any) may collectively effect atemporary reduction in the interest rate when processing an Interest RateBuydown under Exhibit D of this subpart. The reduced rate of interest mustbe a fixed rate for the term of the buydown. The lender is responsiblefor the legal documentation of interest rate changes by an ``allonge''attached to the promissory note(s) or line of credit agreement or otherlegally effective amendment of the interest rate; however, no new note(s)or line of credit agreement(s) may be issued. If the amendment is attachedto a variable rate note or line of credit agreement, the fixed rate ofinterest charged during the buydown period will be calculated not to exceedthe average variable rate charged the lender's average farm customer overthe past 90 days. (5) Interest will be charged only on the actual amount of funds loanedand for the actual time the loan is outstanding. Interest on protectiveadvances made by the lender to protect the security may be charged at therate specified in the security instruments. (f) <T3>Terms. </T3>(1) The final maturity date for each loan/line of creditcannot exceed 7 years from the date of the promissory note/line of creditagreement.(2) All advances on a line of credit must be made within 3 years from thedate of the Contract of Guarantee.(3) Ordinarily, loan funds used to pay annual operating expenses or billsincurred for such purposes for the crop year being financed will be scheduledfor payment when the income from the year's operation is to be received.Under certain circumstances these payments may be scheduled over longerperiods. Circumstances which warrant an extended repayment schedule arefactors such as establishing a new enterprise, developing a farm, or duringrecovery from disaster or economic reverses. Crops only are not sufficientsecurity when repayment is scheduled over the longer period.(4) Advances for purposes other then those for annual operating expenseswill be scheduled for payment over the minimum period necessary consideringthe applicant's ability to pay and the useful life of the security, butnot in excess of seven years.(5) When conditions warrant, installments scheduled in accordance withparagraph (f)(4) of this section may include equal, unequal, or ballooninstallments. In each case warranting balloon installments there must beadequate collateral for the loan/line of credit at the time the ballooninstallment becomes due. In no case will annual crops and/or machinerybe used as the sole collateral securing a loan with a balloon installment.Circumstances which warrant balloon payments are factors such as establishinga new enterprise, developing a farm, or during recovery from a disasteror economic reverses. The amount ballooned should not exceed that whichthe borrower could reasonably expect to pay during a maximum additional15-year period except for NFE loans, which will be a maximum additional7 years. The applicant must be advised before the loan is closed that thelender will review each case at the end of the initial loan term to determineif such rescheduling is warranted. (See andSection; 1980.124 of this subpart.)(g) <T3>Security. </T3>Ordinarily, the security must be adequate in the opinionof the lender and FmHA to assure repayment of the loan/line of credit.If the security alone is inadequate, then the applicant's repayment abilitywill also be considered by the lender and FmHA (provided the FmHA approvalofficial's opinion is based on the evaluation set forth in andSection; 1980.114of this subpart) in determining whether the loan/line of credit shouldbe made. However, when a loan is made for refinancing purposes. the amountrefinanced may not exceed the value of the security. The loan/line of creditmust be secured by a first lien on all property or products acquired orproduced with loan funds and by any additional security needed. Any loansmade for refinancing when the debt refinanced is secured by real estateor chattels will be secured by a first lien on the property securing thedebt which is being refinanced or when the debt refinanced is secured byreal estate by a junior lien which is no lower than the lien presentlyheld on the property securing the debt being refinanced, and by any additionalsecurity needed. Additional security may consist of the best lien obtainableon chattels, real estate or other property.(h) <T3>Special security requirements. </T3>(1) Operating loans shall not beguaranteed where multiple entities own the chattel unless all entitiesguarantee and pledge security for the loan and no entity may transfer ownershipor security value to another entity without the lender and FmHA concurrence.(2) When guaranteed OL loans are made to eligible <T3>entities </T3>that consist of members, stockholders, partners or jointoperators who are presently indebted for a guaranteed OL loan(s) as individual(s)<T3>or </T3>when guaranteed OL loans are made to eligible <T3>individuals, </T3>who are members, stockholders, partners or jointoperators of an entity which is presently indebted for a guaranteed OLloans(s), security must consist, of chattel and/or real estate securitythat is separate and identifiable from the security pledged to FmHA forany other farmer program insured or guaranteed loans. Different lien positionson real estate are considered separate and identifiable collateral.(i) <T3>Insurance. </T3>Insurance for property, public liability, and cropsshould be obtained before or at the time of loan closing.(1) <T3>Chattel property. </T3>Borrowers should be encouraged to carry insuranceon chattel property, including growing crops, which serves as securityfor a loan and on other chattel or real property, in order to protect themselvesagainst losses resulting from hazards existing in an area. It is especiallydesirable that insurance be obtained by applicants who receive large loansand have considerable chattel property including feed, supplies, and inventorycentrally stored over an extended period. Such insurance may be requiredby the loan approval official in individual cases.(2) <T3>Real estate. </T3>If essential insurable buildings are located on theproperty, or improvements are to be made to existing buildings, the applicant,when required, will provide adequate property insurance coverage at thetime of the loan closing or as of the date materials are delivered to theproperty, whichever is appropriate.Real property insurance will not be required when a real estate appraisalreport shows that both the present market value of the land (after deductingthe value of buildings) and the owner's equity in the land exceed the amountof the debt, including the debts for the loan being made. However, theapplicant will be encouraged to carry insurance. If insurance claims forloss or damage to buildings to be replaced or repaired with loan fundsare outstanding at the time the guarantee is approved, the applicant willbe required to agree in writing that when settlement of these is made,the proceeds will be used to replace or repair buildings, to apply to debtssecured by prior liens, or to apply to the guaranteed OL loan/line of creditbeing made.(3) <T3>Public liability and property damage. </T3>Borrowers, receiving loansfor farm, recreational, or nonfarm enterprises should be advised of thepossibilities of incurring liability and encouraged to obtain public liabilityand property damage insurance, including insurance on a customer's propertyin the custody of the borrower.(j) <T3>Other considerations. </T3>(1) Applicants will be advised by the lenderthat they are expected to comply with any applicable special laws and regulations.(2) Applicants receiving loans for nonfarm enterprises will be advisedof the possibility of incurring liability and encouraged to obtain publicliability and property damage insurance.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 1980.176-1980.179</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Reserved].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.180</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Farm Ownership loans.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Objectives. </T3>The basic objectives of the Farmers Home Administration(FmHA) in guaranteeing farm ownership (FO) loans are to assist eligibleapplicants who cannot get credit without a guarantee to become owner-operatorsof family farms. The operations may include establishment or enlargementof nonfarm enterprises to supplement the farm income.(b) <T3>Farm ownership loan eligibility requirements. </T3>The farm ownershiploan eligibility requirements are the same as the operating loan eligibilityrequirements as defined in andSection; 1980.175(b) of this subpart exceptas follows:(1) Section 1980.175(b)(1)(vii) does not apply. Instead an individual mustbe the owner-operator of not larger than a family farm after the loan isclosed.(2) Section 1980.175(b)(2)(iv)(F) does not apply. Instead a cooperative,corporation, partnership or joint operation must own <T3>and </T3>operate the farm and be authorized to do so in the State(s)in which the farm is located.(c) <T3>Loan purposes. </T3>Loans that are consistent with all Federal, Stateand local environmental quality standards may be made for the followingauthorized loan purposes:(1) Purchase or enlarge a farm, including any land for recreation or othernonfarm enterprise. This may include:(i) Purchasing easements and rights-of-way needed to operate the farm ornonfarm enterprise.(ii) An applicant's portion of the cost of land which is being subdivided.(iii) Making a downpayment on the purchase of land under the followingconditions: (A) A deed is obtained by the applicant and the unpaid balance on the loanis secured by a note and mortgage or an acceptable land purchase contractor similar instrument. (B) The applicant can meet the loan terms under normal farm conditions.(C) The conditions and the requirements of any prior mortgage or contractmeet the security requirements for taking a junior lien as shown in paragraph(f)(2)(iii) of this section. (D) A purchase contract is signed which obligates the purchaser or contractto meet the security requirements for the rights of present possession,control, and beneficial use of the property, and entitles the purchaserto a deed upon paying all or a specific part of the purchase price. (2) Construct, buy, or improve buildings and facilities needed on the applicant'sfarm, including: (i) The construction of an essential farm dwelling and service buildingsof modest design and cost, including facilities and structures for nonfarmenterprise uses or aquaculture such as docks, fish hatcheries, shootingblinds, refreshment or marketing stands, processing or assembly plants,sales buildings, repair shops, lodging facilities, trailer parks, picnicareas, target ranges, tennis courts, shuffleboard courts, golf drivingranges, campsites, and modest rental housing. For dwelling improvementor construction, consideration may be given to additional space requiredfor facilities used for food preparation and storage, vehicle storage,or laundry and office space, the size and cost of which will not exceedthat owned by typical family farmers in the area. (ii) The improvement, alteration, repair, replacement, relocation or purchaseand transfer of such essential dwellings and service buildings, facilities,structures and fixtures that become part of the real estate or customarilypass with the farm when it is sold. This includes pollution control andenergy saving devices. (3) Provide land and water development, pollution control and energy savingmeasures, acquire water supplies and rights, and promote the use and conservationessential to the operation of the farm and any nonfarm enterprise facilities.This includes providing fencing, drainage and irrigation facilities, basicapplications of lime and fertilizer, and facilities for land clearing.This also includes establishing approved forestry practices, fish ponds,trails and lakes; improving orchards; and establishing and improving permanenthay or pasture. Sources of water may be located outside the land ownedprovided appropriate rights or easements are obtained to ensure that thewater rights will pass with the farm when it is sold. The funds for landand water development may include the costs of machinery and equipmentneeded to do the development only when the total cost of the developmentand machinery or equipment would not exceed the cost of hiring someoneto do the development work. Also, loan funds may be used to pay that partof the cost of facilities, improvements and ``practices'' which will bepaid for in connection with participation in such programs as the AgriculturalConservation or Great Plains programs only when such costs cannot be coveredby purchase orders or assignments to material suppliers or contractors.If loan funds are advanced and the portion of the payment for which thefunds were advanced is likely to exceed $1,000, the applicant will assignthe payment to the lender. (i) Funds may be used to pay for development costs on land owned with defectivetitle (see paragraph (f)(2) of this section) or on land in which the applicantowns an undivided interest, provided: (A) The amount of loan funds used on such land is limited to $25,000; (B) There is adequate security for the loan; and (C) The tract with defective title or undivided interest is not includedin the appraisal report. (ii) Funds may be used to pay for development costs on land leased by theapplicant provided: (A) The terms of the lease are such that there is reasonable assurancethe applicant will have use of the improvement over its useful life; (B) A written lease provides for payment to the tenant or assignee of anyunexhausted value of the improvement if the lease is terminated; (C) There is adequate security for the loan; and (D) The amount of loan funds used for improvements on leased land willnot exceed $10,000. (4) Refinance debts subject to the following: (i) The applicant's present creditors will not furnish credit at ratesand terms the applicant can meet. (ii) The lender will verify the need to refinance all secured debts andmajor unsecured debts. The unpaid balance on the debts to be refinancedwill also be verified. (5) Pay reasonable expenses incidental to obtaining, planning, closingand making the loan, such as fees for legal, architectural and other technicalservices, first year insurance premiums, and loan fees authorized in andSection;1980.22 of Subpart A of this part, which are required to be paid by theborrowers and which cannot be paid from other funds. Loan funds also maybe used to pay the borrower's share of Social Security taxes for laborhired by the borrower in connection with land and building development.(6) Finance a nonfarm enterprise when it will provide another source ofnecessary income even though the owned or purchased acreage for such enterpriseis not physically located on the farmland. (7) Purchase any stock in a cooperative lending agency that is necessaryto obtain the loan. (d) <T3>Loan limitations. </T3>A guaranteed FO loan will not be approved if:(1) The total outstanding insured or guaranteed FO, Soil and Water (SW)or Recreation (RL) loan principal balance owed by the applicant or by anyonewho will sign the note as a cosigner will exceed the lesser of $300,000or the market value of the farm or other security. (2) The noncontiguous character of a farm containing two or more tractsis such that an efficient farming operation and nonfarm enterprise cannotbe conducted due to the distance between tracts or due to inadequate rights-of-wayor public roads between tracts. (3) The loan purpose will contribute to excessive erosion of highly erodibleland or to the conversion of wetlands to produce an agricultural commodity,as further explained in Exhibit M to Subpart G of Part 1940 of this chapter.A decision by FmHA to reject an application for this reason is appealable.However, an appeal questioning either the presence of a wetland, convertedwetland, or highly erodible land on a particular property must be fileddirectly with the USDA agency making the determination in accordance withits appeal procedures.(e) <T3>Rates and terms.</T3> Each loan will be scheduled for repayment overa period not to exceed 40 years from the date of the note or such shorterperiod as may be necessary to assure that the loan will be adequately secured,taking into account the probable depreciation of the security.(1) <T3>Interest rates.</T3> The interest rate requirements are the same asset forth for operating loans in andSection; 1980.75(e) of this subpart.(2) Installments on loans may be deferred in accordance with andSection;1980.124(d) of this subpart.(3) At the request of FmHA, the lender will provide evidence of the ratecharged the average farm customer. Such evidence may consist of averageyield data, or documented administrative differential rate schedule formulasused by the lender.(f) <T3>Security.</T3> (1) Each guaranteed FO loan will be secured by realestate only or by a combination of real estate and chattels or other security.(2) When obtaining real estate security the following will apply:(i) A mortgage will be taken on the entire farm owned or to be owned bythe applicant, including land in which the applicant owns an undividedinterest, except a portion of the farm will be excluded when:(A) The applicant's title to that part of the farm is defective, and cannotbe cleared at a reasonable cost provided:(<T3>1</T3>) The lender determines the applicant's interest is of such naturethat it is not mortgageable;(<T3>2</T3>) To include the land would complicate loan servicing or liquidation;and(<T3>3</T3>) Any land on which title is defective will not be included inthe appraisal of the farm whether or not it is described on the mortgage.(<T3>4</T3>) State law prohibits taking a lien on homestead property, exceptfor a purchase money interest in such property. In that case, the StateDirector will issue a State supplement exempting taking a lien on homesteadproperty, where a purchase money interest is involved.(B) The present lienholder on that part of the farm will not permit a juniorlien or State law will not recognize or permit a lien when the securityis not included in the appraisal report.(C) Soundness of the loan will not be affected if there is defective titleor part of the farm is not included as security for the loan.(ii) When the farm alone will not provide enough security, other real estateowned by the applicant may also be taken as security.(iii) Loans may be secured by a junior lien on real estate provided:(A) Prior lien instruments do not contain provisions for future advances(except for taxes, insurance, other costs needed to protect the security,or reasonable foreclosure costs), cancellation, summary forfeiture, orother clauses that may jeopardize the Government's or the lender's interestor the applicant's ability to pay the guaranteed FO loan unless any suchundesirable provisions are limited, modified, waived or subordinated insofaras the Government and the lender are concerned.(B) Agreements are obtained from prior lienholders to give notice of foreclosureto the lender whenever State law or other arrangements do not require sucha notice.(iv) Any loan of $10,000 or less may be secured by the best lien obtainablewithout title clearance or legal services normally required, provided thelender believes from a search of the county records that the applicantcan give a mortgage on the farm. This exception to title clearance willnot apply when land is to be purchased.(3) Loans may be secured by chattels subject to the following conditions:(i) There is not enough real estate security for the loan and the bestlien obtainable on the farm has been taken.(ii) Taking a lien on chattels will not prevent the borrower from obtainingoperating credit from other sources or the FmHA.(iii) Junior liens on chattels may be taken when there is enough equityin the property. However, when practical, a first lien on selected chattelitems should be obtained.(iv) A first lien will be taken on equipment or fixtures bought with loanfunds whenever such property cannot be included in the real estate lienand this additional security is needed to secure the loan.(v) The lender is responsible for obtaining the lien on chattel securityand keeping it effective as notice to third parties.(4) Other items or property may be taken as additional security when needed.These include:(i) Items such as land, buildings, fixtures, fences, water, water stockand facilities, other improvements, easements, rights-of-way, and otherappurtenances that are considered part of the farm and usually pass withthe farm in a change of ownership. If any of these do not pass with a changeof ownership, the lender will identify such items and include them in anappropriate security instrument or assignment.(ii) Other property that cannot be converted to cash without jeopardizingthe borrower's farm operation such as the cash value of insurance policies,stock, memberships or stock in associations or water stocks. Any such propertymust have security value and be transferable.(5) For the State of Hawaii_FO loans on leasehold interests on real property.The term owner-operator as used in this subpart shall include in the Stateof Hawaii the lessee-operator of real property in any case in which theCounty Supervisor determines that such real property cannot be acquiredin fee simple by the lessee-operator. The leasehold must provide adequatesecurity for the loan. A leasehold is the right to use property for a specificperiod of time under conditions provided in a lease agreement. The determinationof value will be made by an appraisal of the present market value of theleasehold by an approved appraiser of the lender. The terms and conditionsof the lease must be such as to allow the lessee-operator to have a reasonableprobability of accomplishing the objectives and repayment of the loan.The FmHA Hawaii State Office will issue a State supplement for this subpartaddressing leasehold interest and providing the requirements (includingforms) for obtaining the required security. The amendment to the Statesupplement and forms, and any revisions to them, must have prior NationalOffice approval before being issued.(g) <T3>Special requirements.</T3> (1) The lender is responsible for makinga preliminary determination as to whether a loan can be made on the farm.This determination will be based on a personal inspection of the farm andan evaluation of such factors as productivity of the land; location, conditions,and adequacy of the buildings; approximate value of the farm; roads, schools,markets, or other community facilities; and tax rates and adequacy of thewater supply. A decision also will be made on the suitability of the farmfor a nonfarm enterprise facility or specialized farm operation, and developmentneeded to make it a suitable farm.(2) Buildings adequate for the planned operation of the farm, includingany nonfarm enterprise, must be available for the applicant's use afterthe loan is made. The necessary buildings ordinarily will be located onthe applicant's farm. Exceptions to this requirement are when:(i) The applicant already owns an adequate, decent, safe, and sanitarydwelling, suitable for the family's needs, and is located close enoughto the farm so the farm may be operated successfully. A real estate lienwill be taken on such dwelling.(ii) The applicant has a long-term lease on acceptable rented buildingsthat are adjacent to or near the farm, or the applicant occupies suitablebuildings which the applicant will eventually inherit or be permitted topurchase from a relative.(iii) The farm does not have an adequate dwelling and the applicant ownsa suitable mobile home which will be used as the applicant's home. A mobilehome will not be considered to add value to the farm but FO guaranteedloan funds may be used to finance anchoring the home.(3) Development needed to make the farm and any nonfarm enterprise readyfor a successful operation will be planned during loan processing. Theplans should provide for completing the development at the earliest practicabledate. The applicant should obtain the recommendations of representativesof the Forest Service, Soil Conservation Service, State Agricultural ExtensionService, and State Planning and Development Agency or local planning groupsto be included in the development plan and in the operating plan. In planningsuch development with the applicant, the lender will encourage the applicantto use any cost-sharing assistance that may be available through any sourcessuch as the ASCS programs.(4) Insurance on buildings and other property, and insurance availablein flood and mudslide hazard areas, will be obtained as required by thelender. Applicants receiving loans for nonfarm enterprises will be advisedby the lender of the possibility of incurring liability and will be encouragedto obtain public liability and property damage insurance. Chattel securityshould be insured against losses caused by hazards customarily insuredagainst in the area if the loss of such security would jeopardize the interestsof the lender and the Government.(5) When loan soundness depends on income from other sources in additionto income from owned land, it will be necessary for the lender to determinethat:(i) There is reasonable assurance that any rented land which the applicantdepends on will be available; and/or(ii) Any off-farm employment the applicant depends on is likely to continue.(6) Nonfarm enterprises will be analyzed by the lender to determine soundness.(7) Other assets not used directly in the farming operation will be handledas follows:(i) A guaranteed FO loan may be made when essential real estate is owned,either in whole or as an undivided interest, that will not be part of thefarm provided:(A) The real estate furnishes employment or income which is essential tothe applicant's success.(B) Sale of the property will not eliminate the need for FmHA guaranteedcredit.(C) Retention of the real estate will not cause the operation to be largerthan a family farm.(ii) An applicant will dispose of nonessential real estate or an undividedinterest in real estate no later than loan closing. If this is not feasible,the applicant must agree in writing to dispose of the property as soonafter closing as possible. Under no circumstances may the property be heldfor more than three years after closing.(iii) The applicant must agree to use the proceeds from the sale of otherreal estate to:(A) Pay costs and taxes connected with the sale;(B) Reduce the FmHA guaranteed debt or any prior lien;(C) Make essential capital purchases; or(D) Pay essential farm and home expenses.(iv) Real estate or an interest in real estate which is retained afterloan closing, but which is not part of the farm will not be included in:(A) The appraisal report.(B) The security instrument for the loan.(C) The total debt against the security.(8) When life estates are involved, loans may be made:(i) To both the life estate holder and the remainderman, provided:(A) Both have a legal right to occupy and operate the farm; and(B) Both are eligible for the loan; and(C) Both parties sign the note and mortgage.(ii) To the remainderman only, provided:(A) The remainderman has a legal right to occupy and operate the farm;and(B) The lien instrument is signed by the remainderman, life estate holder,and any other party having any interest in the security.(iii) To the life estate holder only, provided:(A) There is no legal restriction placed on a life estate holder who occupiesand operates a farm; and(B) The lien instrument is signed by the life estate holder, remainderman,and any other party having any interest in the security.(9) A loan will not be approved if a lien junior to the lender's lien securingthe guaranteed loan is likely to be taken simultaneously with or immediatelysubsequent to the loan closing to secure any debt the borrower may haveat the time of loan closing or any debt that may be incurred in connectionwith the guaranteed loan such as for a portion of the purchase price ofthe farm or money borrowed from others for payments on debts against thefarm, unless the total debt against the security would be within its marketvalue.(10) When guaranteed FO loans are made to eligible <T3>entities</T3> that consist of members, stockholders, partners or jointoperators who are presently indebted for a guaranteed FO loan(s) as individual(s)<T3>or</T3> when guaranteed FO loans are made to eligible <T3>individuals</T3>, who are members, stockholders, partners or jointoperators of an entity which is presently indebted for a guaranteed FOloan(s), security must consist of chattel and/or real estate security thatis separate and identifiable from the security pledged to FmHA for anyother farmer program insured or guaranteed loans. Different lien positionson real estate are considered separate and identifiable collateral.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 1980.181-1980.184</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Reserved].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.185</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Soil and Water loans.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Objectives</T3>. The basic objectives of the guaranteed SW loan programare to encourage and facilitate the improvement, protection, and properuse of farmland by providing financing for soil conservation; water development,conservation, and use; forestation; drainage of farmland; establishmentand improvement of permanent pasture; pollution abatement and control;and other related measures consistent with all Federal, State, and localenvironmental quality standards. Achieving these objectives should helpfarmers to make needed land-use adjustments and should lessen the impactof adverse weather conditions on farming operations.(b) <T3>Soil and Water loan eligibility requirements</T3>. In accordance withthe Food Security Act of 1985 (Pub. L. 99-198) after December 23, 1985,if an individual or any member, stockholder, partner, or joint operatorof an entity is convicted under Federal or State law of planting, cultivating,growing, producing, harvesting or storing a controlled substance (see 21CFR Part 1308, which is Exhibit C of Subpart A of Part 1941 of this chapterand is available in any FmHA office, for the definition of ``controlledsubstance'') prior to the issuance of the Loan Note Guarantee in any cropyear, the individual or entity shall be ineligible for a loan guaranteefor the crop year in which the individual or member, stockholder, partner,or joint operator of the entity was convicted and the four succeeding cropyears. Applicants will attest on Form FmHA 410-1, ``Application for FmHAServices,'' that as individuals or that its members, if an entity, havenot been convicted of such crime after December 23, 1985. In addition,the following requirements must be met:(1) An individual must:(i) Be a citizen of the United States (see andSection; 1980.106(b)(21) ofthis subpart for the definition of ``United States'') or an alien lawfullyadmitted to the United States for permanent residence under the Immigrationand Nationality Act. Aliens must provide INS Forms I-151 or I-551, ``AlienRegistration Receipt Card.'' Indefinite parolees are not eligible. If theauthenticity of the information shown on the alien's identification documentis questioned, the County Supervisor may request the INS to verify theinformation appearing on the alien's identification card by completingINS Form G-641, ``Application for Verification of Information from Immigrationand Naturalization Records,'' obtainable from the nearest INS district(see Exhibit B of Subpart A of Part 1944 of this chapter). Mail the completedform to INS. The payment of a service fee by FmHA to INS is waived by insertingin the upper right hand corner of INS Form G-641, the following: ``INTERAGENCYLAW ENFORCEMENT REQUEST.''(ii) Possess the legal capacity to incur the obligations of the loan.(iii) Have the character (emphasizing credit history, past record of debtrepayment and reliability) and industry to carry out the proposed operation.Past record of debt repayment will not be cause for a determination thatthe applicant is not eligible if an honest attempt has been made to meetthe obligation.(iv) Honestly try to carry out the conditions and terms of the loan.(v) Be unable to obtain sufficient credit without a guarantee to financeactual needs at reasonable rates and terms, taking into consideration prevailingprivate and cooperative rates and terms in the community in or near whichthe applicant resides for loans for similar purposes and periods of time.(vi) Be the owner or operator of a farm after the loan is closed.(vii) If a tenant, have a satisfactory written lease for a sufficient periodof time and under terms that will enable the operator to obtain reasonablereturns on the improvements to be made with the guaranteed loan. In addition,the lease or separate agreement should provide for compensating the tenantfor any unexhausted value of the improvements upon termination of the lease.(2) A cooperative, corporation, partnership or joint operation must:(i) Along with all of its members, stockholders, partners, or joint operatorshave the character (emphasizing credit history, past record of debt repaymentand reliability) and industry to carry out the proposed operation. Pastrecord of debt repayment will not be cause for a determination that theapplicant is not eligible if an honest attempt has been made to meet theobligation.(ii) Along with all of its members, stockholders, partners, or joint operators,honestly try to carry out the conditions and terms of the loan.(iii) Consist of members, stockholders, partners or joint operators holdinga majority interest who are citizens of the United States (see andSection;1980.106(b)(21)of this subpart for the definition of ``United States''), or an alien lawfullyadmitted to the United States for permanent residence under the Immigrationand Nationality Act. Aliens must provide INS Forms I-151 or I-551, ``AlienRegistration Receipt Card.'' Indefinite parolees are not eligible. If theauthenticity of the information shown on the alien's identification documentis questioned, the County Supervisor may request the INS to verify theinformation appearing on the alien's identification card by completingINS Form G-641, ``Application for Verification of Information from Immigrationand Naturalization Records,'' obtainable from the nearest INS district(see Exhibit B of Subpart A of Part 1944 of this chapter). Mail the completedform to INS. The payment of a service fee by FmHA to INS is waived by insertingin the upper right hand corner of INS Form G-641, the following: ``INTERAGENCYLAW ENFORCEMENT REQUEST.''(iv) Be authorized to own and/or operate a farm in the State(s) in whichthe farm is located.(v) Be unable to obtain sufficient credit without a guarantee, either asan entity or as individual members, stockholders, partners, or joint operators,to finance actual needs at reasonable rates and terms, taking into accountprevailing private and cooperative rates and terms in or near the communityfor loans for similar purposes and periods of time.(vi) Be controlled by individuals engaged primarily and directly in farmingor ranching in the United States after the loan is made.(vii) Be the owner or operator of a farm after the loan is made.(viii) If a tenant, have a satisfactory written lease for a sufficientperiod of time and under terms that will enable the applicant to obtainreasonable returns on the improvements made with the loan. In addition,the lease or separate agreement should provide for compensating the tenantfor any unexhausted value of the improvements upon termination of the lease.(ix) Consist of members, stockholders, partners or joint operators whoare <T3>individuals</T3> and not corporation(s), partnership(s), cooperative(s),or joint operations.(c) <T3>Loan purposes.</T3> Loan purposes must be consistent with all Federal,State and local environmental quality standards and funds may be used to:(1) Pay the costs for construction, materials, supplies, equipment, andservices related to land and water development, use, and conservation;and energy saving measures related to soil and water conservation, suchas:(i) Terraces, dikes, reservoirs, ponds, tanks, cisterns, liquid and solidwaste disposal facilities, wells, pipelines, pumping and irrigation equipment,ditches and canals for drainage, waterways, and erosion control structures.(ii) Drainage of land which is part of an operating farm unit.(iii) Land clearing.(iv) Sodding, subsoiling, land leveling, liming and fencing.(v) Fertilizer and seed used in connection with a soil conservation practiceor to establish or improve permanent vegetation.(vi) Forestation for sustained yield and tree planting for erosion controlor shelter belt purposes.(vii) Gasoline, oil, and equipment rental or hire connected with establishingor completing the development.(viii) Reasonable expenses incidental to obtaining, planning, closing andmaking the loan, such as fees for legal, engineering or other technicalservices, hazard insurance premiums, and loan fees authorized in andSection;1980.22 of Subpart A of this part, which are required to be paid by theborrower and which cannot be paid from other funds. Loan funds may alsobe used to pay the borrower's share of Social Security taxes for laborhired by the borrower in connection with making any planned improvements.(ix) Purchase or repair of special-purpose equipment such as terracing,land leveling and ditching equipment, provided:(A) Such equipment is needed and will facilitate the completion or maintenanceof the planned improvement, and (B) The cost of the equipment plus the other costs related to the improvementwill not be more than if performed by a contractor or by another method.(2) Pay the costs of meeting Federal, State and local requirements foragricultural, animal, or poultry waste pollution abatement and controlfacilities, including construction, modification, or relocation of thefarm or farm structures if necessary to comply with such pollution abatementrequirements.(3) Acquire a source of water to be used on land the applicant owns, willacquire, or operates including:(i) The purchase of water stock or membership in an incorporated wateruser association.(ii) The acquisition of a water right through appropriation, agreement,permit, or decree.(iii) The acquisition of water supply or right, and the land on which itis presently being used, when the water supply or right cannot be purchasedwithout the land, provided:(A) The value of the land without the water supply or right is only anincidental part of the total price; and(B) The water supply and right will be transferred to, and used more effectivelyon, other land owned or operated by the applicant.(4) Refinance debts subject to the following:(i) The debts were incurred for authorized guaranteed SW loan purposes.(ii) All development or repair work conforms to FmHA standards or thosestandards will be met with the guaranteed loan.(iii) The applicant's present creditors will not furnish credit at ratesand terms the applicant can meet.(iv) The lender will verify the need to refinance all secured and majorunsecured debts. The unpaid balance on the debts to be refinanced willalso be verified.(5) Purchase land or an interest therein for sites or rights-of-way andeasements upon which a water or drainage facility will be located.(6) Pay that part of the cost of facilities, improvements, and ``practices''which will be paid for in connection with participation in programs administeredby agencies such as the ASCS or the Soil Conservation Service (SCS) onlywhen such costs cannot be covered by purchase orders or assignments tomaterial suppliers or contractors. If loan funds are advanced and the portionof the payment for which the funds were advanced is likely to exceed $1,000,the applicant will assign the payment to the lender.(7) Provide water supply facilities for dwellings and farm buildings, includingsuch facilities as wells, pumps, farmstead distribution systems, and homeplumbing.(8) Pay costs of land and water development, use, and conservation essentialto the applicant's farm, subject to the following:(i) Such a loan may be made on land with defective title owned by the applicant(see paragraph (f) of this section) or on land in which the applicant ownsan undivided interest providing:(A) The amount of funds used on such land is limited to $25,000,(B) There is adequate security for the loan, and(C) The tract is not included in the appraisal report.(ii) Such a loan may be made on land leased by the applicant providing:(A) The terms of the lease are such that there is reasonable assurancethe applicant will have use of the improvement over its useful life.(B) A written lease provides for payment to the tenant or assignee anyunexhausted value of the improvement if the lease is terminated.(C) There is adequate security for the loan.(9) Purchase any stock in a cooperative lending agency that is necessaryto obtain the loan.(d) <T3>Loan limitations.</T3> A guaranteed SW loan will not be approved if:(1) The total outstanding insured or guaranteed SW, FO or RL loan principalbalance owed by the applicant or owed by anyone who will sign the noteas a cosigner will exceed the lesser of $300,000 or the market value ofthe farm or other security.(2) The noncontiguous character of a farm containing two or more tractsis such that an efficient farming operation and nonfarm enterprise cannotbe conducted due to the distance between tracts or due to inadequate rights-of-wayor public roads between tracts.(3) The loan purpose will contribute to excessive erosion of highly erodibleland or to the conversion of wetlands to produce an agricultural commodity,as further explained in Exhibit M to Subpart G of Part 1940 of this chapter.A decision by FmHA to reject an application for this reason is appealable.However, an appeal questioning either the presence of a wetland, convertedwetland, or highly erodible land on a particular property must be fileddirectly with the USDA agency making the determination in accordance withits appeal procedures.(e) <T3>Rates and terms.</T3> Each loan will be scheduled for repayment overa period not to exceed 40 years from the date of the note or such shorterperiod as may be necessary to assure that the loan will be adequately secured,taking into account the probable depreciation of the security.(1) The interest rates requirements are the same as set forth for operatingloans in andSection; 1980.175(e) of this subpart.(2) Installments may be deferred in accordance with andSection; 1980.124(d)of this subpart. (f) <T3>Security.</T3> (1) Each guaranteed SW loan will be secured by realestate, chattels, other security, leaseholds, or a combination of these.(2) When obtaining real estate security, the following will apply:(i) A mortgage will be taken on the entire farm to be improved which isowned by the applicant, including land in which the applicant owns an undividedinterest, except a portion of the farm will be excluded when:(A) The applicant's title to that part of the farm is defective, and cannotbe cured at a reasonable cost, provided:(<T3>1</T3>) The lender determines the applicant's interest is of such naturethat it is not mortgageable; and(<T3>2</T3>) To include the land would complicate loan servicing or liquidation;and(<T3>3</T3>) Any land on which title is defective will not be included inthe appraisal of the farm whether or not it is described on the mortgage.(<T3>4</T3>) State law prohibits taking a lien on homestead property, exceptfor a purchase money interest in such property. The State Director willissue a State supplement exempting taking a lien on homestead propertywhere purchase money interest is involved.(B) The present lienholder on that part of the farm will not permit a juniorlien or State law will not recognize or permit a lien provided the partexcluded from the security is not included in the appraisal report.(C) Soundness of the loan will not be affected if there is defective titleor part of the farm is not included as security.(ii) When the farm alone will not provide enough security, other real estateowned by the applicant may also be taken as security.(iii) Loans may be secured by a junior lien on real estate provided:(A) Prior lien instruments do not contain provisions for future advances(except for taxes, insurance, other costs needed to protect the security,or reasonable foreclosure costs), cancellation, summary forfeiture, orother clauses that may jeopardize the Government's or the lender's interestor the applicant's ability to pay the guaranteed loan unless any such undesirableprovisions are limited, modified, waived or subordinated insofar as theGovernment and the lender are concerned.(B) Agreements are obtained from prior lienholders to give notice of foreclosureto the lender whenever State law or other arrangements do not require sucha notice.(iv) Any loan of $10,000 or less may be secured by the best lien obtainablewithout title clearance or legal services normally required, provided thelender believes from a search of the county records that the applicantcan give a mortgage on the farm. This exception to title clearance willnot apply when land is to be purchased.(3) Loans may be secured by chattels subject to the following conditions:(i) Real estate security is inadequate to secure the loan or is not availableat all.(ii) Taking a lien on chattels will not prevent the borrower from obtainingoperating credit from other sources or the FmHA.(iii) Junior liens on chattels may be taken when there is enough equityin the property. However, when practical, a first lien on selected chattelitems should be obtained.(iv) A first lien will be taken on equipment or fixtures bought with loanfunds whenever such property cannot be included in the real estate lienand this additional security is needed to secure the loan.(v) When a loan is made only for the purchase of shares of water stock,such stock will be pledged or assigned as security for the loan. No othersecurity need be required if the stock represents the right to receivewater and is transferable separately from the land, provided:(A) There is a market for the stock.(B) The purchase price is no greater than the price at which stock in thewater company is normally sold.(vi) If secured by chattels only, the loan cannot be over $100,000 andmust be scheduled for repayment within 20 years or the useful life of thesecurity, whichever is less.(vii) The lender is responsible for obtaining the lien on chattel securityand keeping it effective as notice to third parties.(4) Other items or property may be taken as additional security when needed.These include:(i) Items such as land, buildings, fixtures, fences, water, water stockand facilities, other improvements, easements, rights-of-way, and otherappurtenances that are considered part of the farm and usually pass withthe farm in a change of ownership. If any of these do not pass with a changeof ownership, the lender will properly identify such items and includethem in an appropriate security instrument or assignment.(ii) Other property that cannot be converted to cash without jeopardizingthe borrower's farm operation such as the cash value of insurance policies,stock, memberships or stock in associations, or water stocks. Any suchproperty must have security value and be transferable. (5) A loan may be secured by a mortgage on the leasehold if it has negotiablevalue and is able to be mortgaged, subject to the following: (i) The unexpired term of the lease should extend beyond the repaymentperiod of the loan for a period sufficient to ensure that the objectivesof the loan will be achieved. It the loan repayment period is equal toor greater than the period covered by the lease, the borrower must provideother security to secure the loan or the lessor must agree in writing tocompensate the borrower for any unexhausted value of the improvements whenthe lease expires or is terminated. (ii) The lessor must have good and marketable title to the real estate,which may be subject to a prior lien, or the lessor must have signed acontract to purchase the real estate. The contract to sell and the lieninstruments must not contain covenants, such as short redemption periodsor rights to cancel, which may jeopardize the lender's security. Any provisionswhich may jeopardize the lender's security must be limited, modified, waivedor subordinated in favor of the lender. (iii) With respect to achieving the purpose of the loan, obtaining adequatesecurity, and being able to service the loan and enforce its rights, thelender, as holder of a mortgage upon a lease or leasehold interest, mustbe in a position substantially as good as if it held a second mortgageon the real estate. Besides the lessor's consent to the mortgage on theleasehold interest, the lender should consider whether or not: (A) There is reasonable security of tenure. The borrower's interest shouldnot be subject to summary forfeiture or cancellation. (B) The right to foreclose the mortgage and sell without restriction wouldadversely affect the saleability or market value of the security. (C) The lender has a right to bid at a foreclosure sale or to accept voluntaryconveyance in lieu of foreclosure. (D) The lender has the right, after acquiring the leasehold through foreclosureor voluntary conveyance in lieu of foreclosure, or in event of abandonmentby the borrower, to occupy the property or sublet it, and to sell it forcash or credit. (E) The borrower has the right, in the event of default or inability tocontinue with the lease and the loan, to transfer the leasehold, subjectto the mortgage, to an eligible transferee who will assume the guaranteedSW debt. (F) Advance notice will be given to the lender of the lessor's intentionto cancel, terminate or foreclose upon the lease. Such advance notice shouldbe long enough to permit the lender to ascertain the amount of delinquencies,the total amount of the lessor's and any other prior interest, the marketvalue of the leasehold interest and, if litigation is involved, permitappropriate action by the lender to be taken. (G) There are express provisions covering the question of the lender'sobligation to pay unpaid rental or other charges accrued at the time itacquires possession of the property or title to the leasehold, and thosewhich become due during the lender's occupancy or ownership, pending furtherservicing or liquidation. (H) There are any necessary provisions to assure fair compensation to thelessee for any part of the premises taken by condemnation. (I) Any other provisions are necessary to obtain an interest which canbe mortgaged. (iv) The following language or similar language which is legally adequatewill be inserted on the lien instrument:<ITAG tagnum="21">All Borrower's right, title, and interest in and to the leaseholdestate for a term of <T2>XX</T2> years beginning on <T2>XXXXX</T2>, 19<T2>XX</T2>, created and established by a certain Lease dated <T2>XXXXXX</T2>, 19<T2>XX</T2>, executed by <T2>XXXXX</T2> as lessor(s), recorded on <T2>XXXXX</T2>, 19<T2>XX</T2>, in Book <T2>XXXX</T2>, page <T2>XX</T2> of the <T2>XXXXX</T2> Records of said County and State, and any renewals and extensionsthereof, and all Borrower's right, title, and interest in and to said Lease,covering the following real estate: (To be inserted just before the legaldescription.)</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">This additional covenant will be inserted in the mortgage:<ITAG tagnum="21">Borrower will pay when due all rents and all other charges requiredby said Lease, will comply with all other requirements of said Lease, andwill not surrender or relinquish without the lender's written consent,any of the Borrower's right, title or interest in or to said leaseholdestate or under said Lease while this instrument remains in effect.</ITAG>(g) <T3>Special requirements.</T3> (1) When possible, recommendations for landdevelopment will be obtained from the Forest Service, State AgriculturalExtension Service, and the Soil Conservation Service and included in thedevelopment plan and in the operating plans. In planning such developmentwith the applicant, the lender will encourage the applicant to use anycost-sharing assistance that may be available through any source such asthe ASCS programs.(2) Applicants are responsible for obtaining all the technical assistancerequired in connection with a guaranteed SW loan, such as that needed toplan, construct, or establish the improvement or facility to be financed.(3) Evidence or documentation of the following should be obtained whenloan funds are to be used for irrigation purposes:(i) The land to be irrigated is suitable for irrigation.(ii) The applicant has a right to use water for irrigation.(iii) The water is suitable to use for irrigation and is available in sufficientquantities to irrigate a specified amount of land.(iv) If irrigation specialists have prepared any feasibility studies, copiesof these studies should be submitted to the lender.(4) Insurance on building and other property, and insurance available inflood and mudslide hazard areas, will be obtained as required by the lender.Chattel security should be insured against losses caused by hazards customarilyinsured against in the area if the loss of such security would jeopardizethe interests of the lender and the Government.(5) When life estates are involved, loans may be made:(i) To both the life estate holder and the remainderman, provided:(A) Both have a legal right to occupy and operate the farm; and(B) Both are eligible for the loan; and(C) Both parties sign the note and mortgage.(ii) To the remainderman only, provided:(A) The remainderman has a legal right to occupy and operate the farm;and(B) The lien instrument is signed by the remainderman, life estate holder,and any other party having any interest in the security.(iii) To the life estate holder only, provided:(A) There is no legal restriction placed on a life estate holder who occupiesand operates a farm; and (B) The lien instrument is signed by the life estate holder, remainderman,and any other party having any interest in the security.(6) A loan will not be approved if a lien junior to the lender's lien securingthe guaranteed loan is likely to be taken simultaneously with or immediatelysubsequent to the loan closing to secure any debt the borrower may haveat the time of loan closing or any debt that may be incured in connectionwith the guaranteed loan, unless the total debt against the security wouldbe within its market value.(7) When guarantees SW loans are made to eligible <T3>entities </T3>that consist of members, stockholders, partners or jointoperators who are presently indebted for a guaranteed SW loan(s) are madeto eligible <T3>individual(s), or</T3> when guaranteed SW loans are made to eligible<T3>individuals, </T3> who are members, stockholders, partners or jointoperators of an entity which is presently indebted for a guaranteed SWloan(s), security must consist of chattel and/or real estate security thatis separate and identifiable from the security pledged to FmHA for anyother farmer program insured or guaranteed loans. Different lien positionson real estate are considered separate and indentifiable collateral.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 1980.186-1980.199</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Reserved].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.200</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">OMB control number.</ITAG>The collection of information requirements in this regulation have beenapproved by the Office of Management and Budget and assigned OMB controlnumber 0575-0079.<ITAG tagnum="84">Exhibit A_Approved Lender Program_Farm Ownership, Soil and Water andOperating Loans</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. <T3>General:</T3> This Exhibit provides policies and procedures to establishan Approved Lender Program (ALP) for Guaranteed Operating Loans (OL) describedin andSection; 1980.175, Farm Ownership (FO) Loans described in andSection;1980.180 and Soil and Water (SW) loans described in andSection; 1980.185of this subpart. The objectives are to minimize time required by approvedlenders in obtaining response to request for a guarantee, eliminate therequirement of having Form FmHA 449-35, ``Lender's Agreement,'' or FormFmHA 1980-38, ``Lender's Agreement (Line of Credit),'' executed for eachloan or line of credit guaranteed by Farmers Home Administration (FmHA),permit maximum use of forms normally used by the lender, require lenderto provide FmHA a credit analysis and reduce the workload responsibilitiesof FmHA. FmHA will make the final determination on eligibility, loan purposesand repayment terms. The ALP agreements, Attachments 1 and 2, will serveas the ``Lender's Agreement'' for guarantees issued by FmHA under thisExhibit. Attachment 1 is the Lender's Agreement to be executed in relationto regular term loans. Attachment 2 is the Lender's Agreement that is tobe executed in relation to lines of credit. The lender, in its application,should indicate the type(s) of advances to be made.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Authority.</T3> The authorizations contained in this Exhibit provide:(1) Methods for initial approval period, subsequent approval period(s)and revocation of ALP status; (2) Methods an ALP lender will use to process,service and conclude guaranteed OL, SW, and FO loans; (3) Methods FmHAwill use to consider an ALP lender's request for guarantee and monitorguaranteed OL, SW, and FO loan activities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Policy.</T3> The purpose of an ALP is to expand the guaranteed OL,SW, and FO programs, supplement present insured loan authority, and makecredit available to not larger than family farm owners and/or operatorswho are presently in a ``credit availability gap.'' The ``credit availabilitygap'' farmers are those who slightly exceed FmHA's insured loan eligibilitycriteria but who face a degree of financial stress which renders them unableto fully qualify for adequate credit based upon standards required by thecommercial agricultural lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>List of Lenders.</T3> The County Supervisor will maintain a currentlist of approved lenders and other lenders who express a desire to participatein the guaranteed program. This list will be made available to farmersupon request.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">II. <T3>Lender Approval, Subsequent Approval Period(s) and Revocation of ALPStatus.</T3> Lenders who meet the required and other criteria may be grantedALP status for a period not to exceed 2 years by the State Director forthe State in which the lender is authorized to do business. All initialand any subsequent approvals of ALP status will be in the form of an agreementsigned by the State Director and the lending institution. The agreementwill be Attachment 1 and/or Attachment 2 of the Exhibit. The agreementwill not apply to branches or subofficies of the lender unless specificallynamed in the Agreement. In cases involving the Farm Credit System (FCS),the State Director shall give ALP status, within the State Director's areaof jurisdiction, to any FCS member institution provided such members donot have loan losses exceeding 6 percent per year for each of the threeprevious years or 18 percent of the institution's average loan portfoliocomputed for the three previous years. FCS member institutions having anacceptable loan loss percentage as specified above are exempt from complyingwith requirements of paragraph II A (1)(a) through (d) and (2). The FarmCredit Administration (FCA) will notify the FmHA Administrator in writingannually or sooner of any FCS member institution that has loan losses exceedingthe acceptable percentage specified above.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">To obtain ALP status, an FCS member institution with an acceptableloan loss percentage need only execute the agreement (Attachment 1 and/orAttachment 2 of this Exhibit) and satisfy the State Director that it isusing acceptable forms as provided in paragraph II A (1)(e). Even if anFCS member institution is not identified by FCA as having an acceptableloan loss percentage, that institution may still request the State Directorto consider it for ALP status under paragraphs II A (1) and (2). When FCSmember institutions reorganize into one association, the reorganized associationmust be considered for ALP status as an initial applicant with unacceptableloan losses. Except for those FCS member institutions identified by FCAas having an acceptable loan loss percentage, ALP status will expire atthe end of any approved 2-year period unless the lender applies for a newagreement which can be approved by the appropriate State Director. TheALP status of <T3>any</T3> lender may be revoked by the FmHA State Director as outlinedin paragraph C. State Directors will keep their respective FmHA Countyand District Offices fully informed, by use of State supplements, of thenames and addresses of all lending institutions, branches or subofficesthat hold ALP status. The name of each ALP lender's designated person oragricultural loan officer who will process and service guaranteed loansfor the ALP lender will be included.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Lender Approval.</T3> Any lender who desires to apply for ALP statusmust also be an ``Eligible Lender'' as defined in andSection; 1980.13(b)of Subpart A of this part. Except for FCS member institutions having anacceptable loan loss percentage as specified in the introductory text toparagraph II, lenders who meet this requirement and desire ALP status willprepare a written request to the State Director for the State in whichthey desire to have ALP status. The written request will address each itemof ``required criteria'' and ``optional criteria,'' contained in paragraphsII A (1) and (2) and may be accompanied by any supporting evidence or otherinformation the applicant lender believes will be helpful to the StateDirector in making a decision on the application for ALP status. Any FmHACounty, District or State Office may provide a lender who desires to applyfor ALP status, a complete copy of Subparts A and B of this part, includinga copy of this Exhibit, and will assist in completion of the request. TheState Director will make any necessary investigation or inquiry to determineaccuracy of information and notify the applicant lender within 15 daysof receipt of a request that the request is approved, denied, or requiresadditional information. The application material will be retained by theState Director for all approved lenders and periodic checks will be madeby FmHA personnel to insure the lender's performance is as outlined inthe application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) <T3>Required Criteria</T3>. Other than as noted in paragraph II A above,before a State Director approves a lender, including an FCS member institutionthat is not identified by FCA as having as having an acceptable annualpercentage of loan losses, for ALP status, the requirements listed in paragraphsII A (1) (a) through (f) must be met. However, upon the request of a lenderasking for ALP status, the State Director may exempt that lender from complyingwith the requirement of paragraph II A (1)(b) provided the lender complieswith all the other requirements listed in paragraph II A (1) if the StateDirector is satisfied that the lender_without regard to the requirementfor which the exemption is being requested_is an acceptable agriculturallender with the ability to adequately make and service agricultural loans.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Provide evidence of being an ``Eligible Lender'' as defined inSubpart A of this part.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Provide information to show that agricultural loan losses_netof recovery_do not exceed the following:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) For FCS member institutions, either 6 percent per year of theinstitution's total loan portfolio for each of the three previous yearsor 18 percent of the institution's average loan portfolio computed forthe three previous years; <T3>or</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) For all other lenders, either 1\1/2\ percent per year of thelender's total agricultural loan portfolio computed for the three previousyears or 4\1/2\ percent of the lender's average agricultural loan portfoliocomputed for the three previous years.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Have the capacity to process and service FmHA guaranteed FO andSW loans and OL loans/lines of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Designate a person(s) who will process and service FmHA guaranteedOL loans/lines of credit and SW and FO loans and agree for the person(s)to attend training sessions provided by FmHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) Agree to use forms acceptable to FmHA for processing, analyzing,securing and servicing FmHA guaranteed loans/lines of credit. Copies offinancial statements, cash flow plans, budgets, loan agreements, analysissheets, recordkeeping methods, collateral control sheets, security andother forms to be used must be submitted for FmHA acceptability with requestfor ALP status. See andSection; 1980.109 and andSection; 1980.113 of this subpartfor required forms.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) Agree to abide by all applicable conditions of andSection; 1980.60of Subpart A of this part for all loan guarantees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Optional Criteria</T3>. Exceptions to the following criteria may bemade at the discretion of the State Director.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Have experience and familiarity with FmHA insured and guaranteedloan programs. State length of time and types of loans/lines of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Establish that at least $2.5 million or 50 percent (whicheveris less) of total loan portfolio is in agricultural loans.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Provide a resume of designated person who will process and serviceguaranteed FmHA loans/lines of credit. Minimum of 30 college hours in agriculturalscience, training in Agriculture Economics and/or at least two (2) yearsexperience in making and servicing agricultural type loans for productionand for real estate purposes is required. If the designated person alsoperforms appraisal duties a qualification statement will be included.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Provide a copy of its most recent Report of Condition and Income(Call Report) and description of current level of agricultural and otherleading activities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) Demonstrate a potential capacity for guaranteed OL loan/line ofcredit and guaranteed FO and SW loan activity in trade area. Must haveability to process and service at least 10 guaranteed OL loans/lines ofcredit and/or SW and/or FO loans, subject to availability of funds, perfiscal year (October 1-September 30).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) Provide comments on experience or ability to comply with regulatoryrequirements, e.g., Environmental Assessments, Equal Opportunity, Floodand Mudslide, Clean Air, etc. (See andSection;andSection;1980.40 through 1980.46of Subpart A of this part.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(g) Agree to submit requests for guaranteed OL loans/lines of creditand/or SW and/or FO loans to county official(s) in service areas afterapplication is complete to coincide with scheduled meetings of the localFmHA County Committee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(h) Provide any other supplemental information the lender desiresto submit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Subsequent Approval Period(s). </T3>Except for those FCS member institutionsthat have acceptable loan losses as specified in the introductory textof paragraph II, a new 2-year period of ALP status is not automatic. Lenderswho desire to continue in ALP status are required to submit a request forsubsequent approved periods at least 60 days prior to the expiration ofany existing approved period. At least 30 days prior to the expirationof any approved ALP period, the State Director will complete a review ofthe ALP criteria, the lender's past performance, consult appropriate FmHAcounty and district personnel, and, if requested by the lender, determineif a new 2-year period of ALP status can be approved. The lender's requestwill be in writing to the State Director and contain, as a minimum, thefollowing:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) A brief summary of activity as an ALP lender including numberand dollar amount of guaranteed OL loan/lines of credit, SW loans, and/orFO loans extant, number and dollar amount processed during tenure as ALP,number and dollar amount now under consideration, potential guaranteedOL, SW, and/or FO lending activity and recap of any loss settlements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) A current update of data required in paragraphs IIA(1) (a) and(b) and IIA(2)(d) of this Exhibit and any proposed changes in agricultrualloan officer(s), forms used, or operating methods used in guaranteed OLloan/line of credit, SW loan, and/or FO loan processing and servicing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Request for a new 2-year period of ALP status.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The State Director will promptly review the request, make any inquiryneeded to arrive at a decision; and notify the ALP lender of approved ALPstatus for two years, or required conditions for approval, or denial withreasons. An ALP lender who has not participated in the guaranteed programduring the previous 2 year approved period must submit a request as outlinedin paragraph II A of this Exhibit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>Revocation of ALP Status. </T3>Except for those FCS member institutionsthat have acceptable loan losses as specified in the introductory textof paragraph II, ALP status will lapse upon expiration of any 2-year periodunless the lender obtains a new agreement under paragraph II B.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The State Director will revoke ALP status of any approved lender whofails to maintain ``required criteria'' as approved in the applicationfor ALP status and may revoke status for failure to meet any ``optionalcriteria'' as agreed. Status shall also be revoked if the lender violatesthe terms of the ALP agreement, or fails to properly service any guaranteedloan or line of credit, or to protect adequately the interests of the lenderand the Government. Furthermore, status, at the option of the State Director,may also be revoked if an FCS member institution that previously had acceptableloan losses as specified in the introductory text of paragraph II aboveis no longer identified by FCA as having acceptable losses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">State Directors will provide all County Office named in paragraphXVIII of the ALP agreement (Attachment 1 and/or Attachment 2 of this Exhibit)with a copy of the agreement and complete application material approvedin connection with ALP status. State Directors will monitor ALP lenders'loan making and security servicing activities, with the assistance of theDistrict Director and periodic reports from the County Supervisor, to determinecompliance with the ALP Agreement and Subparts A and B of this part pertainingto guaranteed OL, SW and FO loans. County Supervisors will use their copyof the ALP Agreement to duplicate and place in the County Office file foreach loan guaranteed. In the event the State Director determines an ALPlender is not adequately fulfilling all obligations of the agreement, thelender will be contacted and notified of any discrepancies. A maximum of30 days will be provided to correct any deficiencies. If corrections arenot made within 30 days, the lender's ALP status may be revoked in writingby the State Director. The revocation will be in the form of a letter,sent by certified mail, and state reasons for the action. Any outstandingguaranteed loan(s) or line(s) of credit shall continue to be serviced bya lender whose ALP status has expired or been revoked. The lender cannotsubmit requests for any new guarantees pursuant to this Exhibit, but maysubmit requests under the regular method outlined in this subpart for consideration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">III. <T3>ALP Lender Responsibilities to Process, Service and Liquidate GuaranteedOL, SW and FO Loans.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Processing.</T3> Before accepting an application for a guaranteed loanor line of credit, the ALP lender will review Part 1980, Subparts A andB of this part. If the lender concludes that an application will be considered,a written statement of basis for the conclusion will be placed in the applicant'sfile maintained by the lender addressing each of the loan eligibility requirementsin andSection;andSection; 1980.175(b), 1980.180(b) or 1980.185(b) of this subpart.The lender must abide by limitations on loan purposes, loan limitations,interest rates, and terms set forth for OL loans/lines of credit and SWand FO loans in andSection;andSection; 1980.175, 1980.180 and 1980.185 of thissubpart. All requests for guaranteed loans or lines of credit, will beprocessed under Subparts A and B of this part except as modified by thisExhibit. The ALP lender will, for each application for a guaranteed loanor line of credit, obtain a Form FmHA 410-1, ``Application for FmHA Services,''signed by the applicant's borrower. The applicant's borrower must completeand sign all parts of the Form FmHA 410-1 except information on crops,livestock and financial information obtained by the lender on forms ofa similar nature. ALP lenders will process all guaranteed OL loans/linesof credit or SW or FO loans as a ``complete application'' by obtainingand completing all required items described in andSection; 1980.113(d) ofthis subpart except Form FmHA 449-12, ``Request for Loan Note Guarantee(Farmer Programs Loans),'' and the applicable environmental review requirementscontained in Subpart G of Part 1940 of this chapter. These latter requirementsremain the responsibility of the FmHA loan approval official. However,ALP lenders are responsible for meeting the lender's requirements containedin Exhibit M to Subpart G of Part 1940 of this chapter. Attachment 3 tothis Exhibit will be used by ALP lenders to request a guarantee from FmHA.An ALP lender will only be required to submit Form FmHA 410-1 and informationon crops, livestock and financial condition on forms previously approvedfor use under paragraph II A of this Exhibit and Attachment 3 of this Exhibit,with any supportive information attached, to FmHA for making applicationfor a guarantee. If the lender's cash flow statement does not lend itselfto providing a debt repayment source and use breakdown of income the lenderwill submit a statement similar to item 28 of Form FmHA 449-12. A guaranteedOL loan/line of credit or SW or FO loan will not be closed by an ALP lenderprior to receipt of Form FmHA 449-14, ``Conditional Commitment for Guarantee,''or Form FmHA 1980-15, ``Conditional Commitment for Contract of Guarantee(Line of Credit),'' and the determination that all conditions, includingthe certification required by andSection; 1980.60 of Subpart A of this partcan be met. The ALP lender will be responsible for fully securing the OLloan or line of credit under andSection; 1980.175(g), FO loan under andSection;1980.180(f) or SW loan under andSection; 1980.185(f) of this subpart. ALPlenders may consult with the FmHA County Supervisor at any time duringthe processing and will make all material relating to any guarantee applicationavailable to FmHA for review upon request.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Servicing.</T3> ALP lenders will be fully responsible for servicingand protecting the collateral for all loans/lines of credit guaranteed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>Liquidation of Loans/Lines of Credit.</T3> Any liquidation of guaranteedOL loans/lines of credit, SW loans or FO loans will be completed by thelender. Loss claims will be submitted in accordance with the ALP agreementon Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss.'' The Reportof Loss will be accompanied by supporting information to outline dispositionof all security and proceeds pledged to secure the loan/line of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IV. <T3>FmHA Actions. </T3>FmHA will complete the evaluation described in andSection;1980.114 of this subpart in any case where the approval official determinesan independent analysis is needed before approval or denial of a reguestfor guarantee. FmHA County Supervisor will complete the required environmentalreview and will review each Form FmHA 410-1 and request for a guarantee,compare material with the county office copy of ALP agreement, approvedforms, and methods, and immediately contact the ALP lender within threeworking days if the information is not in accord with the approved agreement,is not clear or is inadequate for County Committee review. County Supervisorsmay request additional information, review the lender's ``complete application''file or make an independent evaluation of an application on Form FmHA 449-23.``Guaranteed Loan Evaluation, Farmer Programs,'' if needed, to determinewhether the applicant is eligible, the loan/line of credit is for authorizedpurposes, there is reasonable assurance of repayment ability, and sufficientcollateral and equity is available. FmHA will make the final determinationson the eligibility of applicants for a guaranteed OL loan/line of credit,SW loan or FO loan, and the purposes and terms of such loans/lines of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. If the County Supervisor's evaluation indicates the applicationis complete and acceptable, FmHA will provide the lender a County Committeedetermination of the borrower's eligibility within 14 days. This 14-dayperiod will be contingent upon: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Request for a guarantee being received by the appropriate FmHACounty Office at least 2 days before scheduled County Committee meetings.County Supervisors will keep ALP lenders advised of scheduled County Committeemeetings. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Employment ceilings affecting County Committee meetings. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Availability of a quorum of the FmHA County Committee. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. FmHA will monitor each ALP lender's guaranteed loan/line of creditfiles to assure that the lender is complying with requirements of andSection;1980.113 of this subpart. The FmHA County Supervisor will make a completereview of the first three loans or lines of credit developed by a new ALPlender before the loan/line of credit is closed. FmHA will examine thelender file on each guaranteed loan/line of credit within 90 days of loanclosing and will review 20 percent of the lender's guaranteed portfolioannually. The FmHA official who conducts these reviews will document thereview in the FmHA County office file. Any discrepancies noted and notresolved will be discussed with the lender and confirmed in writing witha copy to the State Director through the District Director. State Directorsmay establish additional reviews and reporting systems as necessary toinsure the guaranteed program complies with Subparts A and B of this part.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each Approved Lender who currently has an Approved Lender Agreementexecuted prior to January 6, 1988, will be required to execute a new ApprovedLender Agreement (Attachments 1 and/or 2 to this Exhibit) so that the Lenderrecognizes that, if liquidation of the account becomes imminent, the Lenderwill consider the Borrower for an Interest Rate Buydown under this ExhibitD and request a determination of the Borrower's eligibility by FmHA. TheLender may not initiate foreclosure action on the loan until 60 days aftera determination has been made with respect to the eligibility of the borrowerto participate in the Interest Rate Buydown. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each Loan Note Guarantee issued will contain the statement ``ThisLoan Note Guaranteed is issued under the Lender's Agreement for GuaranteedOperating Loans (OL), Guaranteed Farm Ownership Loans (FO) and GuaranteedSoil and Water Loans (SW) dated <T2>XXX</T2>.'' The date will be the same date entered in paragraph XXof the Approved Lender's Agreement, Attachment 1. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each Contract of Guarantee issued will contain the statement ``ThisContract of Guarantee is issued under Lender's Agreement for OperatingLine of Credit Guarantee dated <T2>XXX</T2>.'' The date will be the same date entered in paragraph XXof the Approved Lender's Agreement, Attachment 2. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Lender's Agreement will be duplicated and a copy will be placedin the FmHA County Office file maintained for each Loan Note Guaranteeand Contract of Guarantee issued.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Attachment 1_Farmers Home Administration Approved Lender Program (ALP)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Lender's Agreement (Loan Note Guarantee Only) for Guaranteed OperatingLoans (OL) and Guaranteed Farm Ownership Loans (FO) Guaranteed Soil andWater Loans (SW) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">(Lender) of </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">is designated as an Approved Lender for the purpose of processingand requesting Loan Note Guarantee(s) authorized by Exhibit A to 7 CFRPart 1980, Subpart B. This does not apply to loan types other than thosespecifically named in this agreement. The agreement applies to the followingoffices of the Lender: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The United States of America, acting through the Farmers Home Administration(FmHA), agrees to enter into Loan Note Guarantees with the Lender as maybe issued pursuant to the regulations for operating, soil and water, and/orfarm ownership loans and to participate in a percentage of any loss onany such operating, soil and water and/or farm ownership loan not to exceedthe amount established in the particular loan note guarantee as the percentageof the amount of the principal and any accrued interest. The terms of anyLoan Note Guarantee are controlling. As a condition for obtaining a guaranteeof the loan(s), the Lender enters into this Agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">THE PARTIES AGREE: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. The maximum loss covered under the Loan Note Guarantee will notexceed the amount established in the particular loan guarantee as to percentageof the principal and accrued interest on any operating, soil and waterand/or farm ownership loan guaranteed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">II. <T3>Lender's Sale or Assignment of Guaranteed Loan. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The Lender may retain all of any guaranteed loan. The Lender isnot permitted to sell or participate any amount of the guaranteed or unguaranteedportion(s) of loan(s) to the applicant or Borrower or members of theirimmediate families, their officers, directors, stockholders, other owners,or any parent, subsidiary or affiliate. If the Lender desires to marketall or part of the guaranteed portion of loan at or subsequent to loanclosing, such loan must not be in default as set forth in the terms ofthe notes. The Lender may proceed under the following options: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Assignment. </T3>Assign all or part of the guaranteed portion of anyloan to one or more Holders by using Form FmHA 449-36, ``Assignment GuaranteeAgreement.'' Holder(s), upon written notice to Lender and FmHA, may reassignthe unpaid guaranteed portion of the loan sold under Form FmHA 449-36.Upon such notification the assignee shall succeed to all rights and obligationsof the Holder(s) under Form FmHA 449-36. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Multinote System. </T3>When this option is selected by the Lender,upon disposition the Holder will receive one of the Borrower's executednotes and Form FmHA 449-34, ``Loan Note Guarantee,'' attached to the Borrower'snote. However, all rights under the security instruments (including personaland/or corporate guarantees) will remain with the Lender and in all casesinsure to its and the Government's benefit not withstanding any contraryprovisions of State law. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. <T3>At Loan Closing: </T3>Provide for no more than 10 notes, unless theborrower and FmHA agree otherwise, for the guaranteed portion and one notefor the unguaranteed portion. When this option is selected, FmHA will providethe lender with a Form FmHA 449-34, for each of the notes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. <T3>After Loan Closing: </T3>(1) Upon written approval by FmHA, the Lendermay cause to be issued a series of new notes, not to exceed the total providedin 2.a. above, as replacement for previously issued guaranteed note(s)provided: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) The Borrower agrees and executes the new notes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) The interest rate does not succeed the interest rate in effectwhen the loan was closed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) The maturity of the loan is not changed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) FmHA will not bear any expenses that may be incurred in referenceto such re-issue of notes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) There is adequate collateral securing the note(s). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) No intervening liens have arisen or have been perfected and thesecured lien priority remains the same. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) FmHA will issue the appropriate Loan Note Guarantees to be attachedto each of the notes then exchanged for the original Loan Note Guaranteewhich will be cancelled by FmHA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Participations. </T3>a. The lender is required to hold in its own portfolioor retain a minimum of 10 percent of the total guaranteed loan(s) amount.The amount required to be retained must be of the unguaranteed portionof the loan and cannot be participated to another lender. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The lender may obtain participation of only the unguaranteed portionof its loan in excess of the 10 percent minimum under its normal operatingprocedures. Participation means a sale of an interest in the loan in whichthe Lender retains the note, collateral securing the note, and all responsibilityfor loan servicing and liquidation. Participation with a lender by anyentity does not make that entity a holder or a lender. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. When a guaranteed portion of a loan is sold by the Lender to aHolder(s), the Holder(s) shall upon the sale succeed to all rights of Lenderunder the Loan Note Guarantee to the extent of the portion of the loanpurchased. Lenders will remain bound to all the obligations under the LoanNote Guarantee, and this agreement, and the FmHA program regulations foundin Title 7 CFR, Part 1980, Subparts A and B, and to future FmHA programregulations not inconsistent with the express provisions of this Agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">III. The Lender agrees loan funds will be used for the purposes authorizedin 7 CFR Part 1980, Subparts A and B as set forth in Form FmHA 449-14,``Conditional Commitment for Guarantee,'' for the particular loan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IV. The Lender certifies that none of its officers or directors, stockholders(except stockholders in a Farm Credit Bank or other Farm Credit Systeminstitutions with direct lending authority that have normal stocksharerequirements for participating) or other owners has, or will have, a substantialfinancial interest in any guaranteed loan Borrower. The lender certifiesthat neither any guaranteed loan Borrower nor its officers or directors,stockholders or other owners have a substantial financial interest in theLender. If the borrower is a member of the board of directors of a FarmCredit Bank or other Farm Credit System institution with direct lendingauthority the lender certifies that an FCS institution on the next highestlevel will independently process the loan request and will act as the Lender'sagent in servicing the account.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">V. The Lender will certify to FmHA, prior to the issuance of a LoanNote Guarantee for each loan, that there has been no adverse change(s)in the Borrower's condition during the period of time from FmHA's issuanceof the Conditional Commitment for Guarantee to issuance of the Loan NoteGuarantee. The Lender's certification must address all adverse changesand be supported by financial statements of the Borrower and its guarantorsnot more than 90 days old at the time of certification. As used in thisparagraph only, the term ``Borrower'' includes any parent, affiliate, orsubsidiary of the Borrower.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VI. Lender will submit the required guarantee fee with a GuaranteedLoan Closing Report at the time a Loan Note Guarantee is issued.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VII. <T3>Servicing. </T3>A. The Lender will service the entire loan and willremain mortgagee and/or secured party of record, notwithstanding the factthat another may hold a portion of the loan. The entire loan will be securedby the same security with equal lien priority for the guaranteed and unguaranteedportion of the loan. Lender may charge Holder a servicing fee. The unguaranteedportion of a loan will not be paid first nor given any preference or priorityover the guaranteed portion of the loan. The Lender shall perform thoseservices which a reasonable prudent lender would perform in servicing itsown portfolio of loans that are guaranteed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. Disposition of the guaranteed portion of a loan may be made priorto full disbursement, completion of construction and acquisitions onlywith the prior written approval of FmHA. Subsequent to full disbursement,completion of construction, and acquisition, the guaranteed portion ofthe loan may be disposed of as provided in this Agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">It is the Lender's responsibility to see that all construction isproperly planned before any work proceeds; that any required permits, licensesor authorizations are obtained from the appropriate regulatory agencies;that the Borrower has obtained contracts through acceptable procurementprocedures; that periodic inspections during construction are made andthe FmHA's concurrence on the overall development schedule is obtained.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. Lender's servicing responsibilities include, but are not limitedto: 1. Obtaining compliance with the covenants and provisions in the note,loan agreement, security instruments, and any supplemental agreements andnotifying in writing FmHA and the Borrower on any violations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Receiving all payments on principal and interest on the loan asthey fall due and promptly remitting and accounting to any Holder(s) oftheir pro rata share thereof determined according to their respective interestsin the loan, less only Lender's servicing fee. The loan may be reamortized,rescheduled or written down only with agreement of the Lender and Holder(s)of the guaranteed portion of the loan and only with FmHA's written concurrence.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Inspecting the collateral as often as necessary to properly servicethe loan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Assuring that adequate insurance is maintained. This includes hazardinsurance obtained and maintained with a loss payable clause in favor ofthe Lender as the mortgagor or secured party.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Assuring that:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. taxes, assessment or ground rents against or affecting collateralare paid;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. the loan and collateral are protected in foreclosure, bankruptcy,receivership, insolvency, condemnation, or other litigation;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Insurance loss payments, condemnation awards, or similar proceedsare applied on debts in accordance with lien priorities on which the guaranteewas based, or to rebuilding or otherwise acquiring needed replacement collateralwith the written approval of FmHA;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">d. Proceeds from the sale or other disposition of collateral are appliedin accordance with the lien priorities on which the guarantee is based,except that proceeds from the disposition of collateral, such as machinery,equipment, furniture or fixtures, may be used to acquire property of similarnature without written concurrence of FmHA;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">e. The Borrower complies with all laws and ordinances applicable tothe loan, the collateral and/or operation of the farm.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Assuring that if personal or corporate guarantees are part of thecollateral, financial statements from such loan guarantors will be obtainedwhich are not over 90 days old. In the case of guarantees secured by collateral,assuring the security is properly maintained.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Obtaining the lien coverage and lien priorities specified by theLender and agreed to by FmHA, properly recording or filing lien or noticeinstruments to obtain or maintain such lien priorities during the existenceof the guarantee by FmHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. Assuring that the Borrower obtains marketable title to the collateral.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. Assuring that the Borrower (as defined in 7 CFR Part 1980, SubpartB, andSection; 1980.106(b)(4)) is not released from liability for all orany part of the loan, except in accordance with FmHA regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. Providing the FmHA Office with loan status reports annually asof December 31 on Form FmHA 1980-41, ``Guaranteed Loan Status Report.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. Obtaining financial statements from each chattel loan securedborrower at least annually. Lender is responsible for analyzing the financialstatements, taking any servicing actions and providing copies of statementsand record of action to the FmHA office upon request.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12. Monitoring the use of loan funds to assure they will not be usedfor any purpose that will contribute to excessive erosion of highly erodibleland or to the conversion of wetlands to produce an agricultural commodity,as further explained in 7 CFR Part 1980, Subpart G, Exhibit M.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. The lender shall participate in any farm credit mediation programof a state in accordance with the rules of that system and 7 CFR Part 1980,Subpart B, andSection; 1980.126.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VIII. <T3>Default by Borrower.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The Lender will notify FmHA when a Borrower is thirty (30) dayspast due on a payment or if the Borrower has not met its responsibilitiesof providing the required financial statements to the Lender or is otherwisein default. The Lender will notify FmHA of the status of a Borrower's defaulton Form FmHA 1980-44, ``Guaranteed Loan Borrower Default Status.'' A meetingwill be arranged by the Lender with the Borrower and FmHA to resolve theproblem. Actions taken by the Lender with written concurrence of FmHA mayinclude but are not limited to the following or any combination of thefollowing:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Deferment of principal payments (subject to rights of any Holder(s)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. An additional temporary loan by the lender to bring the accountcurrent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Reamortization or rescheduling of the payments on the loan (subjectto rights of any Holder(s)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Transfer and assumption of the loan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Reorganization.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Liquidation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Changes in fixed interest rates with FmHA's, Lender's, and theHolder'(s) written approval; provided, such interest rate is adjusted proportionallybetween the guaranteed and unguaranteed portion of the loan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. Principal and interest writedown in accordance with 7 CFR Part1980, Subpart B, andSection; 1980.125.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The Lender will negotiate in good faith in an attempt to resolveany problem to permit the Borrower to cure a default, where reasonable.The Lender agrees that if liquidation of the account becomes imminent,the Lender will consider the Borrower for an Interest Rate Buydown underExhibit D of Subpart B of 7 CFR, Part 1980, and request a determinationof the Borrower's eligibility by FmHA. The Lender may not initiate foreclosureaction on the loan until 60 days after a determination has been made withrespect to the eligibility of the Borrower to participate in the InterestRate Buydown Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. The Lender has the option to repurchase the unpaid guaranteed portionof the loan from the Holder(s) within 30 days of written demand by theHolder(s) when: (a) the Borrower is in default not less than 60 days inpayment of principal or interest due on the loan or (b) the Lender hasfailed to remit to the Holder(s) its pro rata share of any payment madeby the borrower within 30 days of its receipt of the payment. The repurchaseby the Lender will be for an amount equal to the unpaid guaranteed portionof the principal and accrued interest less the Lender's servicing fee.The Loan Note Guarantee will not cover the note interest to the Holderon the guaranteed loan(s) accruing after 90 days from the date of the demandletter to the Lender requesting the repurchase. The Lender will acceptan assignment without recourse from the Holder(s) upon repurchase. TheLender is encouraged to repurchase the loan to facilitate the accountingfor funds, resolve the problem, and to permit the borrower to cure thedefault, where reasonable. The Lender will notify the Holder(s) and FmHAof its decision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. If Lender does not repurchase as provided by Paragraph C, FmHAwill purchase from Holder(s) the unpaid principal balance of the guaranteedportion together with accrued interest to date of repurchase, within 30days after written demand to FmHA from the Holder(s). The Loan Note Guaranteewill not cover the note interest to the Holder on the guaranteed loan(s)accruing after 90 days from the date of original demand letter of the Holder(s)to the Lender requesting the repurchase. Such demand will include a copyof the written demand made upon the Lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Holder(s) or its duly authorized agent will also include evidenceof its right to require payment from FmHA. Such evidence will consist ofeither the originals of the Loan Note Guarantee and note properly endorsedto FmHA or the original of the Assignment Guarantee Agreement properlyassigned to FmHA without recourse including all rights, title, and interestin the loan. FmHA will be subrogated to all rights of Holder(s). The Holder(s)will include in its demand the amount due including unpaid principal, unpaidinterest to date of demand and interest subsequently accruing from dateof demand to proposed payment date. FmHA will verify the amount of unpaidprincipal and interest with the Lender. Unless otherwise agreed to by FmHA,such proposed payment will not ordinarily be later than 30 days from thedate of the demand to FmHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">FmHA will promptly notify the Lender of the Holder(s)'s demand forpayment. The Lender will promptly provide the FmHA with the informationnecessary for FmHA's determination of the appropriate amount due the Holder(s).Any discrepancy between the amount claimed by the Holder(s) and the informationsubmitted by the Lender must be resolved before payment will be approved.FmHA will notify both parties who must resolve the conflict before paymentby FmHA will be approved. Such a conflict will suspend the running of the30 day payment requirement. Upon receipt of the appropriate information,FmHA will review the demand and submit it to the State Director for verification.After reviewing the demand, the State Director will transmit the requestto the FmHA Finance Office for issuance of the appropriate check. Uponissuance, the Finance Office will notify the State Director and remit thecheck(s) to the Holder(s).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. Lender consents to the purchase by FmHA and agrees to furnish onrequest by FmHA a current statement certified by an appropriate authorizedofficer of the Lender of the unpaid principal and interest then owed bythe Borrower on the loan and the amount due the Holder(s). Lender agreesthat any purchase by FmHA does not change, alter or modify any of the Lender'sobligations to FmHA arising from said loan or guarantee, nor does suchpurchase waive any of FmHA's rights against Lender, and FmHA will havethe right to set-off against Lender all rights inuring to FmHA from theHolder against FmHA's obligation to Lender under the Loan Note Guarantee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">F. Servicing fees assessed by the Lender to a Holder are collectibleonly from payment installments received by the Lender from the Borrower.When FmHA repurchases from a Holder, FmHA will pay the Holder only theamounts due the Holder. FmHA will not reimburse the Lender for servicingfees assessed to a Holder and not collected from payments received fromthe Borrowers. No service fee shall be charged FmHA and no such fee iscollectible from FmHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">G. Lender may also repurchase the guaranteed portion of the loan consistentwith Paragraph 10 of the Loan Note Guarantee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IX. <T3>Liquidation.</T3> If the Lender concludes the liquidation of a guaranteedLoan account is necessary because of one or more defaults or third partyactions that the Borrower cannot or will not cure or eliminate within areasonable period of time, a meeting will be arranged by the Lender withFmHA. When FmHA concurs with the Lender's conclusion or at any time concludesindependently the liquidation is necessary, it will notify the Lender andthe matter will be handled as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Lender will liquidate the loan unless FmHA, at its option, decidesto carry out liquidation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">When the decision to liquidate is made, the Lender may proceed topurchase from Holder(s) the guaranteed portion of the loan. The Holder(s)will be paid according to the provisions in the Loan Note Guarantee orthe Assignment Guarantee Agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If the Lender does not purchase the guaranteed portion of the loan,FmHA will be notified immediately in writing. FmHA will then purchase theguaranteed portion of the loan from the Holder(s). If FmHA holds any ofthe guaranteed portion, FmHA will be paid first its pro rata share of theproceeds from liquidation of the collateral.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Lender's proposed method of liquidation.</T3> Within 30 days afterthe decision to liquidate, the Lender will advise FmHA in writing of itsproposed detailed method of liquidation called a liquidation plan and willprovide FmHA with:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Such proof as FmHA requires to establish the Lender's ownershipof the guaranteed loan promissory note(s) and related security instruments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Information lists concerning the Borrower's assets including realand personal property, fixtures, claims, contracts, inventory (includingperishables), accounts receivable, personal and corporate guarantees, andother existing and contingent assets, advice as to whether or not eachitem is serving as collateral for the guaranteed loan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. A proposed method of making the maximum collection possible onthe indebtedness.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. The Lender will obtain an independent appraisal report on all collateralsecuring the loan, which will reflect the current market value and potentialliquidation value. The appraisal report is for the purpose of permittingthe Lender and FmHA to determine the appropriate liquidation actions. Anyindependent appraiser's fee will be shared equally by FmHA and the Lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>FmHA's response to Lender's liquidation plan.</T3> FmHA will informthe Lender in writing whether it concurs in the Lender's liquidation planwithin 30 days after receipt of such plan from the Lender. If FmHA needsadditional time to respond to the liquidation plan, it will advise theLender of a definite time for such response. Should FmHA and the Lendernot agree on the Lender's liquidation plan, negotiation will take placebetween FmHA and the Lender to resolve the disagreement. The Lender willordinarily conduct the liquidation; however, should FmHA opt to conductthe liquidation, FmHA will proceed as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. The Lender will transfer to FmHA all rights and interests necessaryto allow FmHA to liquidate the loan. In this event, the Lender will notbe paid for any loss until after the collateral is liquidated and the finalloss is determined by FmHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. FmHA will attempt to obtain the maximum amount of proceeds fromliquidation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Options available to FmHA include any one or combination of theusual commercial methods of liquidation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>Acceleration.</T3> The Lender or FmHA, if it liquidates, will proceedas expeditiously as possible when acceleration of the indebtedness is necessaryincluding giving any notices and taking any other required legal action.A copy of the acceleration notice or other acceleration document will besent to FmHA or the Lender, as the case may be.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. <T3>Liquidation: Accounting and Reports.</T3> When the Lender conductsthe liquidation, it will account for funds during the period of liquidationand will provide FmHA with periodic reports on the progress of liquidation,disposition of collateral, resulting costs and additional procedures necessaryfor successful completion of liquidation. The Lender will transmit to FmHAany payment received from the Borrower and/or pro rata share of liquidationor other proceeds, when FmHA is the holder of a portion of the guaranteedloan using Form FmHA 1980-43, ``Lender's Guaranteed Loan Payment.'' WhenFmHA liquidates, the Lender will be provided with similar reports on request.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. <T3>Determination of Loss and Payment.</T3> In all liquidation cases, finalsettlement will be made with the Lender after the collateral is liquidated.FmHA will have the right to recover losses if paid under the guaranteefrom any party liable.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss,'' willbe used for calculation of all estimated and final loss determinations.Estimated loss payments may be approved by FmHA after the Lender has submitteda liquidation plan approved by FmHA. Payment will be made in accordancewith 7 CFR 1980, Subpart B.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. When the Lender is conducting the liquidation and owns any of theguaranteed portion of the loan, and it is anticipated liquidation willtake longer than 90 days it will request a tentative loss estimate by submittingto FmHA an estimate of the loss that will occur in connection with liquidationof the loan. FmHA will agree to pay an estimated loss on the outstandingprincipal balance owed on the guaranteed debt (See G. below). The Lenderwill discontinue interest accrual on the defaulted loan when the estimatedloss claim is approved by FmHA. Such estimate will be prepared and submittedby the Lender on Form FmHA 449-30, using the basic formula as providedon the report except that the appraisal value will be used in lieu of theamount received from the sale of collateral.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">After the Report of Loss estimate has been approved by FmHA, FmHAwill send the original Report of Loss estimate to the FmHA Finance Officefor issuance of a Treasury check in payment of the estimated amount duethe Lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">After liquidation has been completed, a final loss report will besubmitted on Form FmHA 449-30 by the Lender to FmHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. After the Lender has completed liquidation, FmHA upon receipt ofthe final accounting and Report of Loss, may audit and will determine theactual loss. If FmHA has any questions regarding the amounts set forthin the final Report of Loss, it will investigate the matter. The Lenderwill make its records available to and otherwise assist FmHA in makingthe investigation. If FmHA finds any discrepancies, it will contact theLender and arrange for the necessary corrections to be made as soon aspossible. When FmHA finds the final Report of Loss to be proper in allrespects, it will be tentatively approved in the space provided on theform for that purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. When the Lender has conducted liquidation and after the final Reportof Loss has been tentatively approved:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. If the loss is greater than the estimated loss payment, FmHA willsend the original of the final Report of Loss to the Finance Office forissuance of a Treasury check in payment of the additional amount owed byFmHA to the Lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. If the loss is less than the estimated loss, the Lender will reimburseFmHA for the overpayment plus interest at the note rate from date of overpayment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. If FmHA has conducted liquidation, it will provide an accountingand Report of Loss to the Lender and will pay the Lender in accordancewith the Loan Note Guarantee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. In those instances where the Lender has made authorized protectiveadvances, it may claim recovery for the guaranteed portion of any lossof monies advanced as protective advances and interest resulting from suchprotective advances as provided above, and such payment will be made byFmHA when the final Report of Loss is approved.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">F. <T3>Maximum amount of interest loss payment.</T3> Notwithstanding any otherprovisions of this agreement, the amount payable by FmHA to the Lendercannot exceed the limits set forth in the Loan Note Guarantee. If FmHAconducts the liquidation, loss occasioned by accruing interest will becovered by the guarantee only to the date FmHA accepts the responsibilityfor liquidation. Loss occasioned by accruing interest will be covered tothe extent of the guarantee to the date of final settlement when the liquidationis conducted by the Lender provided it proceeds expeditiously with theliquidation plan approved by FmHA except when an estimated loss claim isfiled. When a Lender files an estimated loss claim, the Lender will discontinueinterest accrual on the defaulted loan when the estimated loss claim isapproved by FmHA. The balance of accrued interest payable to the Lender,if any, will be calculated on the final Report of Loss form.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">G. <T3>Application of FmHA loss payment.</T3> The estimated loss payment shallbe applied as of the date of such payment. The total amount of the losspayment remitted by FmHA will be applied by the Lender on the guaranteedportion of the loan debt. However, such application does not release theBorrower from liability. Such amounts are only to compensate the Lenderfor the loss. (See XII below.) In all cases a final Form FmHA 449-30 preparedand submitted by the Lender must be processed by FmHA in order to closeout the files.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">H. <T3>Income from collateral.</T3> Any net rental or other income that hasbeen received by the Lender from the collateral will be applied on theguaranteed loan debt.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. <T3>Liquidation costs.</T3> Certain reasonable liquidation costs will beallowed during the liquidation process. These liquidation costs will besubmitted as part of the liquidation plan. Such costs will be deductedfrom gross proceeds from the disposition of collateral unless the costshave been previously determined by the Lender (with FmHA written concurrence)to be protective advances. If circumstances have changed after submissionof the liquidation plan which require a revision of liquidation costs,the Lender will procure FmHA's written concurrence prior to proceedingwith the proposed changes. No in-house expenses of the Lender will be allowed.In-house expenses include, but are not limited to, employee's salaries,staff lawyers, travel and overhead.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">J. <T3>Payment.</T3> Final loss payments will be made within 30 days afterthe review of the accounting of the collateral.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">X. <T3>Protective Advances.</T3> Protective advances must constitute an indebtednessof the Borrower to the Lender and be secured by the security instrument(s).FmHA written authorization is required on all protective advances in excessof $3,000. Protective advances include advances made for property taxes,annual assessments, ground rent, hazard or flood insurance premiums affectingthe collateral, and other expenses necessary to preserve or protect thesecurity. Attorney fees are not a protective advance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XI. <T3>Additional Loans or Advances.</T3> Except as provided for in each borrower'sloan agreement which was specifically approved by FmHA for that specificborrower, the Lender will not make additional expenditures or new loanswithout first obtaining the written approval of FmHA even though such expendituresor loans will not be guaranteed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XII. <T3>Future Recovery.</T3> After a loan has been liquidated and a finalloss has been paid by FmHA, any future funds which may be recovered bythe Lender, will be pro-rated between FmHA and the Lender. FmHA will bepaid such amount recovered in proportion to the percentage it guaranteedfor the loan and the Lender will retain such amount in proportion to thepercentage of the unguaranteed portion of the loan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XIII. Transfer and Assumption Cases. Refer to 7 CFR Part 1980, SubpartB.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If a loss will occur upon consummation of a complete transfer andassumption for less than the full amount of the debt and the transferordebtor (including personal guarantees) is released from personal liability,the Lender, if it holds the guaranteed portion, may file an estimated Reportof Loss on Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss,'' torecover its pro rata share of the actual loss at that time. In completingForm FmHA 449-30, the amount of the debt assumed will be entered on line24 as Net Collateral (Recovery). Approved protective advances and accruedinterest thereon made during the arrangement of a transfer and assumption,if not assumed by the Transferee, will be entered on Form FmHA 449-30,lines 13 and 14.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XIV. <T3>Bankruptcy.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The Lender is responsible for protecting the guaranteed loan debtand all collateral securing the loan in bankruptcy proceedings. When theloan is involved in a reorganization bankruptcy proceeding under Chapters11, 12 or 13 of the Bankruptcy Code, payment of loss claims may be madeas provided in paragraph XIV. For a Chapter 7 bankruptcy or a liquidationplan in a Chapter 11 bankruptcy, only paragraphs XIV B 3 and B 6 are applicable.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Loss Payments.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Estimated Loss Payments.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. If a borrower has filed for protection under a reorganization bankruptcy,the Lender will request a tentative estimated loss payment of accrued interestand principal written off. This request can only be made after the bankruptcyplan is confirmed by the court. Only one estimated loss payment is allowedduring the reorganization bankruptcy. All subsequent claims during reorganizationwill be considered revisions to the initial estimated loss. A revised estimatedloss payment may be processed by FmHA at its option in accordance withany court approved changes in the reorganization plan. At the time theperformance under the confirmed reorganization plan has been completed,the Lender is responsible for providing FmHA with the documentation necessaryto review and adjust the estimated loss claim to (a) reflect the actualprincipal and interest reduction on any part of the guaranteed debt determinedto be unsecured and (b) to reimburse the Lender for any court ordered interestrate reduction during the term of the reorganization plan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The Lender will use Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Reportof Loss,'' to request an estimated loss payment and to revise estimatedloss payments during the course of the reorganization plan. The estimatedloss claim as well as any revisions to this claim will be accompanied byapplicable legal documentation to support the claim.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Upon completion of the reorganization plan, the lender will completeForm FmHA 1980-44, ``Guaranteed Loan Borrower Default Status,'' and forwardthis form to the Finance office.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Interest Loss Payments.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Interest loss payments sustained during the period of the reorganizationplan will be processed in accordance with paragraph XIV B 1.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. Interest loss payments sustained after the reorganization planis completed will be processed annually when the lender sustains a lossas a result of a permanent interest rate reduction which extends beyondthe period of the reorganization plan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Form FmHA 449-30 will be completed to compensate the lender forthe difference in interest rates specified on the Loan Note Guarantee orInterest Rate Buydown Agreement and the rate of interest specified by thebankruptcy court.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Final Loss Payments.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Final loss payments will be processed when the loan is liquidated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. If the loan is paid in full without an additional loss, the FinanceOffice will close out the estimated loss account at the time notificationof payment in full is received.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Payment Application. </T3>The Lender must apply estimated loss paymentsfirst to the unsecured principal of the guaranteed portion of the debtand then to the unsecured interest of the guaranteed portion of the debt.In the event the bankruptcy court attempts to direct the payment to beapplied in a defferent manner, the Lender will immediately notify the FmHAservicing office.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. <T3>Overpayments. </T3>Upon completion of the reorganization plan, theLender will provide FmHA with the documentation necessary to determinewhether the estimated loss paid equals the actual loss sustained. If theactual loss sustained, as a result of the reorganization, is greater thanthe estimated loss payment, the Lender will submit a revised estimatedloss in order to obtain payment of the additional amount owed by FmHA tothe Lender. If the actual loss payment is less than the estimated loss,the Lender will reimburse FmHA for the overpayment plus interest at thenote rate from the date of the payment of the estimated loss.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. <T3>Protective Advances. </T3>If approved protective advances were madeprior to the borrower having filed bankruptcy, as a result of prior liquidationnaction, these protective advances and accrued interest will be enteredon Form FmHA 449-30.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XV. <T3>Debt write down. </T3>Refer to Title 7 of CFR Part 1980, Subpart B,andSection; 198.125. The maximum amount of loss payment associated with aloan/line of credit agreement which has been written down will not exceedthe percent of the guarantee multiplied by the difference between the outstandingprincipal and interest balance of the loan/line of credit before the write-downand the outstanding balance of the loan/line of credit after the write-down.The lender will use Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss,''to request an estimated loss payment to receive its pro-rata share of anyloss sustained.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XVI. <T3>Other Requirements. </T3>This agreement is subject to all the provisionsof 7 CFR Part 1980, Subparts A and B, and any future amendments of theseregulations not inconsistent with this agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XVII. <T3>Execution of Agreements. </T3>This agreement is executed prior to theexecution of any Loan Note Guarantee under 7 CFR Part 1980, Subpart A andB and does not impose any obligation upon FmHA with respect to executionof any such contract. FmHA in no way warrants that such a contract hasbeen or will be executed. Each request for a Loan Note Guarantee underExhibit A of 7 CFR Part 1980. Subpart B will be considered by FmHA on acase-by-case basis.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XVIII. <T3>Notices. </T3>All requests for Loan Note Guarantee and any noticesor action will be initiated through the following FmHA County Offices</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="77">.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XIX. <T3>Termination of Agreement. </T3>Except for FCS Member institutions thathave acceptable loan losses as specified in the introductory text of paragraphII of Exhibit A, 7 CFR Part 1980, Subpart B, this agreement will terminateas to the Lender's submission of request for Loan Note Guarantee(s) underExhibit A, 7 CFR Part 1980, Subpart B two (2) years from the date set forthin paragraph XX unless otherwise earlier revoked by FmHA. This agreementwill remain in force as to any Loan Note Guarantee(s) issued pursuant toExhibit A, 7 CFR Part 1980, Subpart B and remaining extant at time of expirationor revocation until those loan note guarantees still extant are concluded.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XX. This Agreement is dated <T2>XXXX</T2>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Lender</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">  (Name)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="20">  (IRS) I.D. Tax No.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">BY</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Title</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Attest:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">   (SEAL)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">United States of America, Farmers Home Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">By</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Title</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Farmers Home Administration Approved Lender Program (ALP)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="85">Lender's Agreement for Operating Line of Credit Guarantee (Contractof Guarantee Cases)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_(Lender) of </ITAG><T2>XX</T2> is designated as an Approved Lender for the purpose of processingand requesting Contract(s) of Guarantee authorized by Exhibit A to 7 CFRPart 1980, Subpart B. This agreement does not apply to lines of credittypes other than those specifically named in this agreement. The agreementapplies to the following officers of the Lender:<ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The United States of America, acting through Farmers Home Administration(FmHA), agrees to enter into Contract of Guarantees with the Lender forOperating loan lines of credit and to participate in a percentage of anyloss on any such operating loan line of credit advance(s) not to exceedthe amount established in the particular contract of guarantee as to percentageof the amount of the principal and any accrued interest. The terms of anyContract of Guarantee are controlling. As a condition for obtaining a guaranteeof the line of credit advance(s) the Lender enters into this agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">THE PARTIES AGREE:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. The maximum loss covered under the Contract of Guarantee will notexceed the amount established in the particular line of credit guaranteeas to percentage of the principal and accrued interest on any OperatingLoan line of credit advances made within the line of credit ceiling andthe terms and conditions of the Contract of Guarantee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">II. <T3>Lender's Sale of Guarantee Line of Credit by Participation.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The Lender may obtain participation in its line of credit underits normal operating procedures. The lender is required to hold in itsown portfolio or retain a minimum of 10 percent of the total guaranteedline(s) credit amount. The amount required to be retained must be of theunguaranteed portion of the line of credit and cannot be participated toanother Lender. The Lender may obtain participation of only the unguaranteedportion of its line of credit in excess of the 10 percent minimum underits normal operations procedure. Participation means a sale of an interestin the line of credit in which the Lender retains the line of credit agreement(and note, if one exists), collateral securing the line of credit, andall responsibility for servicing and liquidation of the line of credit.Participation with a lender by any entity does not make that entity a lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The Lender may retain or sell any amount of the unguaranteed portion(s)of the line(s) of credit as provided in this section only through participation.However, the Lender cannot participate any amount of the line(s) of creditto the applicant or borrower or members or their immediate families, theirofficers, directors, stockholders, other owners, or any parent, subsidiaryor affiliate. If the Lender desires to sell all or part of the guaranteedportion of the line(s) of credit through participation at or subsequentto execution of the line of credit agreement(s), such line(s) of creditmust not be in default as set forth in the terms of the Line of Creditagreement(s) (and note(s), if any exist). The Lender will retain the responsibilityfor servicing and liquidation of the line(s) of credit. Participation witha lender by an entity does not make the entity a holder.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">III. The Lender agrees funds advanced under the line(s) of creditwill be used for the purposes authorized in Subpart B of Title 7 CFR Part1980 as set forth in Form FmHA 1980-15, ``Conditional Commitment for ContractGuarantee (Line of Credit),'' for the particular line of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IV. The Lender certifies that none of its officers or directors, stockholders(except stockholders in a Farm Credit Bank or other Farm Credit Systeminstitutions with direct lending authority that have normal stocksharerequirements for participating) or the other owners have or will have asubstantial financial interest in any guaranteed line of credit Borrower.The Lender certifies that neither any guaranteed line of credit Borrowernor its officers or directors, stockholders or other owners have a substantialfinancial interest in the Lender. If the borrower is a member of the boardof directors of a Farm Credit Bank or other Farm Credit System institutionwith direct lending authority, the Lender certifies that a FCS institutionon the next highest level will independently process the loan request andwill act as the Lender's agent in servicing the account.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">V. The Lender will certify to FmHA, prior to the issuance of a contractof guarantee for each line of credit agreement, that there has been noadverse change(s) in the Borrower's financial condition, nor any otheradverse change in the Borrower's condition during the period of time fromFmHA's issuance of the Conditional Commitment for Contract of Guaranteeto issuance of the Contract of Guarantee. The Lender's certification mustaddress all adverse changes and be supported by financial statements ofthe Borrower and its guarantors not more than 90 days old at the time ofcertification. As used in this paragraph only, the term ``Borrower'' includesany parent, affiliate, or subsidiary of the Borrower.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VI. The Lender will submit the required guarantee fee with a GuaranteedLoan Closing Report at the time a Contract of Guarantee is issued.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VII. <T3>Servicing.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The lender will service the entire line of credit and will remainmortgagee and/or secured party of record. The entire line of credit willbe secured by the same security with equal lien priority for the guaranteedand unguaranteed portions of a line of credit. The unguaranteed portionof a line of credit will not be paid first nor given any preference orpriority over the guaranteed portion of the line of credit. The Lendershall perform those services which a reasonable prudent lender would performin servicing its own portfolio of lines of credit or loans that are notguaranteed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. It is the Lender's responsibility to see that all constructionis properly planned before any work proceeds; that any required permits,licenses or authorizations are obtained from the appropriate regulatoryagencies; that the borrower has obtained contracts through acceptable procurementprocedures; that periodic inspections during construction are made andthat FmHA's concurrence on the overall development schedule is obtained.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. Lender's servicing responsibilities include, but are not limitedto: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Obtaining compliance with the covenants and provisions in the lineof credit agreement (and note, if one exists), security instruments, andany supplemental agreements and notifying both FmHA and the Borrower inwriting of any violations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Receiving all payments on principal and interest on the line ofcredit advances as they fall due. The line of credit may be reamortized,rescheduled, or written down only with FmHA's written concurrence. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Inspecting the collateral as often as necessary to properly servicethe line of credit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Assuring that adequate insurance is maintained. This includes hazardinsurance obtained and maintained with a loss payable clause in favor ofthe Lender as the mortgagee or secured party. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Assuring that: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Taxes, assessments or ground rents against or affecting collateralare paid; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) The line of credit and collateral are protected in foreclosure,bankruptcy, receivership, insolvency, condemnation, or other litigation;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Insurance loss payments, condemnation awards, or similar proceedsare applied on debts in accordance with lien priorities on which the guaranteewas based, or to rebuilding or otherwise acquiring needed replacement collateralwith the written approval of FmHA; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Proceeds from the sale or other disposition of collateral areapplied in accordance with the lien priorities on which the guarantee isbased, except that proceeds from the disposition of collateral, such asmachinery, equipment, furniture or fixtures, may be used to acquire propertyof similar nature which will serve as collateral without written concurrenceof FmHA; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) The Borrower complies with all laws and ordinances applicableto the line of credit, the collateral and/or operation of the farm. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Assuring that if personal or corporate guarantees are part of thecollateral, financial statements from such guarantors will be obtainedwhich are not over 90 days old. In the case of guarantees secured by collateral,assuring the security is properly maintained. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Obtaining the lien coverage and lien priorities specified by theLender and agreed to by FmHA, properly recording or filing lien or noticeinstruments to obtain or maintain such lien priorities during the existenceof the guarantee by FmHA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. Assuring that the Borrower obtains marketable title to the collateral.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. Assuring that the Borrower (as defined in 7 CFR Part 1980, SubpartA, Section 1980.106(b)(4)) is not released from liability for all or anypart of the line of credit except in accordance with FmHA regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. Providing the FmHA Finance Office with loan status reports annuallyas of December 31 on Form FmHA 1980-41, ``Guaranteed Loan Status Report.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. Obtaining financial statements from each chattel loan securedBorrower at least annually. Lender is responsible for analyzing the financialstatements, taking any servicing actions needed, and providing copies ofstatements and record of actions to the County Supervisor. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12. Monitoring the use of loan funds to assure they will not be usedfor any purpose that will contribute to excessive erosion of highly erodibleland or to the conversion of wetlands to produce an agricultural commodity,as further explained in 7 CFR Part 1940, Subpart G. Exhibit M. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. The lender shall participate in any farm credit mediation programof a State in accordance with the rules of that system and 7 CFR Part Part1980, Subpart B, andSection; 1980.126. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VIII. <T3>Default by Borrower. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The Lender will notify FmHA when a Borrower is thirty (30) dayspast due on a payment and is unlikely to bring its account current withinsixty (60) days, or if the Borrower has not met its responsibilities ofproviding the required financial statements to the Lender or is otherwisein default. The Lender will notify FmHA of the status of a Borrower's defaulton Form FmHA 1980-44, ``Guaranteed Loan Borrower Default Status.'' A meetingwill be arranged by the Lender with the Borrower and FmHA to resolve theproblem. Actions taken by the Lender with concurrence of FmHA may includebut are not limited to any curative actions contained in Subpart B of Part1980 or liquidation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The Lender will negotiate in good faith in an attempt to resolveany problem and to permit the Borrower to cure a default, where reasonable.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">The Lender agrees that, if liquidation of the account becomes imminent,the Lender will consider the Borrower for an Interest Rate Buydown underExhibit D of Subpart B of 7 CFR, Part 1980, and request a determinationof the Borrower's eligibility by FmHA. The Lender may not initiate foreclosureaction on the loan until 60 days after a determination has been made withrespect to the eligibility of the Borrower to participate in the InterestRate Buydown Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IX. <T3>Liquidation.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If the Lender concludes that liquidation of a guaranteed line of creditaccount is necessary because of one or more defaults or third party actionsthat the Borrower cannot or will not cure or eliminate within a reasonableperiod of time, a meeting will be arranged by the Lender with FmHA. WhenFmHA concurs with the Lender's conclusion or at any time concludes independentlythat liquidation is necessary, it will notify the Lender and the matterwill be handled as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Lender will liquidate the line of credit unless FmHA, at its option,decides to carry out liquidation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Lender's proposed plan of liquidation. </T3>Within 30 days after thedecision to liquidate is made, the Lender will advise FmHA of its proposedplan of liquidation and will provide FmHA with:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Such proof as FmHA requires to establish the Lender's ownershipof the guaranteed line of credit agreements and related security instruments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Information lists concerning the Borrower's assets including realand personal property, fixtures, claims, contracts, inventory (includingperishables), accounts receivable, personal and corporate guarantees, andother existing and contingent assets, advice as to whether or not eachitem is serving as collateral for the guaranteed line of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. A proposed method of making the maximum collection possible onthe indebtedness.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. The Lender will obtain an independent appraisal report on all collateralsecuring the line of credit which will reflect the current market valueand potential liquidation value. The appraisal report is for the purposeof permitting the Lender and FmHA to determine the appropriate liquidationaction. Any independent appraiser's fee will be shared equally by FmHAand the Lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>FmHA's response to Lender's liquidation plan. </T3>FmHA will informthe Lender in writing whether it concurs in the Lender's liquidation planwithin 30 days after receipt of such plan from the Lender. If FmHA needsadditional time to respond to the liquidation plan, it will advise theLender of a definite time for such response. Should FmHA and the Lendernot agree on the Lender's liquidation plan, negotiation will take placebetween FmHA and the Lender to resolve the liquidation; however, shouldFmHA opt to conduct the liquidation, FmHA will proceed as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. The Lender will transfer to FmHA all its rights and interests necessaryto allow FmHA to liquidate the line of credit. In this event, the Lenderwill not be paid for any loss until after the collateral is liquidatedand the final loss is determined by FmHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. FmHA will attempt to obtain the maximum amount of proceeds fromliquidation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Options available to FmHA include any one or combination of theusual commercial methods of liquidation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>Acceleration. </T3>The Lender or FmHA, if it liquidates, will proceedas expeditiously as possible when acceleration of the indebtedness is necessaryincluding giving any notices and taking any other required legal action.A copy of the acceleration notice or other acceleration document will besent to FmHA or the Lender, as the case may be.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. <T3>Liquidation: Accounting and Reports. </T3>When the Lender conductsthe liquidation, it will account for funds during the period of liquidationand will provide FmHA with periodic reports on the progress of liquidation,disposition of collateral, resulting costs, and additional procedures necessaryfor successful completion of liquidation. When FmHA liquidates, the Lenderwill be provided with similar reports on request.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. <T3>Determination of Loss and Payment. </T3>In all liquidation cases, finalsettlement will be made with the Lender after the collateral is liquidated.FmHA will have the right to recover losses if paid under the guaranteefrom any party liable.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss,'' willbe used for calculation of all estimated and final loss determinations.Estimated loss payments may be approved by FmHA after the Lender has submitteda liquidation plan approved by FmHA. Payment will be made in accordancewith 7 CFR Part 1980, Subpart B.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. When the Lender is conducting the liquidation, and it is anticipatedliquidation will take longer than 90 days it will request a tentative lossestimate by submitting to FmHA an estimate of the loss that will occurin connection with liquidation of the line of credit. FmHA will agree topay an estimated loss settlement to the Lender provided the Lender appliessuch amount due to the outstanding principal balance owed on the guaranteedebt (See G. below). The Lender will discontinue interest accrual on thedefaulted loan when the estimated loss claim is approved by FmHA. Suchestimate will be prepared and submitted by the Lender on Form FmHA 449-30,using the basic formula as provided on the report except that the appraisalvalue will be used in lieu of the amount received from the sale of collateral.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">After the Report of Loss estimate has been approved by FmHA, FmHAwill send the original Report of Loss estimate to FmHA Finance Office forissuance of a Treasury check in payment of the estimated amount due theLender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">After liquidation has been completed, a final loss report will besubmitted on Form FmHA 449-30 by the Lender to FmHA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. After the Lender has completed liquidation, FmHA upon receipt ofthe final accounting and report of loss, may audit and will determine theactual loss. If FmHA has any questions regarding the amounts set forthin the final Report of Loss, it will investigate the matter. The Lenderwill make its records available to and otherwise assist FmHA in makingthe investigation. If FmHA finds any discrepancies, it will contact theLender and arrange for the necessary corrections to be made as soon aspossible. When FmHA finds the final Report of Loss to be proper in allrespects, it will be tentatively approved in the space provided on theform for that purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. When the Lender has conducted liquidation and after the final Reportof Loss has been tentatively approved: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) If the loss is greater than the estimated loss payment, FmHA willsend the original of the final Report of Loss to the Finance Office forissuance of a Treasury check in payment of the additional amount owed byFmHA to the Lender. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) If the loss is less than the estimated loss, the Lender will reimburseFmHA for the overpayment plus interest at the note rate from date of overpayment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. If FmHA has conducted liquidation, it will provide an accountingand Report of Loss to the Lender and will pay the Lender in accordancewith the Contract of Guarantee. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. In those instances where the Lender has made authorized protectiveadvances, it may claim recovery for the guaranteed portion of any lossmonies advanced as protective advances and interest resulting from suchprotective advances as provided above, and such payment will be made byFmHA when the final Report of Loss is approved. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">F. <T3>Maximum amount of interest loss payment. </T3>Notwithstanding any otherprovisions of the agreement, the amount payable by FmHA to the Lender cannotexceed the limits set forth in the Contract of Guarantee. If FmHA conductsthe liquidation, loss occasioned by accruing interest will be covered bythe guarantee only to the date FmHA accepts the responsibility for liquidation.Loss occasioned by accruing interest will be covered to the extent of theguarantee to the date of final settlement when the liquidation is conductedby the Lender provided it proceeds expeditiously with the liquidation planapproved by FmHA, except when an estimated loss claim is filed. When aLender files an estimated loss claim, the Lender will discontinue interestaccrual on the defaulted loan when the estimated loss claim is approvedby FmHA. The balance of accrued interest payable to the Lender, if any,will be calculated on the final Report of Loss form. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">G. <T3>Application of FmHA loss payment. </T3>The estimated loss payment shallbe applied as of the date of such payment. The total amount of the losspayment remitted by FmHA will be applied by the Lender on the guaranteedportion of the debt. However, such application does not release the Borrowerfrom liability. Such amounts are only to compensate the Lender for theloss. (See XII below.) In all cases a final Form FmHA 440-30 prepared andsubmitted by the Lender must be processed by FmHA in order to close outthe files. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">H. <T3>Income from collateral. </T3>Any net rental or other income that hasbeen received by the Lender from the collateral will be applied on theguaranteed debt. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. <T3>Liquidation costs. </T3>Certain reasonable liquidation costs will beallowed during the liquidation process. These liquidation costs will besubmitted as a part of the liquidation plan. Such costs will be deductedfrom gross proceeds from the disposition of collateral unless the costshave been previously determined by the Lender (with FmHA written concurrence)to be protective advances. If circumstances have changed after submissionof the liquidation plan which require a revision of liquidation costs,the Lender will procure FmHA's written concurrence prior to proceedingwith the proposed changes. No in-house expenses of the Lender will be allowed.In-house expenses include, but are not limited to, employees' salaries,staff lawyers, travel and overhead. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">J. <T3>Payment. </T3>Loss settlements will be paid by FmHA within 30 daysafter the review of the accounting of the collateral. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">X. <T3>Protective Advances. </T3>Protective advances must constitute an indebtednessof the Borrower to the Lender and be secured by the security instrument(s).FmHA written authorization is required on all protective advances in excessof $3,000. Protective advances include advances made for property taxes,annual assessments, ground rent, hazard or flood insurance premiums affectingthe collateral, and other expenses necessary to preserve or protect thesecurity. Attorney fees are not a protective advance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XI. <T3>Additional Loans or Advances. </T3>Except as provided for in each Borrower'sloan agreement which was specifically approved by FmHA for that specificborrower, the Lender will not make additional expenditures or new linesof credit or loans to any borrower which has financial assistance guaranteedby FmHA without first obtaining the written approval of FmHA even thoughsuch expenditures or lines of credit or loans will not be guaranteed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XII. <T3>Future Recovery. </T3>After a line of credit has been liquidated anda final loss has been paid by FmHA, any future funds which may be recoveredby the Lender will be prorated between FmHA and the Lender. FmHA will bepaid such amount recovered in proportion to the percentage it guaranteedfor the line of credit and the Lender will retain such amount in proportionto the percentage of the unguaranteed portion of the line of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XIII. <T3>Transfer and Assumption Cases. </T3>Refer to 7 CFR Part 1980, SubpartB. If a loss should occur upon consummation of a complete transfer andassumption for less than the full amount of the debt and the transferor-debtor(including personal guarantees) is released from personal liability, theLender, if it holds the guaranteed portion, may file and estimated Reportof Loss on Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss,'' torecover its pro rata share of the actual loss at that time. In completingForm FmHA 449-30, the amount of the debt assumed will be entered on line24 as Net Collateral (Recovery). Approved protective advances and accruedinterest thereon made during the arrangement of a transfer and assumption,it not assumed by the Transferee, will be entered on Form FmHA 449-30,line 13 and 14. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XIV. <T3>Bankruptcy. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The Lender is responsible for protecting the guaranteed loan debtand all collateral securing the loan in bankruptcy proceedings. When theloan is involved in a reorganization bankruptcy proceeding under Chapters11, 12 or 13 of the Bankruptcy Code, payment of loss claims may be madeas provided in this paragraph XIV. For a Chapter 7 bankruptcy or a liquidationplan in a Chapter 11 bankruptcy, only paragraphs XIV B3 and B6 are applicable.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Loss Payments. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Estimated Loss Payments. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. If a borrower has filed for protection under a reorganization bankruptcy,the Lender will request a tentative estimated loss payment of accrued interestand principal written off. This request can only be made after the bankruptcyplan is confirmed by the court. Only one estimated loss payment is allowedduring the reorganization bankruptcy. All subsequent claims during reorganizationwill be considered revisions to the initial estimated loss. A revised estimatedloss payment may be processed by FmHA at its option in accordance withany court approved changes in the reorganization plan. At the time theperformance under the confirmed reorganization plan has been completed,the Lender is responsible for providing FmHA with the documentation necessaryto review and adjust the estimated loss claim to (a) reflect the actualprincipal and interest reduction on any part of the guaranteed debt determinedto be unsecured and (b) to reimburse the Lender for any court ordered interestrate reduction during the term of the reorganization plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. The Lender will use Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Reportof Loss,'' to request an estimated loss payment and to revise estimatedloss payments during the course of the reorganization plan. The estimatedloss claim as well as any revisions to this claim will be accompanied byapplicable legal documentation to support the claim. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Upon completion of the reorganization plan, the lender will completeForm FmHA 1980-44, ``Guaranteed Loan Borrower Default Status,'' and forwardthis form to the Finance office. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Interest Loss Payments. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Interest loss payments sustained during the period of the reorganizationplan will be processed in accordance with paragraph XIV B 1. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. Interest loss payments sustained after the reorganization planis completed will be processed annually when the lender sustains a lossas a result of a permanent interest rate reduction which extends beyondthe period of the reorganization plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. Form FmHA 449-30 will be completed to compensate the lender forthe difference in interest rates specified on the Contract of Guaranteeor Interest Rate Buydown Agreement and the rate of interest specified bythe bankruptcy court. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Final Loss Payments. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. Final loss payments will be processed when the loan is liquidated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. If the loan is paid in full without an additional loss, the FinanceOffice will close out the estimated loss account at the time notificationof payment in full is received. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Payment Application. </T3>The Lender must apply estimated loss paymentsfirst to the unsecured principal of the guaranteed portion of the debtand then to the unsecured interest of the guaranteed portion of the debt.In the event the bankruptcy court attempts to direct the payment to beapplied in a different manner, the Lender will immediately notify the FmHAservicing office. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. <T3>Overpayments. </T3>Upon completion of the reorganization plan, theLender will provide FmHA with the documentation necessary to determinewhether the estimated loss paid equals the actual loss sustained. If theactual loss sustained, as a result of the reorganization, is greater thanthe estimated loss payment, the Lender will submit a revised estimatedloss in order to obtain payment of the additional amount owed by FmHA tothe Lender. If the actual loss payment is less than the estimated loss,the Lender will reimburse FmHA for the overpayment plus interest at thenote rate from the date of the payment of the estimated loss. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. <T3>Protective Advances. </T3>If approved protective advances were madeprior to the borrower having filed bankruptcy, as a result of prior liquidationaction, these protective advances and accrued interest will be enteredon Form FmHA 449-30. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XV. <T3>Debt write down. </T3>Refer to title 7 of CFR Part 1980, Subpart B,andSection; 1980.125. The maximum amount of loss payment associated witha loan/line of credit agreement which has been written down will not exceedthe percent of the guarantee multiplied by the difference between the outstandingprincipal and interest balance of the loan/line of credit before the write-downand the outstanding balance of the loan/line of credit after the write-down.The lender will use Form FmHA 449-30, ``Loan Note Guarantee Report of Loss,''to request an estimated loss payment to receive its pro-rata share of anyloss sustained. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XVI. <T3>Other Requirements. </T3>This agreement is subject to all the provisionsof 7 CFR Part 1980, Subparts A and B, and any future amendments of theseregulations not inconsistent with this agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XVII. <T3>Execution of Agreements. </T3>This agreement is executed prior to theexecution of any Contract of Guarantee(s) under 7 CFR Part 1980, SubpartsA and B and does not impose any obligation upon FmHA with respect to executionof any such contract. FmHA in no way warrants that such a contract hasbeen or will be executed. Each request for a Contract Guarantee under ExhibitA of 7 CFR Part 1980, Subpart B will be considered by FmHA on a case-by-casebasis. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XVIII. <T3>Notice. </T3>All requests for Contract of Guarantee(s) and any noticesor actions will be initiated through the following FmHA County Offices</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XIX. <T3>Termination of Agreement. </T3>Except for FCS member institutions thathave acceptable loan losses as specified in the introductory text of paragraphII of Exhibit A, 7 CFR Part 1980, Subpart B, this agreement will terminateas to the Lender's submission of requests for Contracts of Guarantee(s)under Exhibit A, 7 CFR Part 1980, Subpart B two (2) years from the dateset forth in paragraph XX unless earlier revoked by FmHA. This agreementwill remain in force as to any Contract of Guarantee(s) issued pursuantto Exhibit A, 7 CFR Part 1980, Subpart B and remaining extant at time ofexpiration or revocation until those Contracts of Guarantees still extantare concluded. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XX. This Agreement is dated <T2>XXXXXXXX</T2>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Lender: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">   (Name)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">   (IRS I.D. Tax No)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">By </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Title </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">ATTEST: </ITAG><T2>XXXXXXXXXX</T2> (Seal)<ITAG tagnum="20">UNITED STATES OF AMERICA, Farmers Home Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">By</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="20">Title</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Exhibit B_[Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Exhibit D_Interest Rate Buydown Program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. <T3>General.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This exhibit contains the policies and procedures pertaining to anInterest Rate Buydown Program for guaranteed Operating (OL) loans and linesof credit, described in andSection; 1980.175 of this subpart, guaranteedFarm Ownership (FO) loans described in Section 1980.180 of this subpartand Soil and Water (SW) loans described in Section 1980.185 of this subpart.Subparts A and B of Part 1980 are applicable to this Exhibit except asmodified by Exhibit A and E of this subpart and this exhibit. Authorityto enter into the Interest Rate Buydown agreement is provided for in thisExhibit and expires September 30, 1993.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">II. <T3>Introduction.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The authorities contained in this exhibit provide lenders with a toolto enable them to continue to provide credit to operations of not largerthan family farms who are temporarily unable to project a positive cashflow on all income and expenses including debt service without a reductionin the interest rate. This exhibit also provides that a lender that hasa guaranteed loan/line of credit which is not already involved in the InterestRate Buydown program must agree if liquidation of the account becomes imminent,the lender will consider the borrower for an Interest Rate Buydown underthis exhibit and request a determination of the borrower's eligibilityby FmHA. The lender may not initiate foreclosure action on the loan until60 days after a determination has been made with respect to the eligibilityof the borrower to participate in this program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Lenders that participate in this program enter into an agreement withFmHA to reduce the interest rate paid on a loan/line of credit. In return,FmHA will make annual interest rate buydown payments to the lender in anamount not more than 50 percent of the cost of reducing the interest rateon the loan. Payments made to a lender under this exhibit will in no caseexceed 2 percentage points.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">III. <T3>Definitions.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Cash flow</T3>_A projection listing on a typical 24-month basis, ofall anticipated cash inflows (including all farm and non-farm income) andall expenses to be incurred by the borrower during such period (includingall farm and non-farm debt service and other expenses). Production recordsand prices used in the preparation of a cashflow will be calculated inaccordance with andSection; 1980.113(d)(8) of this subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Interest Rate Buydown Agreement</T3>_(Form FmHA 1980-58) The signedagreement between FmHA, the lender, and the borrower, setting forth theterms and conditions of the interest rate buydown.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>Positive Cash Flow</T3>_A cash flow projection, as defined in andSection;198.106(b)(17) of this subpart. Except the reserve requirement as outlinedin andSection; 1980.106(b)(17)(iii) of this subpart may be from 0 up to 10percent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IV. <T3>Program Administration</T3>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">County Supervisors are authorized to approve interest rate buydownagreements providing the following requirements are met by the lender:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. For those borrowers currently indebted for an FmHA guaranteed loan(s)or line(s) of credit where the guaranteed loan/OL line of credit is tobe considered for an interest rate buydown under this exhibit, the lendermust demonstrate that a positive cash flow projection on all income andexpenses, including debt service, is not possible by rescheduling or reamortizingthe account in equally amortized installments as described in andSection;1980.124 of this subpart. If a positive cash flow can be achieved usingrescheduling or reamortizing authorities, subject to the requirements outlinedin andSection; 1980.124, the borrowers account will be rescheduled or reamortized.If a positive cash flow projection is then possible, the borrower is noteligible for an interest rate buydown.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. As required in Form FmHA 449-35, ``Lender's Agreement,'' or FormFmHA 1980-38, ``Lender's Agreement (Line of Credit),'' a lender will notifyFmHA when a borrower is thirty (30) days past due on a payment and it isunable to bring the account current within 30 days. The lender will requestthat FmHA make a determination as to the borrower's eligibility for aninterest rate buydown. The lender will submit a plan of operation projectingthe repayment ability of the borrower with or without an interest ratebuydown. FmHA will make the eligibility determination and will notify thelender in writing within 10 calendar days of receipt of the request. Uponreceipt of FmHA's determination of the borrower's eligibility for interestrate buydown, the lender will submit a request for Interest Rate Buydownas set forth in Attachment 2 to this exhibit. If the lender declines toutilize interest rate buydown, the lender will notify the County Supervisorin writing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. In addition, the following information will be submitted by thelender:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Verification of off-farm equipment, if any.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Form FmHA 440-32, ``Request for Statement of Debts and Collateral,''or similar documentation provided by approved lenders.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Documentation of the borrower's and lender's compliance with therequirements of Exhibit M to Subpart G of Part 1940 of this chapter, ifthe affected loan is not already subjected to this provision.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. Applications from individuals who are not presently indebted foran FmHA guaranteed loan/line of credit shall be processed in accordancewith andSection; 1980.113 of this subpart and this exhibit. In addition,the lender will submit Attachment 2 of this exhibit with the application.The lender must demonstrate that a positive cash flow projection is notpossible without reducing the interest rate on the borrower's loan(s)/line(s)of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. In all cases, the lender and County Supervisor must determine whetherthe borrower owns any nonfarm assets which do not contribute to essentialfamily living expenses or to the maintenance of a sound farming operation.The lender must determine whether the borrower could sell these assetsand, if so, for how much. The lender will then prepare new cash flow projectionswhich take into account the sale of these assets. If a positive cash flowcan then be achieved, the borrower is not eligible for an interest ratebuydown.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. If a positive cash flow cannot be achieved, the lender may askother creditors to voluntarily adjust their debts as outlined in SubpartA of Part 1903 of this chapter. If other creditors adjust their debts andthe proposed interest rate buydown results in a positive cash flow, interestrate buydown may be approved.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. If a positive cash flow cannot be achieved, even with other creditorsvoluntarily adjusting their debts and the interest rate buydown, the interestrate buydown will not be approved.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">F. In order for a borrower's loan to be eligible for an interest ratebuydown, a typical plan of operation must show that a positive cash flowcan be expected during the initial 24-month buydown period. For those loanswith terms less than 24 months then the operation must show a positivecash flow for the term of the loan. All loans/lines of credit with termsexceeding the buydown period must demonstrate that the borrower will beable to project a positive cash flow on all income and expenses, includingdebt service, after the buydown agreement expires. Further, if the lenderproposes a term for the interest rate buydown which exceeds 24 months,the lender will provide FmHA with a typical 12-month cash flow documentingthe necessity for the increased term. In no case will the Federal Buydownperiod exceed three years. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">G. Any holder(s) must agree to the interest rate reduction in writing.If the holder does not consent to the interest rate reduction proposedby the lender, the lender must repurchase the unpaid portion of the loanfrom any holder(s) before the interest rate buydown can be granted. WhenFmHA purchases a portion of a guaranteed loan, buydown payments on thatportion shall cease. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">H. The Interest Rate Buydown Agreement will be attached to the promissorynote(s) or line of credit agreement. The promissory note(s) or line ofcredit agreement, cannot exceed the interest rate the lender charges itsaverage farm customer, <T3>prior</T3> to any write down by the lender, as outlined in andSection;1980.175(e) of this subpart. The lender may only charge a fixed rate ofinterest during the term of the buydown agreement. The lender is responsiblefor the legal documentation of interest rate changes by an ``allonge''attached to the promissory note(s) or line of credit agreement or otherlegally effective amendment of the interest rate when needed; however,no new notes or line of credit agreements may be issued. If the lenderelects to use a variable rate note or line of credit agreement, the fixedrate of interest charged during the buydown period will be calculated <T3>not to exceed </T3>the average variable rate charged the lender's averagefarm customer (as defined in andSection; 1980.175(e)), over the past 90 days.The promissory note(s), line of credit agreements and any attachments tothese agreements, must schedule repayment in accordance with the termsfor the applicable loan type set forth in andSection;andSection; 1980.175(f)and (g), 1980.180(e) and (f), or 1980.185(e) and (f) of this subpart. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. FmHA will pay the lender any interest rate buydown equal to one-halfof the lender's write down of interest percentage points, except that suchpayments will in no case exceed the cost of reducing such interest by morethan two percentage points. The lender will adjust its interest rate inincrements of .25%. Once eligibility is established the lender may reducethe interest rate paid on a loan/line of credit to a point equal or exceedingthat necessary to achieve a positive cash flow. When a lender requestsan interest rate buydown along with a write down, the interest reductionwill at least be one full percentage point. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">V. <T3>Approval of Interest Rate Buydown. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">If the approval official determines the buydown will be approved inaccordance with Paragraph IV of this exhibit, in addition to the determinationsrequired in andSection; 1980.115 Administrative paragraphs A and B, <T3>the approval official will:</T3> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. Prepare Form FmHA 1940-1, ``Request for Obligation of Funds.''This form will be used to obligate the buydown portion for those loanspresently guaranteed where the interest rate is subsequently bought down,and to obligate the loan and interest rate buydown for initial loans. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The approval official will execute Form FmHA 1940-1 and distributecopies in accordance with the Forms Manual Insert (FMI). The Finance Officewill enter the obligation of funds on their records for the interest ratebuydown and/or loan and notify the approval official by forwarding theoriginal and one copy of Form FmHA 440-57, ``Acknowledgement of ObligatedFunds/Check Request.'' </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. A loan or line of credit for which the interest rate was previouslyreduced under this exhibit, may receive a subsequent buydown provided thetotal buydown term(s) over the life of the loan does not exceed 3 yearsand the buydown is approved on or before September 30, 1993. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VI. <T3>Interest Rate Buydown Closing. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The lender will prepare and deliver a Form FmHA 1980-19, ``GuaranteedLoan Closing Report,'' for each initial and existing guaranteed loan/lineof credit in which the interest rate is bought down under this Exhibit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. See andSection; 1980.61(b)(1) and andSection; 1980.118(c) and Administrativeparagraph B of this subpart. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. If FmHA finds that all requirements have been met, the lender,FmHA and the borrower will execute Form FmHA 1980-58, ``Interest Rate BuydownAgreement.'' In NO CASE will Form FmHA 1980-58 be executed prior to thedetermination of availability of funds for the loan/line of credit andbuydown as evidenced on Form FmHA 440-57. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. An original Form FmHA 1980-58 will be prepared for each note orline of credit agreement executed. All originals of Form FmHA 1980-58 willbe provided to the lender and attached to the note(s) with the originalLoan Note Guarantee or Contract or Guarantee. In the event the lender assignsthe guaranteed portion of the loan to holder(s), or the holder(s) agree(s)to any reduction in interest rate, a copy of Form FmHA 1980-58 will beattached to the original Form FmHA 449-36, ``Assignment Guarantee Agreement,''along with a copy of the borrower's note(s) with ``allonge'' and Loan NoteGuarantee. Form FmHA 449-36 will be revised to reflect the note amounts.At the top of the face of the document type: ``This Assignment GuaranteeAgreement is subject to an attachment(s) to the promissory note dated <T2>XX</T2> and Form FmHA 1980-58, ``Interest Rate Buydown Agreement,''which temporarily reduces the interest rate on the promissory note to aneffective interest rate of <T2>XX</T2> %.'' This revision will be initialed and dated by the lender,holder, and FmHA. Copy(ies) of the Interest Rate Buydown Agreement willbe kept in the County Office, attached to the appropriate Loan Note Guaranteeor Contract of Guarantee. Additional copies may be retained by the StateOffice. Copies of all issued Interest Rate Buydown Agreements will be keptin the file. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Repurchase of loans presently guaranteed by FmHA eligible for interestrate buydown (Loan Note Guarantee cases only). See Item number 10 of FormFmHA 449-36 and Item number 6 of Form FmHA 1980-58. When FmHA purchasesa portion of the guaranteed loan, buydown payments on that portion shallcease. The interest rate reduction shall remain in effect. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VII. <T3>Interest Rate Buydown Claims and Payments. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Claims and payments will be processed in accordance with Paragraphs2 and 3 of Form FmHA 1980-58. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VIII. <T3>Term of Buydown Agreement. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The term of a buydown agreement entered into under this exhibit shallnot exceed 3 years or the outstanding term of the loan involving the interestrate buydown, whichever is less. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IX. <T3>Cancellation of Interest Rate Buydown. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Form FmHA 1980-58, ``Interest Rate Buydown Agreement,'' is incontestableexcept for fraud or misrepresentation, of which the lender has actual knowledgeat the time the Interest Rate Buydown Agreement is executed, or for whichthe lender participates in or condones. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">X. <T3>Excessive Interest Rate Buydown.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Upon written notice to the lender, borrower and any holder(s), theGovernment may amend or cancel the Interest Rate Buydown Agreement andcollect from the lender any amount of reduction granted which resultedfrom incomplete or inaccurate information (of which the lender was aware),an error in computation, or any other reason which resulted in paymentthat the lender was not entitled to receive. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XI. <T3>Transfer and Assumption of Loans Involving Interest Rate Buydown.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Transfers will be processed in accordance with andSection; 1980.123of this subpart. The loan/line of credit will be transferred with the InterestRate Buydown Agreement only in cases where the transferee was liable forthe debt at the time the buydown was granted. Under no other circumstanceswill the buydown be transferred. If the buydown is necessary for the transfereeto achieve a positive cash flow, the lender must make application for aninitial buydown under this exhibit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XII. <T3>Review by FmHA Employees. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The lender will submit Form FmHA 1980-24, ``Request Interest RateBuydown/Subsidy Payment to Guaranteed Loan Lender,'' annually along withdetailed calculations and a statement of activity on the borrower's accountto support the claim. The County Supervisor will approve, if correct, andforward to the Finance Office for payment. FmHA may review audit reportsby the lender's supervising agency when buydown claims are involved. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XIII. <T3>List of Eligible Lenders.</T3> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The County Supervisor will maintain a current list of eligible lendersand other lenders who express a desire to participate in the guaranteedprogram. This list will be made available to farmers upon request. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Attachment 1_Buydown Information Letter </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">United States Department of Agriculture Farmers Home Administration(location) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Dear </ITAG><T2>XXXXXXXXXX</T2>: <ITAG tagnum="20">The Farmers Home Administration (FmHA) has authority under the FoodSecurity Act of 1985 (P.L. 99-198) to temporarily make payments to lendersto reduce borrower interest rates on a guaranteed loan to eligible applicantsand borrowers. The Interest Rate Buydown Program provides lenders witha tool to enable them to continue to provide credit to family farm operatorswho are temporarily unable to project a positive cash flow on all incomeand expenses, including debt service, without a reduction in the interestrate.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Lenders that participate in this program enter into an agreement withFmHA to reduce the interest rate paid on a loan. In return, FmHA will makeannual payments to the lender in an amount of not more than 50 percentof the cost of reducing the interest rate on the loan. Payment made toa lender under this authority may not exceed two percentage points. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Borrowers with existing guaranteed Farm Operating (OL), Farm Ownership(FO) and Soil and Water (SW) guaranteed loans, may have the interest rateon their loans bought down by FmHA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">If you would like additional information regarding the Interest RateBuydown Program for guaranteed loans and how to apply, you should contactthis office. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">I will be glad to discuss this program in detail with you. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Sincerely, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">County Supervisor</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Attachment 2_Request for Interest Rate Buydown </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">To County Supervisor, FmHA</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Subject: Request for Interest Rate Buydown</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Borrower's Name: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="20">In connection with the subject application for an interest rate buydown,this lending institution certifies:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The loan balance of $<T2>XXX</T2> is the amount requested for an interest rate buydown. If aline of credit, the line of credit balance is $<T2>XXX</T2>, and the line of credit ceiling amount of $<T2>XXX</T2> is the amount requested for an interest rate buydown.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) (a) The interest rate charged the lender's average farm customer,determined in accordance with andSection;1980.175(e) of this subpart, is<T2>XXX</T2>%. (Specify fixed or variable. If variable rates are used,the average farm customer's variable rate for the past 90 days shall beinserted.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) The lender's interest rate to the subject borrower prior to writedownis <T2>XXX</T2>% (may not exceed (2)(a)). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) The lender's writedown is <T2>XXX</T2>%. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) The interest rate to be charged with the writedown to the borroweris <T2>XXX</T2>%. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The amount of interest written down is permanently cancelled asit becomes due and no attempt will be made to collect that portion of thedebt. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The lender's interest rate reduction to the borrower will resultin a reduced payment schedule for the term of the buydown and that a positivecash flow on all income and expenses, including debt service, will be expectedduring the buydown period. In cases where the term of the loan exceedsthe term of the buydown, the borrower must project a positive cash flowon all income and expenses, including debt service, after the buydown periodterminates. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) The borrower's cash flow projections have been prepared in accordancewith Part 1980, Subpart B, andSection;1980.113(d)(8), and are attached tothis document.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Warning: </T4>Section 1001 of Title 18, United States Code provides:``Whoever, in any matter within the jurisdiction of any department or agencyof the United States knowingly and willfully falsifies, conceals or coversup . . . a material fact, or makes any false, fictitious or fraudulentstatements or representations, or makes or uses any false writing or documentknowing the same to contain any false, fictitious or fraudulent statementor entry, shall be fined not more than $10,000 or imprisoned not more than5 years, or both.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">   (Name of Lender)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">By </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="20">Title </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">   Lender's IRS ID No.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Date </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="85">Exhibit E_Demonstration Project for Purchase of Certain Farm CreditSystem Acquired Farmland </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. <T3>General</T3>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This Exhibit contains the policies and procedures pertaining to aDemonstration Project for purchase of certain Farm Credit System acquiredfarmland (FCS Demonstration Project) for guaranteed Farm Ownership (FO)loans described in andSection; 1980.180 of this subpart. Subparts A and Bof this part are applicable to this Exhibit except as modified by ExhibitA of this subpart and this Exhibit. Authority to enter into the FCS DemonstrationProject expires January 6, 1991. Attachment 1 is the Farm Credit Bank Agreementto be executed by the Administrator of the Farmers Home Administration(FmHA) and the President of each Farm Credit Bank of those Districts whichare certified to participate in the ``Demonstration Project for the Purchaseof Farm Credit System Land.'' When a District is certified by the FarmCredit System Assistance Board (FCSAB), the President of the District willsign the Agreement and forward it to the FmHA Administrator for signature.The original Agreement will be retained by FmHA with a conformed copy tothe District and the FCSAB.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">II. <T3>Introduction</T3>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This Exhibit contains a means by which the Farm Credit System (FCS)can make available for sale certain acquired lands to eligible FO applicants,as provided by andSection; 351(h) of the Consolidated Farm and Rural DevelopmentAct. Each FCS District President and FmHA State Director, who will be involvedin the Demonstration Project will provide ample notice of the project asoutlined in Attachment 1 of this Exhibit. Only those properties owned byFCS member institutions certified to issue preferred stock under andSection;6.27 of the Farm Credit Act of 1971 may be purchased under this Exhibit.The Farm Credit Administration (FCA) will provide the Farmers Home Administration(FmHA) with a list of these certified FCS member institutions, as furtherexplained in Memorandum of Understanding between FmHA and FCA found inFmHA Instruction 2000-MM (available in any FmHA office). FmHA may issuecertificates of eligibility to eligible borrowers to reduce the interestrate paid by such borrowers on FmHA guaranteed loans obtained from eligibleFarmer Program lenders to purchase properties owned by the Farm CreditSystem. The sale of land by the Farm Credit System under this program islimited to an aggregate land value not to exceed $250,000,000 at fair marketvalue each fiscal year.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Lenders that participate in this FCS Demonstration Project may enterinto an agreement with FmHA to reduce the interest rate paid on a loan.In return, FmHA will make annual interest rate buydown payments to thelender in the amount of 4 percentage points. Those lenders who permanentlyreduce the interest rate charged on the guaranteed loan by at least 1 fullpercentage point will receive a 95 percent guarantee. The reduction ofinterest by FmHA will be in effect for a term equal to the outstandingterm of such loan, or 5 years, whichever is less.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">III. <T3>Definitions</T3>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Cash Flow</T3>_A projection listing on a typical 24-month basis, ofall anticipated cash inflows (including all farm and non-farm income) andall expenses to be incurred by the borrower during such period (includingall farm and non-farm debt service and other expenses). Production recordsand prices used in the preparation of a cash flow will be calculated inaccordance with Section 1980.113(d)(8) of this subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Certificate of Eligibility</T3>_The County Committee will certify onForm FmHA 440-2, ``County Committee Certification or Recommendation'' thefollowing:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) That the borrower is eligible for a guaranteed FO loan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The farm is eligible for the program in accordance with andSection;1980.106(b)(7) of this subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The borrower is eligible for an interest rate reduction. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>Interest Rate Buydown Agreement_</T3>(Form FmHA 1980-58) The signedagreement between FmHA, the lender, and the borrower, setting forth theterms and conditions of the interest rate reduction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. <T3>Personal Funds_</T3>Any funds listed on a borrower's financial statementor obtained through a loan, whether or not secured by other property.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. <T3>Positive Cash Flow_</T3>A cash flow projection, as defined in andSection;1980.106(b)(17)of this subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IV. <T3>Program Administration.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">County Supervisors are authorized to approve Interest Rate BuydownAgreements for the FCS Demonstration Project providing the following requirementsare met by the applicant, FCS and the lender.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. Applications from individuals who are seeking to purchase FCS acquiredfarmlands with a guaranteed FO loan shall be processed in accordance withandSection;1980.113 of this subpart and this Exhibit. In addition, the lenderwill submit Attachment 2 of Exhibit D with the application. The lendermust demonstrate that a positive cash flow projection is not possible withoutreducing the interest rate on the FO loan, except the reserve requirementas outlined in andSection;1980.106(b)(17)(iii) of this subpart may be fromzero to 10 percent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. Prospective borrowers who seek to purchase FCS acquired farmlandsand who do not have a lender involved in that purchase will submit an applicationto FmHA. The County Committee will review the application, which will alsoinclude a description of the property, and render a decision as to theeligibility of the prospective borrower and farm. If the County Committeedetermines the prospective borrower is eligible and that the farm meetsthe requirements of andSection;1980.106(b)(6) of this subpart, then the CountySupervisor will determine if the request is feasible. If the request isrejected by either the County Committee or the County Supervisor, the prospectiveborrower and the lender will be advised of the opportunity for an appealas set out in Subpart B of Part 1900 of this chapter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. Prospective borrower must provide a down payment equal to at least15 percent of the land purchase price using personal funds, as definedin paragraph III D of this Exhibit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. Prospective borrowers must meet the applicable requirements ofSubpart G of Part 1940 of this chapter, including providing SCS Form CPA-26,``Highly Erodible Land and Wetland Conservation Determination,'' and FormAD-1026, ``Highly Erodible Land and Wetland Conservation Certification,''as required by Exhibit M to Subpart G of Part 1940 of this chapter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. The FCS must price suitable farmland (family farm size as determinedby the County Committee) to eligible prospective borrowers at fair marketvalue.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">F. FmHA will pay the lender an interest rate reduction of 4 percentagepoints.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">G. The loan will be guaranteed at 90 percent in connection with a4 percentage point interest rate reduction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">H. A lender who permanently reduces the interest rate currently chargedon the loan by at least 1 full percentage point will receive a 95 percentguarantee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. The terms of the reduction will not exceed the outstanding termof such loan, or 5 years, whichever is less.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">J. In order for the prospective borrower to qualify for a loan andan interest rate reduction, a typical plan of operation must show thata positive cash flow as defined in andSection;1980.106(b)(17) of this subpartcan be expected during the reduction period and after the Interest RateBuydown Agreement expires.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">K. The Interest Rate Buydown Agreement will be attached to the promissorynote(s). The promissory note(s) cannot exceed the interest rate the lendercharges the average farm customer, <T3>prior </T3>to any write down by the lender, as outlined in andSection;1980.175(e)(2)of this subpart. The lender may only charge a fixed rate of interest duringthe term of the buydown agreement. The lender is responsible for the legaldocumentation of interest rate changes by an ``allonge'' attached to thepromissory note(s) or other legally effective amendment of the interestrate; however, no new notes may be issued. If the lender elects to usea variable rate note, the fixed rate of interest charged during the reductionperiod will be calculated <T3>not to exceed </T3>the average variable rate charged the lender's averagefarm customer (as defined in andSection;1980.175(e)(2)) of this subpart overthe past 90 days. The promissory note(s) and any attachments to these agreements,must schedule repayment in accordance with the terms for the loan set forthin Section 1980.180(e) and (f) of this subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">V. <T3>Approval of Loan Guarantees and Interest Rate Reduction.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Authority to approve loan guarantees and Interest Rate Buydown Agreementsexpires January 6, 1991. If the FmHA approval official determines the reductionwill be in accordance with paragraph VI of this Exhibit, in addition tothe determinations required in andSection; 1980.115, Administrative paragraphsA and B, of this subpart <T3>the approval official will</T3>:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. Prepare Form FmHA 1940-1, ``Request for Obligation of Funds.''The request for obligation of funds must include the amount of the loanand its respective buydown.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. Execute Form FmHA 1940-1 and distribute copies in accordance withthe FMI. The Finance Office will enter the obligation of funds on theirrecords for the interest rate reduction and notify the approval officialby forwarding the original and one copy of Form FmHA 440-57, ``Acknowledgementof Obligated Funds/Check Request.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VI. <T3>Interest Rate Reduction Closing.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. The lender will prepare and deliver a Form FmHA 1980-19, ``GuaranteedLoan Closing Report,'' for each guaranteed loan in which the interest rateis reduced under this Exhibit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. See andSection; 1980.61(b)(1), andSection; 1980.118(c) and Administrativeparagraph B of this subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. If FmHA finds that all requirements have been met, the lender,FmHA and the borrower will execute Form FmHA 1980-58, ``Interest Rate BuydownAgreement.'' In NO CASE will Form FmHA 1980-58 be executed prior to thedetermination of availability of funds for the loan and interest reductionas evidenced on Form FmHA 440-57.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. An original Form FmHA 1980-58 will be prepared for each note executed.All originals of Form FmHA 1980-58 will be provided to the lender and attachedto the note(s) with the original Loan Note Guarantee. In the event thelender assigns the guaranteed portion of the loan to holder(s), a copyof Form FmHA 1980-58 will be attached to the original Form FmHA 449-36,``Assignment Guarantee Agreement,'' along with a copy of the borrower'snote(s) with ``allonge'' and Loan Note Guarantee. Form FmHA 449-36 willbe revised to reflect the note amounts. At the top of the face of the documenttype: ``This Assignment Guarantee Agreement is subject to an attachment(s)to the promissory note dated<T2>XXX</T2> and Form FmHA 1980-58, ``Interest Rate Buydown Agreement,''which reduces the interest rate on the promissory note to an effectiveinterest rate of <T2>XX</T2>%. This reduction is <T2>XXX</T2> (insert ``temporary'' if there is no 95 percent guaranteeinvolved or ``permanent'' if a 95 percent guarantee is involved.)'' Thisrevision will be initialed and dated by the lender, holder, and FmHA. Copy(ies)of the Interest Rate Buydown Agreement will be kept in the County Office,and attached to the appropriate Loan Note Guarantee. Additional copiesmay be retained by the State Office. Copies of all issued Interest RateBuydown Agreements will be kept in the file. Copies may be retained bythe State Office. Copies of all issued Interest Rate Buydown Agreementswill be kept in the file.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Repurchase of guaranteed loans having interest rate reduction underthis FCS Demonstration Project. See item number 10 of Form FmHA 449-36and item number 6 of Form FmHA 1980-58. When FmHA purchases a portion ofthe guaranteed loan, buydown payments on that portion shall cease, butthe interest rate reduction shall remain in effect. The lender shall completeForm FmHA 1980-24, ``Request Interest Rate Buydown/Subsidy Payment to GuaranteedLoan Lender,'' to request payment for the buydown/subsidy through the dateof the FmHA purchase.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VII. <T3>Interest Rate Reduction Claims and Payments.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Claims and payments will be processed in accordance with paragraphs2 and 3 of Form FMHA 1980-58.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VIII. <T3>Term of Buydown Agreement.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The term of a buydown agreement entered into under this Exhibit shallnot exceed 5 years or the outstanding term of the loan involving the interestrate reduction, whichever is less.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IX. <T3>Cancellation of Interest Rate Reduction.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Form FmHA 1980-58 is incontestable, except for fraud or misrepresentation,of which the lender has actual knowledge at the time the Interest RateBuydown Agreement is executed, or for which the lender participates inor condones.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">X. <T3>Excessive Interest Rate Reduction.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Upon written notice to the lender, borrower and any holder(s), theGovernment may amend or cancel the Interest Rate Buydown Agreement andcollect from the lender any amount of reduction granted which resultedfrom incomplete or inaccurate information (of which the lender was aware),an error in computation, or any other reason which resulted in paymentthat the lender was not entitled to receive.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XI. <T3>Transfer and Assumption of Loans Involving Interest Rate Reduction.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Transfers will be processed under this Exhibit. The lender shall completeForm FmHA 1980-24, ``Request Interest Rate Buydown/Subsidy Payment to GuaranteedLoan Lender,'' to request payment for the buydown/subsidy through the dateof the transfer or assumption of the guaranteed loan under the transferor'scase number. If the reduction is necessary for the transferee to achievea positive cash flow, the lender must make application for an initial reductionunder this Exhibit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XII. <T3>Review by FmHA Employees.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The lender will submit Form FmHA 1980-24 annually along with detailedcalculations and a statement of activity of the borrower's account to supportforward to the Finance Office for payment. FmHA may review audit reportsby the lender's supervising agency when reduction claims are involved.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="85">Attachment 1_Farmers Home Administration Demonstration Project forthe Purchase of Farm Credit System Land </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Farm Credit Bank Agreement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. <T3>General: </T3>This agreement provides the guidelines for the implementationof the Demonstration Project for the Purchase of Certain Farm Credit SystemAcquired Land (FCS Demonstration Project) between Farmers Home Administration(FmHA) and the Farm Credit Bank of <T2>XXXXX</T2> (Bank) to carry out the goals and objectives of Section351(h) of the Consolidated Farm and Rural Development Act (7 U.S.C. andSection;1999(h)) as described in Exhibit E of 7 CFR Part 1980, Subpart B.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">The Parties Agree That:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. The Bank will make available for purchase by qualified borrowersproperty eligible for the FCS Demonstration Project as further explainedin Paragraph II of Exhibit E of 7 CFR Part 1980, Subpart B.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">II. The Bank may, at its discretion and for the purpose of maximizingthe economic return on the sale of acquired property, subdivide tractsof land to make available parcels that permit eligible borrowers to purchasethe parcels consistent with limits placed on the size of loans made, insured,or guaranteed under the Consolidated Farm and Rural Development Act.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">III. The Bank will periodically provide the FmHA State Director withcurrent inventories of properties that may be eligible for the FCS DemonstrationProject.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IV. The Bank, through private sale, will sell land at fair marketvalue, as determined by the Bank, to eligible borrowers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">V. The Bank reserves the right to market and sell its acquired propertyto any qualified individual until, under the terms of the FCS DemonstrationProject, FmHA has determined the eligibility of the borrower and suitabilityof the property, and a purchase agreement has been executed between theeligible borrower and the Bank.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VI. The Bank will provide technical assistance to the extent possiblein connection with the implementation of the FCS Demonstration Project.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VII. The Bank will dispose of properties listed under the FCS DemonstrationProject in a manner consistent with the applicable provisions of Section4.36 of the Farm Credit Act of 1971, as amended, governing the rights offirst refusal of former owners.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">VIII. The FmHA will process applications for participation in theFCS Demonstration Project in accordance with FmHA regulations, includingthose set out in 7 CFR Part 1980, Subparts A and B.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IX. The FmHA will determine the eligibility of the prospective borrowerand the property for the FmHA guaranteed program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">X. The FmHA will provide certificates of eligibility to eligible borrowerson a timely basis consistent with the availability of acquired propertyowned by institutions of the Farm Credit System certified to issue preferredstock under Section 6.27 of the Farm Credit Act of 1971.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">XI. The Bank and FmHA are independently responsible for providingadequate media coverage of the FCS Demonstration Project. Media coveragewill include news releases for local newspapers, radio, and television.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This Agreement is effective upon signing by both the Administratorof the Farmers Home Administration and President of the Farm Credit Bankof <T2>XXXX</T2>. This Agreement may be amended at any time by written agreementof both parties, and shall terminate with the expiration of the authorityfor the FCS Demonstration Project.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">By</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Administrator, Farmers Home Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Date:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">By:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">President of the Farm Credit Bank of </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="77">Date:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Exhibit F_(Prepare One for Each Loan/Line of Credit to be WrittenDown) Shared Appreciation Agreement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This Agreement is entered into between (Lender's name) (called ``Lender'')and (Borrower's name) (called ``Borrower'') on (date) and expires on (Date)(maximum term of ten (10) years).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Borrower is indebted to Lender for a loan or line of credit as evidencedby the note(s) or line of credit agreement(s) described below:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,tp0,i1,xs30,r10,r10,xs32</C> <H1>Date</H1><H1>Principal amount</H1><H1>Interest rate</H1><H1>Due date</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This Agreement is attached to the note(s) or line of credit agreement(s)described above. As of the date of this Agreement, before write down, theunpaid principal balance on this note or line of credit agreement was $<T2>XXX</T2> and the unpaid interest balance was $<T2>XXX</T2>. If a line of credit agreement is involved, the new line ofcredit ceiling is $<T2>XXX</T2>, and no increase will be made under the line of credit agreement(s).The value of the security covered by this agreement at the time of writedown is $<T2>XXX</T2>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The note or line of credit agreement described above is secured bythe following real estate security instruments:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>6,L2,tp0,i1,xs30,r10,r10,r10,r10,xs22</C> <H1>Grantor</H1><H1>Date of security instrument</H1><H1>Records of </H1><H2>County</H2><H2>State</H2><H1>Book or reel</H1><H1>Page</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Lender agrees to write down $<T2>XXX</T2> of principal and accrued interest of the above-described noteor line of credit agreement. After the write down, there is now due andowing the principal sum of $<T2>XXX</T2> plus interest in the sum of $<T2>XXX</T2> together with interest accruing from the date of this agreementon the unpaid principal balance at the rate of <T2>XX</T2>%.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">As a condition to, and in consideration of, Lender writing down theabove amounts and restructuring the loan, Borrower agrees to recaptureby the Lender an amount according to one of the following schedules:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Seventy-five (75) percent of any positive appreciation in the marketvalue of the property securing the loan or line of credit agreement asdescribed in the above security instrument(s) between the date of thisAgreement and either the expiration date of this Agreement or the dateBorrower pays all guaranteed loan(s) or lines of credit in full, ceasesfarming or transfers title of the security, if such event occurs four (4)years or less from the date of this Agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Fifty (50) percent of any positive appreciation in the market valueof the property securing the loan or line of credit agreement above asdescribed in the security instruments between the date of this Agreementand either the expiration date of this Agreement or the date Borrower paysall guaranteed loans or lines of credit in full, ceases farming or transferstitle of the security, if such event occurs after four (4) years but beforethe expiration date of this Agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The amount of recapture by Lender will be based on the differencebetween the value of the security at the time of disposal or cessationby Borrower of farming and the value of the security at the time this Agreementis entered into. Both values will be determined thorough an appraisal conductedby Lender. The amount of recapture will not exceed the amount of writedown as stated on this form. Repayment of the recapture amount may be rescheduledor reamortized if the borrower is unable to pay the recapture amount atthe expiration date of this agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">   (Borrower signature)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">   (Lender signature)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Emergency Livestock Loans</ITAG>13. Section 1980.284 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.284 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bankruptcy.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>In bankruptcies, there are two separate proceedings:liquidation and reorganization under the bankruptcy court's protection.It is the lender's responsibility to protect the guaranteed loan debt andall collateral securing the loan in bankruptcy proceedings (refer to paragraphIX C 5 of Form FmHA 449-35 or Form FmHA 1980-38). These responsibilitiesinclude, but are not limited to:(1) The lender will file a proof of claim where necessary and all the necessarypapers and pleadings concerning the case.(2) The lender will attend and where necessary participate in meetingsof the creditors and all court proceedings.(3) The lender, whose collateral is subject to being used by the bankruptcyestate, will immediately seek adequate protection of the collateral, includingpetitioning for a super priority. Adequate protection of the collateral,depending on interpretation, may take several forms. In a bankruptcy, thetrustee is authorized to sell, lease or use the collateral if the borrower'sbusiness is in operation. The only collateral the trustee cannot utilizeis cash collateral unless the secured creditor grants permission or thebankruptcy court authorizes the use of such after giving a proper hearingand notice.(i) Cash collateral means cash, negotiable instruments, documents of title,securities, deposit accounts, or other cash equivalents, such as accountsreceivable.(ii) Concerning machinery, equipment and real estate, adequate protectioncan be interpreted differently under reorganization. The bankruptcy trusteecould dispose of certain collateral and grant to the secured party a replacementlien on some other collateral which may or may not have the same value.For example, the lender may hold a first lien on a good saleable pieceof real estate and could find replacement of this particular parcel ofproperty with a second or possibly a third lien on another parcel of landthat the lender may find undesirable for adequate protection. There areno guarantees to the lender when the borrower is in reorganization thatthe collateral will be protected to the lender's satisfaction. The lendershould be fully aware of what is taking place with the collateral and resistany adverse changes that may be made in the collateral securing the FmHAguaranteed loan.(4) When permitted by the Bankruptcy Code, the lender will request a modificationof any plan of reorganization whenever it appears that additional recoveriesare likely. In Chapters 11, 12, and 13 bankruptcy cases, the lender willmonitor the plan to determine whether the borrower is fulfilling the requirementsof the plan and take appropriate action to obtain dismissal of the caseif the borrower fails to comply with the requirements of the plan. A dismissalof the plan by the bankruptcy court would restore the original outstandingindebtedness at the time the reorganization plan was approved.(5) FmHA will be kept adequately and regularly informed in writing of allaspects of the proceedings.(b) <T3>Reorganization bankruptcy cases. </T3>(1) In Chapter 11, 12, or 13reorganization, if an independent appraisal of collateral is necessaryin FmHA's opinion, FmHA and the lender will share the appraisal fee equally.(2) Lender expenses, in a Chapter 11, 12, or 13 reorganization case, arenot deducted from the proceeds of the collateral because a reorganizationis not a liquidation. All expenses incurred by the lender (including attorney'sfees) while the borrower is in reorganization are considered normal expensesof servicing the account and therefore are the responsibility of the lenderand are not deductible from the proceeds of the collateral or covered underthe FmHA guarantee.(c) <T3>Liquidation bankruptcy cases. </T3>(1) Reasonable and customary liquidationexpenses may be deducted from the proceeds of the collateral in liquidationbankruptcy cases provided the lender is doing the actual liquidation ofthe collateral, presents adequate written justification for each expense,and secures FmHA's written concurrence prior to incurring the expense.(2) If a trustee is appointed by the bankruptcy court to sell the collateralunder a conversion of a reorganization plan to a liquidation plan or Chapter7, the trustee rather than the lender in this instance is responsible forliquidating the collateral. Normally, any expenses incurred by the lenderduring this period are not considered liquidation expenses and cannot bededucted from collateral proceeds. The lender is not engaged in the liquidationbut is performing in a manner considered to be normal servicing of theloan under the circumstances.(3) If the property is abandoned by the trustee and the lender is actuallyengaged in liquidation, reasonable liquidation expenses would be recoverablefrom liquidation proceeds with prior written concurrence for each expensefrom FmHA before the expense is incurred.(d) <T3>Loss payments. </T3>See paragraph XVI of Form FmHA 449-35 or Form FmHA1980-38.Administrative<ITAG tagnum="21">A. The lender is responsible for advising FmHA of the completion ofreorganization plan. The lender is also responsible for advising FmHA ifthe borrower does comply with the plan and the servicing action the lenderwill take to protect the interest of the lender and FmHA. However, theFmHA servicing office will monitor the lender's files to ensure timelynotification of servicing actions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. When an estimated loss claim is paid during the operation of thereorganization plan, and the borrower repays in full the remaining balanceof the loan as set forth in the plan without an additional loss sustainedby the lender, a Final Report of Loss is not necessary. The Finance Officewill close out the estimated loss account as a Final Loss at the time notificationof payment in full is received.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. If the bankruptcy court attempts to direct that loss payments willbe applied to the account other than the unsecured principal first andthen to unsecured accrued interest, the lender is responsible for notifyingthe FmHA servicing office immediately. The FmHA servicing office will thenobtain advice from OGC on what actions FmHA should take.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. Protective Advances_Authorized protective advances may be includedwith the estimated loss payment associated with the reorganization bankruptcyprovided they were incurred in connection with liquidation of the accountprior to the borrower filing bankrutcy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. Accrued interest owed to the lender should be supported by documentationas to how the accrued interest amount was calculated by the lender. A copyof the promissory note and ledger should also be attached. As part of thereview of the final loss claim, FmHA should be assured that the lenderhas not accrued interest on the principal and interest amount of the loanthat was paid by the estimated loss payment. The approval official is responsiblefor the accuracy of the interest calculations on the final report of lossbefore submission to the Finance Office.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">F. Repurchase of Notes._In cases where a default on the guaranteednote does not exist, the State Director may approve the repurchase of theunpaid guaranteed portion of loan(s) from any holder(s) to reduce interestaccrual during a Chapter 7 proceeding, or after a Chapter 11 proceedingbecomes a liquidation proceeding. (Refer to paragraph X C of Form 449-35or Form FmHA 1980-38.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">G. County Supervisors are authorized to approve Report of EstimatedLoss or Final Loss Payments on Form FmHA 449-30 in those cases where theloss payment will not exceed $55,000. The State Director is authorizedto approve the determination in all other cases. A copy of the form willbe given to the District Director. The State Director will submit FormFmHA 449-30 to the Finance Office for payment of any losses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Business and Industrial Loan Program</ITAG>14. Section 1980.475 is amended by redesignating paragraph (a)(5) as (a)(6),adding new paragraph (a)(5), revising paragraph (b), adding new paragraph(d), and revising the Administrative section, to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.475 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bankruptcy.</ITAG>(a) * * *(5) When permitted by the Bankruptcy Code, the lender will request modificationof any plan of reorganization whenever it appears that additional recoveriesare likely.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) In a Chapter 11 reorganization, if an independent appraisal of collateralis necessary in FmHA's opinion, FmHA and the lender will share such appraisalfee equally.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) <T3>Estimated loss payments. </T3>See paragraph XVI of Form FmHA 449-35.Administrative<ITAG tagnum="21">Refer to Appendix G of this subpart (available in any FmHA office)for advice on how to interact with the lender on liquidation and propertymanagement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. It is the responsibility of the State Program Chief to see thatFmHA is being fully informed by the lender in all bankruptcy cases.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. All bankruptcy cases should be reported immediately to the NationalOffice by utilizing and completing a problem/delinquent status report.The Regional Attorney must be informed promptly of the proceedings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. Chapter 11 pertains to a reorganization of a business contemplatingan ongoing business rather than a termination and dissolution of the businesswhere legal protection is afforded to the business as defined under Chapter11 of the Bankruptcy Code. Consequently, expenses incurred by the lenderin a Chapter 11 reorganization can never be liquidation expenses unlessthe proceeding becomes a Liquidating 11. If the proceeding should becomea Liquidating 11, reasonable and customary liquidation expenses may bededucted from proceeds of collateral provided the lender is doing the actualliquidation of the collateral as provided by the Lender's Agreement. Chapter7 pertains to a liquidation of the borrower's assets. If and when liquidationof the borrower's assets under Chapter 7 is conducted by the bankruptcytrustee, the lender cannot claim expenses. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. The State Director may approve the repurchase of the unpaid guaranteedportion of the loan from the holder(s) to reduce interest accruals duringChapter 7 proceedings or after a Chapter 11 proceeding becomes a liquidationproceeding. On loans in bankruptcy, any loss payment must be halted inaccordance with the Lender's Agreement and carry the approval of the StateDirector. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. The State Director must approve in advance and in writing the lender'sestimated liquidation expenses on loans in liquidation bankruptcy. Theseexpenses must be reasonable and customary and not in-house expenses ofthe lender. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">F. The lender is responsible for advising FmHA of the completion ofthe Chapter 11 reorganization plan; however, the FmHA servicing officewill monitor the lender's files to ensure timely notification of servicingactions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">G. If an estimated loss claim is paid during the operation of thereorganization plan, and the borrower repays in full the remaining balanceof the loan as set forth in the plan without an additional loss sustainedby the lender, a Final Report of Loss is not necessary. The Finance Officewill close out the estimated loss account as a Final Loss at the time notificationof payment in full is received. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">H. If the bankruptcy court attempts to direct that loss payments willbe applied to the account other than the unsecured principal first andthen to unsecured accrued interest, the lender is responsible for notifyingthe FmHA servicing office immediately. The FmHA servicing office will thenobtain advice from OGC on what actions FmHA should take. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I. Protective Advances_Authorized protective advances may be includedwith the estimated loss payment associated with the Chapter 11 reorganizationprovided they were incurred in connection with liquidation of the accountprior to the borrower filing bankruptcy.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">J. Adequate Protection_The bankruptcy court can order protection ofthe collateral while the borrower is in a reorganization bankruptcy. Thelender whose collateral is subject to being used by the trustee in bankruptcyshould immediately seek adequate protection of the collateral, includingpetitioning for a super priority.</ITAG>14a. Subpart E is amended by adding Exhibit G.<ITAG tagnum="84">Exhibit G </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note.</T4>_The Exhibit is not published in the Code of Federal Regulations.It is available in any FmHA office.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_Economic Emergency Loans</ITAG>15. Section 1980.583 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1980.583</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Bankruptcy.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> In bankruptcies, there are two separate proceedings:liquidation and reorganization under the bankruptcy court's protection.It is the lender's responsibility to protect the guaranteed loan debt andall collateral securing the loan in bankruptcy proceedings (refer to paragraphIX C 5 of Form FmHA 449-35 or Form FmHA 1980-38). These responsibilitiesinclude, but are not limited to:(1) The lender will file a proof of claim where necessary and all the necessarypapers and pleadings concerning the case.(2) The lender will attend, and where necessary, participate in meetingsof the creditors and all court proceedings.(3) The lender whose collateral is subject to being used by the bankruptcyestate will immediately seek adequate protection of the collateral, includingpetitioning for a super priority. Adequate protection of the collateral,depending on interpretation, may take several forms. In a bankruptcy, thetrustee is authorized to sell, lease or use the collateral if the borrower'sbusiness is in operation. The only collateral the trustee cannot utilizeis cash collateral unless the secured creditor grants permission or thebankruptcy court authorizes the use of such after giving a proper hearingand notice.(i) Cash collateral means cash, negotiable instruments, documents of title,securities, deposit accounts, or other cash equivalents, such as accountsreceivable.(ii) Concerning machinery, equipment and real estate, adequate protectioncan be interpreted differently under reorganization. The bankruptcy trusteecould dispose of certain collateral and grant to the secured party a replacementlien on some other collateral which may or may not have the same value.For example, the lender may hold a first lien on a good saleable pieceof real estate and could find replacement of this particular parcel ofproperty with a second or possibly a third lien on another parcel of landthat the lender may find undesirable for adequate protection. There areno guarantees to the lender when the borrower is in reorganization thatthe collateral will be protected to the lender's satisfaction. The lendershould be fully aware of what is taking place with the collateral and resistany adverse changes that may be made in the collateral securing the FmHAguaranteed loan.(4) When permitted by the Bankruptcy Code, the lender will request a modificationof any plan of reorganization whenever it appears that additional recoveriesare likely. In Chapters 11, 12, and 13 bankruptcy cases, the lender willmonitor the plan to determine whether the borrower is fulfilling the requirementsof the plan and take appropriate action to obtain dismissal of the caseif the borrower fails to comply with the requirements of the plan. A dismissalof the plan by the bankruptcy court would restore the original outstandingindebtedness at the time the reorganization plan was approved.(5) FmHA will be kept adequately and regularly informed in writing of allaspects of the proceedings.(b) <T3>Reorganization bankruptcy cases.</T3> (1) In a Chapter 11, 12, or 13reorganization, if an independent appraisal of collateral is necessaryin FmHA's opinion, FmHA and the lender will share the appraisal fee equally.(2) Lender expenses in a Chapter 11, 12, or 13 reorganization case arenot deducted from the proceeds of the collateral because a reorganizationis not a liquidation. All expenses incurred by the lender (including attorney'sfees) while the borrower is in reorganization are considered normal expensesof servicing the account, and therefore are the responsibility of the lenderand are not deductible from the proceeds of the collateral or covered underthe FmHA guarantee.(c) <T3>Liquidation bankruptcy cases.</T3> (1) Reasonable and customary liquidationexpenses may be deducted from the proceeds of the collateral in liquidationbankruptcy cases, provided the lender is doing the actual liquidation ofthe collateral, presents adequate written justification for each expense,and secures FmHA's written concurrence prior to incurring the expense.(2) If a trustee is appointed by the bankruptcy court to sell the collateralunder a conversion of a reorganization plan to a liquidation plan or Chapter7, the trustee rather than the lender in this instance is responsible forliquidating the collateral. Normally, any expenses incurred by the lenderduring this period are not considered liquidation expenses and cannot bededucted from collateral proceeds. The lender is not engaged in the liquidationbut is performing in a manner considered to be normal servicing of theloan under the circumstances.(3) If the property is abandoned by the trustee and the lender is actuallyengaged in liquidation, reasonable liquidation expenses would be recoverablefrom liquidation proceeds with prior written concurrence for each expensefrom FmHA before the expense is incurred.(d) <T3>Loss payments</T3>. See paragraph XVI of Form FmHA 449-35 or Form FmHA1980-38.Administrative<ITAG tagnum="21">A. The lender is responsible for advising FmHA of the completion ofthe reorganization plan. The lender is also responsible for advising FmHAif the borrower does not comply with the plan and the servicing actionthe lender will take to protect the interest of the lender and FmHA. However,the FmHA servicing office will monitor the lender's files to ensure timelynotification of servicing actions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. When an estimated loss claim is paid during the operation of thereorganization plan, and the borrower repays in full the balance of theloan as set forth in the plan without an additional loss sustained by thelender, a Final Report of Loss is not necessary. The Finance Office willclose out the estimated loss account as a Final Loss at the time notificationof payment in full is received.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. If the bankruptcy court attempts to direct that loss payments willbe applied to the account other than the unsecured principal first andthen to unsecured accrued interest, the lender is responsible for notifyingthe FmHA office immediately. The FmHA servicing office will then obtainadvice from OGC on what actions FmHA should take.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. Protective Advances_Authorized protective advances may be includedwith the estimated loss payment associated with the reorganization bankruptcyprovided they were incurred in connection with liquidation of the accountprior to the borrower filing bankruptcy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. Accrued interest owed to the lender should be supported by documentationas to how the accrued interest amount was calculated by the lender. A copyof the promissory note and ledger should also be attached. As part of thereview of the final loss claim, FmHA should be assured that the lenderhas not accrued interest on the principal and interest amount of the loanthat was paid by the estimated loss payment. The approval official is responsiblefor the accuracy of the interest calculations on the final report of theloss before submission to the Finance Office.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">F. Repurchase of Notes_In cases where a default on the guaranteednote does not exist, the State Director may approve the repurchase of theunpaid guaranteed portion of the loan(s) from any holder(s) to reduce interestaccrual during a Chapter 7 proceeding, or after a Chapter 11 proceedingbecomes a liquidation proceeding. (Refer to paragraph X C of Form FmHA1980-35 or Form FmHA 1980-38.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">G. County Supervisors are authorized to approve Report of EstimatedLoss or Final Loss Payments to Form FmHA 449-30 in those cases where theloss payment will not exceed $55,000. The State Director is authorizedto approve the determination in all other cases. A copy of the form willbe given to the District Director. The State Director will submit FormFmHA 449-30 to the Finance Office for payment of any losses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: January 5, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Roland R. Vautour, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Under Secretary for Small Community and Rural Development.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-573 Filed 1-12-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 3410-07-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>